THE
BOY OF MOUNT RHIGI.
CHAPTER I.
BOYS' SPORTS.
One touch of nature
Makes the whole world kin.
There
is a certain portion of the Tahconnick range
of mountains, in the western part of
Massachusetts
,
called
Rhigi
, said to have been thus named by
Swiss emigrants who settled there, and who probably
came from the neighborhood of Mount Rhigi, in
Switzerland
,
one of the beautiful resorts of that most beautiful
land.
[1]
[1]
There are other similar traces of Swiss settlement in this
neighborhood.
Bash Bish
, the lovely fall now becoming known
and celebrated, is a corruption of a very common Swiss name of
their minor falls. The love of the
father-land
is expressed by
the names the emigrant gives to the land of his adoption. The
Pilgrim bestowed on the New England settlements the names
of his old England home  Norfolk, Suffolk, Boston,
Northampton
,
Stockbridge, &c., and the New Englander repeats
them in his new home in the far west.
Rhigi deserves the name which the loving wanderers
from their father-land gave to it. Like its prototype, it
overlooks a land of hills and valleys, rivers and lakes.
Its woodlands echo to the pleasant sound of the brooks
that glide down its declivities, and in its solitudes there
are small lakes  bright mirrors of the stars  known to
few except the sportsmen who frequent them.
Near the summit of the mountain there is a furnace,
and around it a scrambling village inhabited by colliers,
and forgers, and the
loafers
[2]
[2]
Low fellows
.
who are usually attracted
about a place of this description. Behind the village, and
sunken rather below its level, and separated from it by
an intervening morass, is a bit of water, precious to
the sportsman, for it is excellent fishing-ground for
sunfish, perch, and pickerel.
On a certain September day, two boys were fishing
together on the margin of this pond. One was a
fairhaired
,
fair-skinned boy of fifteen, with rather noble
features
,
expressive of truth, decision, and good temper. He
was tall of his years, and spare. His dress was frugal
and very neat, though it was Saturday afternoon, when
the accumulation of a whole week makes usually a
frightful amount of dirt on a rustic boy's clothes.
His companion was a year younger than himself, and
shorter by half a head. He looked strong and agile, his
muscles and sinews being well developed and wrought
by those best of all agents in such work, exercise and
pure air. His skin was weather-tanned, nut-brown; his
hair hung in tangled, dark masses of curls. Beneath
them looked out an eye as keen as an eagle's. His nose
and mouth were handsome, and about the mouth there
was a love of fun and good-fellowship, an expression of
humor and kindliness, that were in strange contrast with
a contraction of his brow, and an expression of vigilant
anxiety, that gave him a look of age beyond his years.
The boys stood on a projecting crag that hung over a
deep pool of water. An old oak, scathed by lightning,
and wreathed by a pendent grape-vine, overshadowed
them. The oak was flanked by a thick ascending
woodland
,
through which wound a foot-path to the spot where
the boys were standing. It was a still, cloudy day, such
as fishermen love, and they had rare luck; the shorter
boy far better than the other, for as fast as he threw his
line in, it dipped, and out he drew it with a sunfish or
perch, and now and then a pickerel.
Can any body tell me, Clap, said his companion to
the shorter boy, why you catch so many more fish than
I? Here I stand as still as a tombstone, and I manage
precisely as you do, and I have not had a real bite
for half an hour, and you have taken ten fish in that
time. It's too bad.
There's a fellow! replied Clapham, without
directly
solving his friend's question. I never before caught
such a strapper as that, fishing off shore. You see,
Hal, I know just how to humor them. Fishing comes
by natur. Dad says so, and I believe it. The fish
know us. They know there's no kind of use in
dodging our lines.
I've got you! exclaimed Hal, and jerked up his
line. The fish was off.
That's no way, Hal, said Clapham, coolly throwing
up his line, with a large fish struggling on it. You
are a prince at reading and writing, and such notions,
2
Hal; but for fishing, diving, and shooting, you'll never
be a match for me. You come on, though, a bit;
you've a dozen fish there  hey?
Yes; but what is that? You've full fifty.
Thereabouts  and I am worth fifty times as much
as you  at fishing, Hal. There!  there!  there's a
bite  the fellow will scud off with line, pole, and all.
Ah! ah! See! see! see, Hal. The boys leaned over
the bank to watch a very large pickerel, that was warily
playing with Clapham's bait. He nibbled gloriously,
but did not swallow the bait.
He
knows
you, Clap, a little too well! said Hal.
I'll have the
sarpent
, yet, muttered Clapham.
While the boys were thus intently occupied, a tall,
broad, heavy-framed man came down the shady
foot-path
behind them, with a string of game over one
shoulder, and a gun at the other. As much of a brim
as remained to his torn hat, was slouched over his eyes.
His hair, half gray, half still coal-black, was straight
and tangled, and his face was unshaven enough for an
Austrian soldier, or a city coxcomb. He had on a coarse,
red flannel shirt, without waistcoat or over-coat of any
sort, satinet trousers, filthier and more ragged than his
shirt, and a red cotton handkerchief knotted around his
bullock throat. A rare figure, indeed, he presented for
our country parts, where every man can, and most men
do, wear decent clothes.
He trod warily, as he approached the boys. He
needed not, for they were too much absorbed to heed
him. There was a keen glance from his eye, and a
malignant grin on his thin, close-set lips. Having got
close to Clapham, he gave him a kick with his broad,
bare foot, which sent him off into the water, growling
out, as he did so, There, go to the devil, and learn next
time to do what I bid ye!
The suddenness and violence of the blow deprived
Clapham of all power of exertion. He was, in fact,
stunned, and was sinking without an effort, when Harry,
shouting to him in a desperate voice, plunged after him,
and brought him to the surface. Clapham, though used
as a fish to the water, had quite lost his self-possession,
and he grasped his friend instinctively. The boys were
in danger of sinking together. Good enough for 'em,
said the half-drunk, brutalized wretch. Harry struggled,
and managed to keep both their heads above water till
Clapham had sufficiently recovered his self-command
to remain passive. Harry then dragged him to the
shore. In a few minutes more, Clapham was himself
again, though still ghastly pale. He shook off the
water, and, turning to the man, who looked at him as
he would have looked at a dog in like circumstances,
he said, Dad, that wasn't fair.
The
father
laughed hoarsely, and walked on.
Now that's a father for a boy to have! said
Clapham
,
gazing after him, shaking his fist, and dashing off
a tear, that, in spite of his hardihood, his sense of his
father's brutishness drew from him. I'll pay him, if
ever I grow up  I will.
O, hush, Clap  he's your father, said Harry.
There's no hush to it, Harry. I will. You don't
know nothing about him  you don't begin to know
him. He a father! He makes me fetch and carry for
him till I am as tired as any dog. He makes me lie for
him, and  and steal for him; and if I don't, he tries
to drown me; and he would, if you had not jumped in
after me. How could you do it, Hal? I wan't worth
it; and besides, don't you know that man or boy, that's
stunned and drowning, will pull you in?
Yes, I know that well; but I could not stand still
and see you sinking. There are no two ways about
that.
No, you could not  it would not be you if you did,
Hal. I never shall forget this  you see if I do. The
rough little fellow's phrases had not much in them, but
his brimming eyes, his flushed cheek, and his quivering
lips, filled out his meaning as he proceeded. I don't
know so much as you do, by a great sight; but there
may come a time when I can do you a good turn, and
you'll find me as ready as water is to run down hill.
You always have been, Clap; so we stand but even
now. Talking of water running down hill, suppose we
fish along down stream going home?
Agreed. The trout will bite as sharp as steel this
afternoon. I don't care how late I get to our den: late
or early, I shall only get a shaking.
The boys gathered up their fishing-tackle, slung their
fish over their shoulders, and pursued their way towards
the brook. After walking on for a few moments in
silence
,
Clapham suddenly stopped, and, laying his hand on
Harry's shoulder, said, May be, Hal, you think me a chip
of the old block; but I'm not  altogether; and if I had
any thing fit to be called father and mother, I should not
be very different from folks. When I have heard your
father speak to you friendly, and seen your mother's
doings  your mother is complete  I have had
feelings
I have. I have had more than one crying spell,
thinking of my bad luck in a father and mother.
It
is
bad luck, replied Harry. But come along,
let's fish a little now. We must soon be going home.
Mother is always anxious if I stay out after dark.
Mothers always are, you know.
Some mothers, replied Clapham, with an
accompanying
sound, half groan and half growl.
Harry took no notice of this, and the boys, after
having
stopped to fish at quiet, shady places, pointed out
by Clapham as favorite trout-haunts, and having each
added a string of these favorite fish to their
sporting
treasure, hastened homeward. When they well
could, they kept to the margin of the brook; but, where
they met with obstruction, from steep rocks or tangled
shrubbery, they dashed into the channel, leaped from
stone to stone, and shouted in accord with the
joyous
mountain-stream.
Clapham, boy-like, forgot the trouble that had made
him so miserable a half hour before. The leaden clouds,
which had hung over them all day, were breaking away,
and rolling off in separate masses, dyed with shades of
yellow, purple, and rose color, by the setting sun; and,
intermingling with the deep blue sky, they were reflected
like pictures in the brook; where, set back by a dam of
rocks, it offered to these lovely and ever-changing
images a glass-like mirror. The boys had planted their
feet on a little bit of an island, around which the water
gurgled; and Clapham, turning his eyes from the brook
to the wooded hills, lit up with a shower of golden light,
said, Hal, is not this here brook a pretty kind of
looking-glass
?
Yes, indeed, and a first-rate beauty looking in it
now. Trout-fishing in such a brook as this beats the
world. I read an anecdote, the other day, of a man
who went wade-fishing in such a place as this, and got
the gout in his stomach. The doctor told him it would
kill him some day. `The Lord's will be done,' he said;
`but I can't give up wade-fishing.' I think  don't
you, Clap?  that half the pleasure is in the pleasant
places we go to?
I don't know. I never thought of it. I somehow
feel better when I am out in sleek places  if father
ain't with me.
But had you not much rather come by the brook
than by the road? and don't you stop and look at the
falls?
Why, yes, I do. The brook is lively kind o'
company
;
and the falls are pretty sleek,  but nothing to
Bash Bish Falls. I spent one whole day clambering
up to the `Eagle's Nest.' Looking down from there is
kind o' wonderful. I forgot my fishing, and went to
sleep, and I had a dream there  I tell you, Hal!
When I waked, the stars were shining on me. I got
a rapper when I came home, though.
What did you dream, Clap?
I dreamed I was lying at the foot of the fall, almost
naked, and awful hungry. I had lost my way, and did
not know how to get back amongst folks. I heard a
voice say, `Look up, and see, way, way up, where the
water first springs over the rock: there you must go.
Sheer up where the stream comes down. There is
no other way. If you look back, you'll come
crashing
down; but keep your courage up, and you will
get safe to the Eagle's Nest, and find there every thing
you want in life.' Now, you know, as it was a dream,
its being impossible did not stop me: so straight on I
went, the water spattering me and roaring in my ears.
I saw lions and tigers sticking out their heads between
the trees, and growling, and cat-o'-mounts on the
branches ready to spring on me, and snakes crawling
and hissing along the rocks, and a toad with a face
just like my father's. O, I tell you, Hal, that
scared me. But I did keep on.
You have not seen Bash Bish, Hal? Well, the
last leap of the water is on each side a rock that
springs up to a sharp point, and on that point I stood
as if I had wings; but wings I had not, and how to
get off I did not know. There was a buzz of voices
all around me. They came out of the water, and out
of the trees, and one word they all spoke  `On! on!'
3
What to do I did not know. There was no place my
foot could reach, no branch of a tree I could get hold
of. I had a kind of feeling,  I suppose Elder Briggs
would call if faith,  that if I believed the words, and
looked up, I should go safe. So I fixed my eye on
the Eagle's Nest, and gave a spring up, and suddenly
there dangled before me a bright cord, that looked
as much like forked lightning as any thing. I caught
hold of it, and swayed back and forth; I curled up
like a spider, but I did not look down; I held fast,
and felt myself drawn up; and I looked up to the
Eagle's Nest, and there stood a little, fat angel, just
such as they have on the tombstones; she held the
cord, and smiled so friendly! Up, up I went like a
lark; but, as I came nearer, the angel seemed to
melt into solid light, that shone on the trees, and
down the falls, down into the very bed of the stream,
and clear away where it winds and turns like a snake;
and it was not fire-light, nor sun-light, but brighter,
more like lightning of a dark night. But what was
queerest of all, there was a table set out with roast
pig, and turkey, and pumpkin pie, and mince, and
every thing like Squire Allen's thanksgiving day. Just
then, I waked, and there I lay, flat enough,
hungry
as a hound, at the foot of the fall. Wasn't it
a drollish dream?
Yes; and perhaps it will come to pass.
Come to pass!
O, I do not mean your dream exactly, but
something
that your dream is the sign of; as, when Joseph,
in Scripture, you know, dreamed that his brothers'
sheaf made obeisance to his sheaf, it was a sign he
would rule over them, and so forth.
I don't know much about Scripture stories, Hal;
but tell me what my going up those rocks, and the
tigers, and so forth, and the little chubby angel, and
the roast pig, could be a sign of.
Not really signs, Clap. The times have gone by,
mother says, when God teaches men by dreams; but
yours set me thinking, and so your scramble up that
mountain seemed to me the difficulties you have to
struggle with in breaking off your present way of
living
;
and the voices were God's urging us every way to
do right; and the lions and snakes, and so forth, are
the discouragements in your way; and the cord, that
came to your aid, is the help that always comes if
you help yourself; and the roast pig, and so forth,
means your success at the end.
Well done, Hal! you beat Elder Briggs all
hollow
!
Clapham was silent for a moment, and then
added, Mam believes in dreams. O that toad, Harry,
with my father's face! Clapham paused, and then
said, in a lower and tremulous voice, I felt, when I
looked at it, as if I were growing like it! and then,
elevating his voice almost to a scream, he added, Am
I like him? O, I am! Poor Clapham's face
assumed
an expression of distress and shame. Harry
longed to know just what it meant; but he did not
then press him further. Clapham's father was known
to be a desperate man, his hand against every man,
and every man's hand against him, and Harry
suspected
that he had led his son into some evil-doing
that the boy was afraid to confess, lest Harry should
withdraw his friendship from him.
Clapham had yet to learn the nature and office of
true goodness; that it upbraideth not, that it suffereth
long and is kind, that it is easy to be entreated, and
full of compassion. Good men have known
temptation
and wrestled with it, and have overcome it. No
man is so good that he has not felt the need of
asking pardon of God, his Creator and Judge; no
man so good but he has felt, at times, ready to fall
down at the foot of the cross, and, with tears from
a contrite and overflowing heart, give thanks to that
blessed Savior who came to proclaim forgiveness of
sins  to seek and to save the lost.
The better a man is, the more does he feel for
those who have wandered out of the right way; he
allows for the circumstances of danger in which they
have been placed, and if they have fallen, he is
ready to raise them up.
The good man looks on all men as his brothers.
They may be poor and ignorant; they may have been
guilty of much wrong-doing, but he remembers that
they were created in the image of God, and he knows
that image still exists, though dimmed and hidden by
many a sin. He desires, above all things, to see them
stand reclaimed among their fellow-men; he hopes
and believes they may turn their faces heavenward,
and lift their desires and aims to the infinite love of
God which awaits the penitent.
Harry Davis had not reasoned all this out
distinctly
;
but he was a true-hearted, kind-hearted boy.
He saw much good in Clapham, and believed him
capable of much more. He might have fallen into
a pit. If I find it is so, thought Harry, I will drag
him out, and help him on to the best of my ability.
After a little reflection, Harry said, My mother
always says, when matters go wrong in this world,
we must do our best to right them. Now, if I were
you, Clapham, I would get some good place, and
live out.
I should have to run away if I did, for mother
wants me to pick up wood, and father wants me to
do every thing; but I would not mind running away,
for they are no parents to me, and I've no need to
be a son to them. They never did any thing for me
but born me. But what could I do in a regular way,
Hal? I have never done any thing but gather berries,
and pick up nuts, and fish, and hunt, and do
oddcome-short
chores for mam. I am afraid, Hal, it
would not agree with me to go round and round in
the same spot, like a grindstone.
Harry Davis was of a different opinion. He
thought truly that his friend, Clapham Dunn, had
good faculties, which, though they had been hitherto
pretty much wasted and turned aside from any worthy
use, might be so employed as to make him a useful
and respectable man. Harry had talked with his
mother about Clapham. Harry had a great respect
for his mother's judgment, and his mother had said
that a boy, that was a first-rate fisherman, and who
never went hunting without bringing home game,
would have a keen eye, and a dexterous hand at
farming, or at mechanic-work. All this Harry now
repeated to Clapham, and urged upon him many
reasons for decision and exertion; in a boy's way
he urged them, and for that reason they had more
weight with his friend. Now, let's start together,
Clap, he said; I am going away from home next
fall, to begin the world: do you go, too. I begin as
poor as you do  empty-handed, Clap, with better
clothes, may be, because mother makes, and mends,
and manages, and keeps every thing decent; but we
are tolerably poor, Clap, I assure you, and if it were
not for mother, I don't know what would become of
us; but we'll pay her for it one of these days.
You say that with rather guess feelings, Hal,
from what I said, the very same words, down at the
pond, replied Clapham. He spoke in a melancholy
voice, as if fully aware of the difference of their
condition. Harry felt pained for him. Yes, I do,
Clap, he said; and it will never be the credit to
me to do well, that it will be to you, for I have
others to thank for what I am and shall be. Now
rouse up a good resolution  look forward, and not
back, and leave this shambling way of life. Go
clear away; and, by and by, when you get to be a
man, and forehanded in the world, come back, and
return good for evil to your father and mother.
Do you think that ever could come to pass,
Harry Davis? Already Clapham's eye brightened
with hope; and the boys, as they fished down the
stream, talked over their plans for the future. Clapham
could not decide whether he would hire himself to a
farmer, or apprentice himself to a trade. Harry, though
only one year older than Clapham, knew a good deal
more about the world than he did, and he advised him
to get any decent place where he might be allowed to
do chores, and go to school. Mother says, he urged,
that a man, in this country, is not a man without
some learning. Mother says he must know at least
how to read, write, and cipher. Mother says these
are the tools for all trades, and there is no getting on
without them.
Nor with them, neither, always, Harry. Now,
there's your father,  I don't mean any thing against
him. He's a master-man for learning, we all know.
The last time we went to Elder Briggs' meeting, I heard
him read, and he sounded and rounded it off, I tell you.
Elder Briggs was no stick to him. Well, he's got the
tools, but he has not gone ahead!
No, he has not; but that does not prove any thing.
I have got as good fishing tackle as you have, Clap, but
I catch very few fish; without the tackle I could not
catch one; nor could you, Clap, smart as you are. So,
the tools are necessary, and mother says an ignorant
man is at the mercy of other people. He must go to
them to read and write for him, and cast up his accounts.
And then, where almost every man, woman, and child
knows how to read and write, a grown-up person must
feel somehow below others, that does not know, and this
is a very disagreeable feeling. Besides, Clap, mother
says we are not to live for ourselves alone. We must
all do something for our fellow-creatures, and to do for
them, we must be something ourselves.
Gorry! exclaimed Clap; I do something for my
fellow-creatures! that's an idee, Hal! That will be when
the sky falls, and we catch larks, I guess.
Clapham spoke jestingly; but he was conscious of a
new feeling in his bosom. Harry Davis was one of the
best lads in Salisbury, and one of the brightest scholars
in the school, and Harry Davis had shown himself his
friend. He had that day risked his life for him, and he
was now advising and encouraging him, and poor
Clapham
felt, for the first time, that there was one person in
the world who took a real interest in him, and who had
some faith in him, and he felt a desire to preserve that
interest, and to make himself worthy of it, and he felt,
too, that it was possible he might; and visions of decent
living, and school-going, and going ahead, dawned upon
him, and he threw himself back on the ground, kicked
up his legs, and cried out, with a ringing laugh, Hal,
I'll go it!
That's it, Clap; as mother says, be sure you're right,
then go ahead. Harry had hardly uttered the words,
when Clapham turned over on his face, and burst into
tears and sobs; and when Harry said, What is the
matter now, Clap? he replied, I can't tell you; but if
you knew all, you would despise me, you would not have
any kind of a hope of me, you would not even fish with
me again  no, you would not.
But try me, Clap, and see if I won't. You can't
make matters worse by telling me.
No, don't ask me, Hal. I can't  I can't  I won't
not now, I mean  I can't.
Well, be quiet  consider of it  we won't talk
any more about it now.
The boys kept their homeward, way, Harry asking
Clapham's attention to the pleasant spots, as he called
them; and Clapham, in reply, said, It is a
master-pretty
brook! And so it is, with its hill sides of
stately trees, margins of flowering shrubs, herbs of
virtue, and flowers of many kinds.
A love of nature is not enough cultivated among
rich or poor. Without it, one is like a blind man in
a gallery of beautiful and ever-changing pictures, like
a deaf man in a wide-world concert-room  the
paintings
and the music of divine creation.
CHAPTER II.
THE GOOD RURAL MATRON.
Scorn not the slightest word or deed,
Nor deem it void of power;
There's fruit in each wind-wafted seed,
Waiting its natal hour.
Clapham
had given to Harry some posies, as he
called a bunch of lovely fringed gentians, for his
sister Annie, and the boys had separated. Clapham
took a foot-path, which led through woods, to his home,
a wretched, lonely hut, on the mountain side, some two
miles from the village of Salisbury. It had originally
been put up for a few weeks' shelter to a collier. It
was not so comfortable as an Indian wigwam, and little
better than the den of a wild beast; but, such as it was,
Norman Dunn and his wife Massy were content to
inhabit it, or rather to make it their head-quarters,
whence to go forth to prey on society.
Harry Davis's home was a small house on the
out-skirts
of the village of Salisbury, within hearing of the
perpetual song of the little brook with which our readers
have been made acquainted, and which, as it crosses
the valley, widens to a stream as ornamental as a string
of pearls on a lady's neck. An interval of sunny land,
between the hill side and the brook, gave space for a
garden.
I suppose your husband takes care of your garden,
Mrs. Davis? said a lady visitor, who one day dropped in.
Not I, indeed, said Davis, looking up from his
writing. I have always something of rather more
consequence than that on hand.
How do you manage to keep it so nicely, then?
asked the lady, with all you have to do?
Why, I
must
have a garden, replied Mrs. Davis.
Mr. Davis don't refuse to plant the potatoes, and the
little girls are helpful at the weeds. And Harry works
in it at all his odds and ends of time, and I love it
so well, it's no chore to do what I can.
Your potatoes look finely, Mrs. Davis.
Yes, ma'am, thanks to Harry; he never neglects
hoeing them; he knows they are my dependence.
But I am sorry to see so much room taken up
with cabbages, Mrs. Davis, they are so unwholesome.
Why, I don't know, ma'am. Working people don't
find so many things unwholesome as ladies do. Besides,
my husband is very partial to cabbages, and I like to
have him suited.
What is that beyond the beans?
A bed of parsnips. They are relishing in the
spring, and my husband is fond of them. So, we never
spare parsnip seed. I have plenty of beans, too, you
see. The children are fond of beans, and they are
profitable; they go a great way.
I should not think it very
profitable
, Mrs. Davis, for
you to cultivate lettuces in that way. Does it not take
a great deal of time to tie them up so nicely?
There's but a few tied up, and those are just to
please old Mrs. Allen. The old lady thinks every thing
of head-lettuce, and her people don't make much of a
garden.
I suspect you make little account of trouble, said
the lady. You have peas, I see. Our landlord at the
inn tells us, in excuse for having no peas, that they
take so much ground, and yield so little, that he cannot
be at the trouble of them.
But when it's for their own children, no one thinks
of trouble. I like to be sure of green peas and roast
lamb, Independence day. The children enjoy it, and it
somehow sets out the day from the rest of the year.
And for whom are the peonies, and pinks, and
lilies, so well taken care of, dear Mrs. Davis, and the
roses so skilfully tied up and trained? And there's a
honeysuckle, too, my favorite flower.
Why, ma'am, for every one that loves to enjoy
them. They can't be confined to any body in
particular
.
God seems to me to have provided them, as he
does the rain, for the just and unjust. It's a pleasure
to me to see people stop and look over into the garden;
and to a poor person, that has but little to give away,
it's a pleasure to give a bunch of flowers to a child,
or send it to a sick body.
God bless you, Mrs. Davis, said the lady, as she
took her leave; I could not have believed that the
woman to whom I send my clothes to be washed could
give me such instruction as to the use of my
facties
,
and the abounding means of good and
contentment
.
It is hardly necessary to describe Mr. Davis's
dwelling
to convince our readers that, though in a ruinous
condition, it had all the decency and comfort that
energy
and neatness in the mistress could give it. The
furniture, though racked by more moves than three,
which Franklin pronounces to be equivalent in
destruction
to a fire, was yet decent, and indicated a history
of better times.
There was one valuable piece of furniture in the
room that served Mrs. Davis's family for kitchen and
parlor  a capacious old-fashioned bureau, surmounted
by a writing-desk and book-case, in which, with a few
volumes of history, poetry, and travels, and some
well-preserved
school-books, there was a large family Bible,
not a grease-spot to be found on its well-read leaves,
not a dog's-ear on their corners. It had been used
with care and reverence. It is worth while to extract
a passage from good old Mr. Bethan's will  Mr.
Bethan
was Mrs. Davis's father  concerning this Bible.
Besides the five hundred dollars aforesaid, I give
4
and bequeath to my daughter Martha my great family
Bible, the same received from my honored father on
my wedding-day. I have brought up my children
ten in number  on the milk and meat of its holy
word, and I recommend to my daughter Martha,
aforesaid, to do the same; and may its nurture and
admonition
prosper with future generations, as, by the
blessing of God, they have done with my aforesaid
daughter Martha. The good man's pious prayer was
granted.
Mrs. Davis did not lay her Bible on the shelf,
but she put it to the holy use suggested by her
father. She read in it daily to her children, and
explained it as well as she was able. She took
care not to weary them with the reading. She
turned to the Bible whenever she had occasion to
instruct them in a particular duty, or to reprove or
admonish them. If the children were out of humor,
and quarrelsome, she found in her Bible an
admonition
to peace and brotherly love; if they were
selfish, she showed them the requirement to do unto
others as you would that others should do to you
a requirement that lays the axe at the root of all
selfishness. If they were unjust, unkind in their
judgment of others, impatient or discontented,  if
any thing went wrong,  instead of flying out upon
them, and scolding, she took the right moment, and
opened that precious gift of her father; and, in a
sweet and tender, and never an angry voice, she read
to them some passage which plainly forbade their
wrong-doing or feeling; and then she would turn to
some word of encouragement, some promise of good
or favor, which made the children feel that He who
gave the law was their Benefactor as well as Judge.
No tongue can tell, Mrs. Davis would say, how
I feel my weakness in bringing up my children,
especially in correcting them; but when I open my
Bible, there is strength and authority.
But to return to the book-case. One of the
shelves was appropriated to Mr. Davis's use. This
was filled with pamphlets and newspapers, one large
volume entitled Wonderful Shipwrecks, a
dream-book
,
and a history of remarkable inventions, with
sketches of the lives of inventors  rather apocalyptic.
On the evening of Harry's return from his
fishing
,
Davis was seated at his desk, with a large sheet
of paper before him, on which he was drawing the
figure of a plough he was in the act of inventing.
Is that you, Harry? he said; I have wanted
you confoundedly, to copy this drawing for me; you
can draw better than I, and it's fair I should get
something for the time you have wasted learning.
Wasted, father! I hope not. I have got a
great many ideas from it already, as Mr. Lyman
says, and I am sure I have had a great deal of
pleasure, and that's worth something. And Mr.
Lyman
says, if any one has the art of doing any
thing well, it will be sure to turn to account.
What would poor Mr. Lyman himself do, if it were
not for his knowledge of drawing?
Pooh! nonsense! `Luck is a lord,' and Lyman
is lucky.
I should not call it
luck
exactly, sir.
No matter what you call it. I want to send
a drawing of this to Washington,holding up the
sheet of paper on which his plough was clumsily
delineated,  and you will copy it for me this
evening, and make all these lines that are a little
agee and blotted, straight  you see my hand
trembles
.
Will you do it?
Lyman was a young man in the village who
had lost the use of one leg by a fall in his
childhood
.
When about fifteen, he had been sent to the
Boston Hospital for surgical aid. He was a long
time under medical treatment, but without material
benefit. Mrs.  heard his melancholy case spoken
of with much interest by a medical friend, and
heard, at the same time, that his only pastime
was drawing, for which he had a gift. Mrs. ,
though the working head of a large establishment,
with unnumbered occupations, went to the Hospital
and instructed the lad in the science of perspective,
which she thoroughly understood, and gave him
lessons
in drawing. This is but one of a hundred
similar acts of efficient charity of Mrs. . What
a singular woman is Mrs. ! said one of her
fashionable friends, with a curl of her lip. Would
to Heaven she were not singular, but that many
others would turn their talents and accomplishments
into daily bread for the less favored or unfortunate!
Daily bread it proved to young Lyman. He did
not recover his leg, but he went home with the
means of gaining his living. He diligently practised
the lessons he received; and he has since had
plenty of employment from engravers, from an
oculist
to illustrate diseases of the eye, and from
engineers to make drafts.
Lyman acted on Dr. Franklin's principle,  he
made the favor go round. He could only return
gratitude to his benefactress; but when he found
our friend Harry had a taste for drawing, and an
inclination to improve it, he gave him an hour of
his winter's evenings.
Harry had cheerfully promised to comply with
his father's wishes, and make the drawing, when
Davis gave utterance to a new want. It's getting
dark, he said; do, Martha, light a candle.
We have not one in the house, replied his
wife, who was jogging the cradle with one foot,
while she chopped some potatoes for supper.
Have not? Well, send Annie over to Mrs.
Hubbard's, and borrow one.
If I could see any way to pay it, I would.
The wicked borrow, and never return,
interposed
little Annie.
You will have to make out as I do, father,
continued Mrs. Davis, without heeding Annie's reply;
and she took from a closet some pine knots Harry
had collected, and, throwing one on the fire, it flamed
up and diffused a brilliant light through the room.
This will do for the present, said Davis; but
we must have a candle after supper. I have here
the most wonderful thing you ever heard of.Are
the fish almost ready to fry, Harry? I begin to feel
sharp.  It beats the world. It is a self-moving
plough. It's all done to the moving power, and
that I shall work out in the course of the night.
Mind and fry some pork, that's thicker than a wafer,
with your fish, Martha.  Talk about a candle!
Why, in less than a year after the plough is on
sale, we'll have them by the box. There was never
such an invention heard of as a self-moving plough.
Only consider, ploughs are used all over the world;
there's no limit to the demand.  Cut a pie for
supper
,
mother; we had a slim dinner.  There's no
calculating what my patent may be worth to me!
As much, may be, Thomas, as your patent for
the `Self-Churning Churn,' or the `Independent
Washing-Machine
.'
Mrs. Davis spoke with a smile, half
sad, half incredulous, but not tauntingly; and, as if
conscious of some difference of feeling between
herself
and her husband, to soften it, she threw another
pine knot on the fire for his benefit.
The churn, to be sure, said Davis, in rather
a meek tone, had one fault  it would not bring
the butter; but the `
Independent Washing-Machine
' was
complete, only the women-folks are so full of
prejudice
,
they would not use it. Desire Nash herself
told me it saved half the soap. And she might
have saved the other half too, for any good it did
the clothes in that machine, Martha Davis could have
retorted; but she was not in the habit of speaking
words that would irritate without doing any
possible
good. She had lived with her husband
fifteen
years. He was what is called a scheming
man. He had a mechanical turn, and, if he had
kept steadily to the trade of a cooper, to which he
was bred, he would by this time have been a man
of substance; but, being lazy as far as bodily
exertion
goes, he was always contriving some short
and easy road to fortune. He would rather sit down
to the old desk and invent a plough, than to plough
a furrow. Wiser men than Thomas Davis have
miscalculated their powers, and mistaken their
calling
.
That which spoils many a decent mechanic
had ruined him,  an over-conceit of himself, and
an indolent disposition. His churn, he declared in
his puffing advertisements, might be managed by
a child six years old; and a woman might sew,
knit, or read, while she churned. One poor woman,
who perseveringly tried it, said she might have
read through Scott's Bible, notes and all, before the
butter came.
A bright vision of the
Independent
Washing-Machine
followed the churn. The getting up of these
cost vastly more. Once wound up, they went of
themselves
;
5
but, after going one or two trips, they were
obstructed by some imperfection in the machinery, and,
like Balaam's ass, go they would not; and those who
had been persuaded to try them, gave them so bad a
name that the greater number unsold, decayed and fell
to pieces. Poor Mrs. Davis's little inheritance all went
to pay for the patents, the advertisements, and the
manufacture of the machines. One might hope that
this experience would teach Davis that his genius did
not lie in invention. Not at all. By this time, he had
neither workshop nor tools of his own; and once in a
while, when his wife's productive labors were suspended
by a lying-in, he turned into some other man's
workshop
,
and earned enough to supply the most pressing
wants of his family. Davis had rather work than
forego
his three meals a day, and, to do him justice, he
was good-natured, and could not quietly see his family
suffer; but, the pressure removed, he reverted to his
old occupations, and was again at his desk, drawing
plans for patent clocks, patent axles, patent hoes; and
now he had been a month working out his design for
the
Self-Moving Plough
. One of the mischiefs of
the sangume disposition that usually attends this
invention
,
was a perpetual moving from place to place,
now to some little trading town on the Hudson, where
he expected new facilities, then back into the interior,
for some visionary advantage. Always to be blessed.
Each remove involved fatigue and loss to his
much-enduring
wife.
Davis willingly left his desk for the savory
invitation
of the supper-table, and, when there, after helping
his wife and children to the perch and sunfish, he
coolly took the trout to himself, saying that he had
always been remarkable for his love of trout.
Don't you like trout, too, mother? asked little
Lucy.
Yes, Lucy, but your father cares more about them
than I do.
Surely, Martha, said Davis, helping himself to
the last trout in the dish, you did not cook all
the trout Harry caught. My appetite is only just
whetted.
I did save out a relish for old Mrs. Allen's
breakfast
.
The old lady is partial to trout.
Pooh! Old folks should not be setting their hearts
on such things.
O father! exclaimed little Lucy. The others
said nothing. Harry blushed, and they all felt their
father's coarse selfishness.
Why upon earth, Martha, asked Davis, while he
gleaned out every morsel, did you not put more pork
with the fish? I desired you to.
There is no more in the house.
But there is plenty at Smith's. A little more
sugar in my tea, Martha.
I put in the last spoonful.
Well, wife, I don't see the use of your slaving
yourself all summer washing for those New York
gentry
up at the tavern, if we can't get sugar for our
tea.
We have many other things besides sugar to
get.
Never mind; we'll have sugar plenty, and of the
best, when my ploughs begin to turn up the ground.
CHAPTER III
BERRYING.
All was so light, so lovely, so serene,
And not a trouble to be heard or seen.
Saturday
is school-children's holiday all over our
world, and on the Saturday following that of the
boys' fishing sport, Mrs. Davis had promised her
children
that they should go berrying. It was rather late
for blackberries; but Clapham knew a place among the
hills where blackberries, always late, were now in
abundance and perfection, and Clapham had promised
to come down and pioneer them to the spot. Poor
Clapham had washed himself in the brook, as clean as
water without soap (an article his home did not afford)
could make him, had combed out his hair, which
turned off from the comb (a comb Harry had given
to him) in curls, clustering one over another, had put
on a well-patched roundabout, a present from Harry,
and sown up the rips and tears in his pantaloons as well
as he could, and was going forth whistling, with a
light heart, when his mother called after him, Mind,
Clap, you don't forget to bring me the snuff. You
know you promised, if I washed your shirt, you would.
I'll get it, and no mistake, said Clap, keeping
on his way.
And, Clap, said she, running after him, here is
my mixtur-bottle  it don't hold nothing, hardly  just
get it filled with Jamaica  my stomach is so cold
to-day. Here is a ninepence.
Clapham stopped. You told me, he said, when
you asked me to sell berries for the snuff, that you had
not a cent in the world.
I had not then, Clap  don't be mad  you know
I never tell lies. I found this, since, in dad's
corduroys
.
Put it back, then, mam. We are bad enough
without stealing from one another; and he flung the
bottle against a rock, and shivered it to atoms.
You're an
ondecent
, ongrateful boy! You've no
feeling for your own mother, scolded and whimpered
Massy. Clapham did not heed her. He had looked
forward, all the week, to this afternoon; his home was
behind him, and even his wretched mother could not
cast a shadow over the sunshine of his present pleasant
expectations. It was one of the brightest of
September
days,  warm, but not too warm,  with a freshness
in the air that painted Clapham's cheek with a glow
as ruddy as that of the leaves which here and there
were already dyed in their rich autumn colors.
Clapham
,
at this moment, looked so handsome, so joyous,
that it seemed as if some good angel must rescue him
from the probable destiny of his life. That good angel
must be the firm resolve, the manly struggle of the
boy himself!
It seemed to Clapham that he saw Rhigi, the
brook, the sky, the world, with a new eye since Harry
had spoken of the pleasure of being out in
pleasant
places. It never before looked so beautiful to
him, and down he went along the stream, swinging
from bough to bough, singing and whistling as he
went.
He had left the stream at a fall of some fifteen or
twenty feet, and come again upon it at some distance,
when a curve of the shore brought him directly in face
of it, where some stout old grape-vines, hanging from
the trees, had been woven into a seat. Clapham stopped
to look at it, and, while he was looking, something
glittered
among the weeds at his feet. It was a purse of
silk and steel beads, and near it lay a pencil. Ah, Mr.
Lyman's! thought Clapham. I might have guessed
he had been drawing here, when I saw the seat. He
slid the purse's rings. Goodness me! five dollars, and
ever so much change! He replaced the bank note
and silver, as if they had scorched his fingers, thrust
the purse into his bosom, and buttoned his roundabout
tight over it, and walked on faster than before. Many,
many thoughts crowded upon the poor boy. No,
no!  I will not, he said aloud. I'm not fit
company
for Harry and Annie with these old duds of
pantaloons, and no shoes; but I should be unfitter if
I bought new with this money. No! I will carry it
to Mr. Lyman, and Harry will know it, and like me
better for it; and then I shall  may be  dare to tell
him all. But that's no great honesty just to give Mr.
Lyman his own, to get Harry's
friendship
. If I could
do it just because it is honest and right to do it, and
for nothing else, then I should think something of
myself; I should somehow be sure of myself, and that
somehow would be better than even having Harry think
well of me. Hurrah! I'll go it! he shouted, clapping
his hands. I'll carry it to Mr. Lyman, and get his
promise not to say a word about it. Clapham Dunn
was a happy boy that day.
In a little time, he bounded into Mrs. Davis's house,
exclaiming, All ready?
Yes, indeed, replied Harry and Annie, in a breath,
only mother is afraid to let Lucy go. She thinks
she will be too tired.
O, please, Mrs. Davis, let her go. Why, it is not
any thing to get her up there. She is as light as a
feather, Lucy is. I can carry her all the way in my
arms, or on my back.
So he can, mother, as easy! pleaded little Lucy.
Well, go, child; and take the plaid shawl with
you, Annie, to tie round her, if it comes cool towards
evening. Lucy is not as strong as the rest of you;
but you need not carry her, Clapham; only now and
then, if she gets tired, give her a lift.
She shall not get tired, dear mother, said Harry.
Clapham and I can make a hand-chair, and carry her.
The boys clasped hands, Lucy jumped on to the seat,
and put an arm on the shoulder of each boy; Annie
followed with the baskets; and so they all went forth,
chattering and laughing, while the good mother stood
at the door, her eye fondly following them, and her
heart echoing the music of their gleeful voices. After
going along the margin of the brook for a while, they
turned off, and ascended through the woodlands to the
blackberry field, the land of promise. It was a large,
scrambling field, on the declivity of Rhigi, with the
briery blackberry skirting all the woodland, and growing
in scattering clumps about the field. Our young friends
were soon renforced by children from Salisbury and
young mountaineers from Rhigi. A voice of some
fortunate and generous child would be heard shouting,
O, what a good place I have found! and then a
swarm would gather and share the spoil, while others,
more selfish, more wary, and more intent on filling
their baskets than on any social pleasure, would-creep
about in hidden places, and never impart to others
their good fortune. The Davises and Clapham kept
together. Clapham's wood-craft stood him in good
stead. He knew every bush in the field; he could pick
twice as fast as any one else. Annie wondered how
her basket filled so rapidly, till she detected
Clapham
dropping in a handful of the largest and ripest
berries; and she exclaimed, O, it's you that have filled
my basket, Clapham, and not I; and little Lucy said,
It's all of you that fill my basket, and they are all so
ripe and good; but Clapham's are the
bester
of all.
And you are the `bester' little girl, said
Clapham
;
and do you stay here with Annie, while Hal and
I go up to a clearing, where there's a royal place.
We'll be back in less than no time. The girls
assented
,
and the boys run off. Annie made a little
cushion of the blanket shawl for Lucy, and the girls
sat down to eat a bit of gingerbread their mother
had tucked in one of their baskets.
How pleasant it is here! said Annie, lying down
on the ground. See, Lucy, how the white clouds
sail over our heads; and hark! don't you hear the
fall?
O, yes! I wish we lived here always. What
do peoples live in houses for, Annie?
Why, would you like to live here at night, Lucy?
Yes, Annie, if the sun would only shine at night,
and mother would come here, and you, and Harry, and
Clapham would live with us. I love Clapham; don't
you love Clapham, Annie? Before Annie replied,
Hancock Coles and James Willett, two boys from
the neighborhood, joined them. Love Clap Dunn!
that's a good one, cried young Coles. He's a pretty
fellow to love, or like, or put up with any way. Harry
Davis disgraces himself to keep company with him.
Hancock disgraces hisself to say so, don't he,
Annie? whispered Lucy. Annie, who had risen to
her feet at the approach of the boys, nodded a very
hearty assent, and Lucy turned to Hancock, and,
doubling
her little fist, and shaking it most energetically
at him, she said, You don't know Clapham!
Don't I? That's a good one, an't it, James? Don't
know Clap Dunn, and his father before him! My
father says, Norman Dunn, and Massy, and Clap into
the bargain, ought to be sent to State's Prison. Don't
know Clap Dunn! Clap, that robbed our hen-roost
when he was seven years old!
Annie could no longer restrain her bursting
indignation
.
If he did, he has never robbed since, she
said; and who was it, Mr. Hancock Coles, that robbed
poor old Mrs. Allen of all her plums when he was
twice seven years old? You may look mad, but you
can't deny it. And if poor Clapham has a bad father
and mother, he can't help that; and I don't think they
are any worse than
Annie's kind heart checked her, or perhaps it was
a certain innate sense of the hardship of reproaching
a child with a father's wrong-doing. She had that
very morning been present when one of the gossips
of the village had related at the Davises an anecdote
of Coles, Hancock's father, who was a noted
horse-jockey
,
having taken advantage of the necessities of a
poor woman who had just lost her husband, and so
overreached her in the purchase of a pair of horses
that his conscience forced him to allow her five dollars
over and above the bargain, and that he gave it to
her, saying, I feel so much for you, ma'am, being
a widow, that I present you five dollars.
[3]
[3]
Fact.
Annie
might not have quite comprehended the transaction,
but she perceived that, in addition to dishonesty, there
was meanness and ostentation, and that therefore it
was worse than bare thieving.
We wish that the principles of strict honesty and
unwavering truth, in which Mrs. Davis educated her
children, were universal. Then there would be an
end of the false coloring, the false weighing, the
false counting, the keen bargaining, to which the
greed of gain
leads a portion of our New England
people, and which is  we say it with shame and
sorrow  their besetting sin. Greed of gain is the
besetting sin of the most civilized, the best, and the
most favored people of God's earth. My young
friends, reform it, reform it altogether.
Annie had checked herself as she was on the
point of reproaching Hancock with his father's
misdeed
;
but little Lucy, who shared her sister's
resentment
without feeling the same impulse to restrain
it, said, My Annie means that Clapham's peoples
ain't any worse than your peoples, Mr. Hancock.
Take that for your impudence, miss! said
Hancock, kicking over little Lucy's basket of
blackberries
;
and he was on the point of stamping on
the fruit and crushing those beautiful, selected
berries
;
but, seeing Harry and Clapham emerging from
the woodland above, he sneaked off with his
companion
.
Lucy was left crying bitterly. He's an
awful boy! she said; I'll tell Harry of him, and
I'll tell Clapham every thing he said about him.
O, no, no, no, dear Lucy, don't; it will make
the boys so mad; and may be they will have a fight
with Hancock. Don't say one word about it, Lucy.
I will pick up all the berries. Clapham will feel
dreadfully if you tell him. See, they are not the
least hurt, the grass is so clean. Do not say one
word to Clapham. Mother says we must never tell
one person what another says against him; it only
makes more trouble, mother says, and I know
Clapham
will feel so bad poor Clapham!
I won't tell him then, Annie  but it's too bad;
and the little creature wiped away her tears with
her stained hands, suppressed her sobs, and cleared
up her face as well as she could, before the boys
came up to them.
Why, what's the matter, Lucy, darling?
exclaimed
Harry; the blackberries spilt? O!
Is that all? said Clapham. Never mind, Lucy;
it's no fault of yours, I dare say  it's a sideling
place here. Don't, Annie, plague yourself to pick
up the rest. I have some first-rate ones here in
this nice paper your mother wrapped the
gingerbread
in. I picked them on purpose to cream over
your and Annie's baskets. There, he added, shaking
them over the tops of their baskets, there, it's all
neat and complete.
Lucy's happiness was quite restored. There was
no vestige of the grief and disturbance, except now
and then a glance askance, from her sweet blue
eye, at Annie, which indicated a consciousness that
a great secret was sleeping in her little bosom.
The young people proceeded homeward, and were
again traversing the foot-path along the brook, in
whose pure water they had washed away the stains
on Lucy's face and hands. She was on Clapham's
back. He had gathered for her, by the way, the
golden-rod, asters, and the lovely fringed gentian,
and Annie had tied them in her pocket handkerchief,
which swung on Lucy's arm. The flowers were
peeping out in every direction. They had stopped
under a sumac, whose leaves were already of a
brilliant
red, and Harry, at Lucy's request, had pulled
away from the sumac a clematis that was wreathed
around it, and which is scarcely less beautiful in the
silken green tassels of its seed-time, than with its
delicate summer flowers. The whole vine had fallen,
and its branches dropped around the children, so as
to wreathe them together enchantingly. At this
moment
,
Lyman met them, and the group struck the
painter's eye. He thought he had never seen any
thing so beautiful. O, stand still! he said; stand
still, every one of you, for a few moments. Let the
vine be just where it is over your heads, and shoulders,
and arms. No, Annie, don't move the baskets; leave
6
your shawl on the ground. O Harry, this is what I
call a painter's opportunity! If I could but give such
coloring as I see now,  Lucy's face so lovely, so
fair on one side, Clapham's
`Those azure veins
Which steal like streams along a field of snow'
and that snow against Clapham's brown and ruddy
cheek, and that hair like sunbeams floating over his
massy, dark curls, and that chubby hand over his
shoulder with the handkerchief of flowers, and you
all interwoven in the clematis, and the brook and the
hill side, and the last rays of the sun on the distant
mountain tops,  O, it is a living picture! But I can
do nothing with it, he said, despairingly, putting up
his pencil; perhaps, hereafter, I may recall it.
But their happy day was coming to an end; and
the young people, released from their sylvan bondage,
hastened homeward, stopping only once more, and
then at old Mrs. Allen's, who, as Harry said, was
old and lame, and should not be forgotten. They all
insisted on her taking a portion from their overflowing
baskets; and, as they went away, richer for what they
had imparted, the grateful old lady wiped a tear of
pleasure from her eyes, saying, Never were there
just such children! Like mother, like children; and
Clapham  they are sort of missionaries to him.
What a smile the boy has! such white teeth! and
he looked so happy, poor child!
Poor child he was not that day  not to be pitied.
We have had a real good time  a lucky day, he
said to his young friends, as they bade good night;
and he went off to sell his berries in the village, to
buy the snuff for his mother, and, last of all, to restore
Mr. Lyman's purse. Lyman said he had not yet
missed it; and, counting the money, he said, There's
not a penny gone. I never should have known where
I lost it, or suspected who found it, he said.
Clapham
,
he added, you are more honest than you have
the name of being.
I am, replied Clapham, blushing, but returning
his glance with a steady eye. You shall be
rewarded
though, Clapham; and Mr. Lyman offered him
all the silver the purse contained.
I do not wish any reward, Clapham said; but
one thing, Mr. Lyman, I ask of you. Be kind enough
not to tell any one that you lost the purse, or that I
found it.
Why, how odd, Clapham!
Will you promise this, sir?
Yes. But you are a strange boy.
Perhaps I am, said Clapham; and they parted
CHAPTER IV.
A CONFESSION.
He built a foundation of Repentance with the strong cement
of Sincerity. Thereupon was placed the superstructure of Hope,
on whose summit the light of Heaven steadily shone.
On
the Thursday evening following, Clapham
appeared
at Mrs. Davis's door. A change seemed
to have come over his spirit since the pleasant
berrying
day. He looked more neglected, sadder, more
troubled, than usual. Nothing in particular had
occurred
to make him so; but his present life, in
consequence
of his association with the Davises, and of the
hopes Harry had inspired, and the prospects his friend
had set before him, was becoming more distasteful to
him, and his wretched home more and more hateful.
He felt too, more and more, the burden of an
unconfessed
sin on his mind; and he was constantly
tormented
with the fear that if Harry knew all, he might
withdraw his friendship.
Norman, as usual, had sent his jug down to be
filled, and Clapham had left it behind a rose-bush
at the gate. He had sold a string of fish in the
village, reserving a half dozen, which he asked Mrs.
Davis to accept. There is but one trout, he said;
and that I brought for little Lucy, she is so fond
of counting the bright spots on them. Where is she,
Mrs. Davis?
In the bed-room, Clapham. Poor little Lucy is
not well; go in and show her the trout. Thank
you for the fish, Clapham; it's the gift in season.
I had nothing fresh in the house for father  he is
very fond of fish.
I wish Mrs. Davis would keep the fish to
herself
,
thought Clapham; but he did not say it. He
proceeded to the bed-room. Lucy's cheek, burning
with fever, dimpled at his approach. She was
delighted
with the trout, and still more delighted with
a bunch of fresh fringed gentian which Clapham
had brought to her, and which Annie promised to tie
into one of Lucy's favorite wreaths. How pretty!
said Lucy, pulling open one of the flowers; as
blue as the blue sky. Annie took up the word,
and quoted a stanza from Bryant's Fringed Gentian.
Then doth thy sweet and quiet eye
Look through its fringes to the sky;
Blue  blue  as if that sky let fall
A flower from its cerulean wall.
Why, that's just what I said! resumed Lucy.
How kind you are, Clapham! O Annie! she
added, and drew Annie down to the bed and
whispered
to her; and Annie took from her work-basket
a pocket-handkerchief on which the Declaration of
Independence was printed. Harry had bought it with
money of his own earning, to give to Clapham.
Little Lucy had hemmed one of its sides, her first
real sewing, she said, for she counted the
patch-work
on which she had learned for nothing. Annie
had finished the hemming, and marked Clapham's
name full out. Lucy told its history, and said, Now,
Clapham,
`You must keep it as long as you live,
And never lose it, and never give.'
Never! never! said Clapham; and I thank
you all a thousand times.
And that is quite enough, said Mrs. Davis.
Now, Clapham, will you lend Harry a hand at
carrying
my clothes home for Mrs. Dawson and the other
ladies
?
Clapham, as always, was ready. And, Harry,
added Mrs. Davis, take a vial, and get some
castor-oil
,
at Johnson's, for Lucy. Bring a light here, Annie.
I must get out some money to pay for it.
Annie brought in a candle, and Mrs. Davis went to
a bureau which stood near a small sliding window,
opened a drawer, and took from a box a purse
containing
all her treasure, the product of a summer's
washing for a large family from New York, who had
been boarding in the village, and who had paid her,
ungrudgingly, New York prices. She had, in her own
mind, appropriated every shilling of it to some good to
be obtained for her children. No wonder she looked
at it with pride and pleasure. A small sum, hardly
earned, gives more happiness to the contented laborer
than a great amount of riches to the rich man. Thus
a kind Providence throws in compensations!
While Mrs. Davis was selecting a quarter of a
dollar from a handful of silver in her hand, on which
the candle was gleaming, there was a noise against
the outside of the house, by the window.
What's that, mother? asked Annie, starting.
It's the cow, said Harry, knocking down father's
model plough!
But I thought I saw a shadow of something, said
Annie.
No doubt; and a `shadow' of any thing is enough
to scare you. What harm can a shadow do you,
Annie?
But there is always a substance where there is a
shadow, Harry.
Nonsense, Annie! I wish you would not be a
goose, like other girls. Come, Clap, let us go.
Perhaps
we shall meet this dreadful `
substance
,' Annie.
The young people laughed, little dreaming that Annie
had seen indeed a substance and the shadow of a
fearful coming event!
The boys, after depositing the snow-white clothes,
proceeded to Mr. Johnson's shop  Clapham to fill the
jug, and Harry the vial. The shop was closed.
Deuce take it! said Clapham; just my luck!
7
Never mind, Clap; you can go on to Smith's shop,
or, what is still better, take your jug home empty.
Yes, and get a beating, that father has promised
me if I bring it home empty; and this is the only kind
of promise he keeps. I have spent two hours trying
to sell my fish; and but for the New York people, I
should not have got a penny in cash. Our Salisbury
folks know where money goes that comes to us. But,
Harry, are you not coming along with me to Smith's?
No; mother told me, if I did not find Johnson's
open, to get the oil at the doctor's.
O! but, Harry, I say, do go to Smith's with me.
I am in a hurry, Clap, to get home.
We won't be a minute; we'll run all the way.
Thank you, I am too tired to run. I have been
on foot to Canaan to-day, for father.
Do come, Harry.
I cannot, Clap; mother will want me.
But Clapham, contrary to his usual habit, insisted,
almost with tears; and when Harry said, Why, what
is the matter, Clap? can't you go alone? he replied,
No, I cannot; and, turning off, he muttered, I'll go
home, and take the beating, and mam will cry because
I have not got her snuff. Hang it! I wish we were
all dead together!
O, mercy, Clapham! don't talk so. I will go with
you; but what is the reason you cannot go to Smith's
without me?
Ask me no questions, and I'll tell you no lies,
Harry. Not another word was spoken till they got
to Smith's, excepting that once, when they paused for
breath, Clapham said, Harry, you've got a
home
. We
live in hell. The upper part of the shop-door was
of glass. Stop a minute, said Clapham, as Harry
put his hand on the latch; and then, keenly
reconnoitring
the shop, he added, Mr. Smith is not in; you
may open the door, Harry.
The boys drew up to the counter, and stood quietly
there, while the only clerk in the shop served two
women. Clapham hid his jug as well as he could
with his tattered frock coat. In a few moments, the
clerk's eye fell upon them. Harry perceived his
countenance changed at the sight of Clapham; he
perceived
,
too, that Clapham drew nearer to him. The
clerk continued eyeing him askance, while he tied up
the women's parcels; that finished, he approached the
boys. Harry asked for the oil, and Clapham, laying
down a half dollar, asked for a half gallon of rum, and
a quarter of Scotch snuff.
The clerk half smiled as he turned away and went
to the farther extremity of the shop, where a high
writing-desk was placed. The boys now perceived
that the master of the shop was sitting behind it; and
Harry was conscious that this discovery caused
Clapham
slightly to tremble. The clerk spoke so low to
Mr. Smith that they could not hear a word he said;
but, as what passed came out afterwards, there is no
harm in telling it in this place.
Clapham Dunn is in the store, sir, said the clerk.
He is, is he? said Mr. Smith, starting from his
chair; but, on perceiving Harry Davis, he sat down
again. Did he come in with Harry Davis? he
asked.
Yes, sir, and they seemed to be in company. He
wants rum and snuff, of course. He has got the money
in hand.
Well, you may keep dark this time. Draw the
rum for him.
Mr. Smith was partly influenced by the presence
of Harry, partly, we fear, by the opportunity of
selling
the rum. Thank God, the days are passed when
every shop had its barrel of rum, where the poor man
found a ready temptation to part with his small gains;
where such boys as Clapham Dunn began their
apprenticeship
to vice and ruin; and such wretches as
his father found the means of drowning the
consciousness
of misery and guilt; and where decent men, like
Mr. Elam Smith, could quietly sell this poison to body
and soul, pocket the money, reckon up their gains,
and fancy all the sin was at the buyers' door!
In a few minutes more, the boys had done their
business, and left the shop.
Hurried as Harry felt, his curiosity was too strongly
excited to be deferred. It was not idle curiosity; his
best feelings were touched by Clapham's attachment to
him, and dependence on him, and, perceiving he had
the power to serve him, he had the will too. Tell
me, Clapham, he said, what does all this mean?
What? asked Clapham, without raising his eyes.
You know what I mean.
So I do, Harry, he answered, now honestly
turning
up his face, and looking his friend in the eye.
And I will tell you. I declare I will tell you all;
but, hang it, I can't tell it now; it's a long story, and
a bad one.
Well, make a long story short, Clap, and have it
off your mind; you'll have time before we come to the
turn.
But, Harry, you'll despise me, and so will your
mother, and Annie, and little Lucy, and I could not
stand it. You'll never go a fishing with me again;
they'll never speak to me.
Clapham, you don't know them; you don't know
me. I'll stick by a friend through thick and thin.
But, Harry, there is too much thick; you won't
go it.
I'll start fair with you, Clapham. I'll tell you
what I'll go. You must speak just the whole truth
to me, and then I shall be sure of a foundation to
stand on, and, standing on that, with a long pull, and
a strong pull, and a pull both together, we'll get you
out of the mire if you are ever so deep in.
Clapham began, and told his story, at first with a
faltering voice, but, as he went on, with a firmer
tone.
We must go a little farther back, in Clapham's
history, than Clapham's limited time allowed him to
do, or than he could have done.
But Clapham was born in a jail, and, from his
earliest recollection, his parents had been skulking
from one place to another, living on the outskirts of
villages, on the borders of Massachusetts, Connecticut,
or New York, where these three states meet, and afford
a very convenient neighborhood for those who evade
the laws by what is called
dodging the line!
Norman
was a strong, well-built man. He often boasted that
he could travel farther in a day, and fast longer, than
any man he ever knew. He could endure wet, and
heat and cold, without flinching. He would sometimes
live out, roaming about the woods for a week together,
and then come home, and eat, drink, and sleep, for a
week. He had never been taught to read or write.
This was a source of deep mortification to him. But it
was a greater disadvantage than Norman was aware of.
Norman was naturally proud of his size and strength,
and power of endurance, and he was humbled when he
saw a little fellow, whom he said he could throw over
the tallest pine-tree in the woods, really his superior,
and, because he could read and write, able to take a
place, and keep it, among his fellow-men. Norman
had the qualities that distinguish a savage. If he
had been born among the Indians, he might have been
their chief and led them. But knowledge is necessary
to live in society, and knowledge and goodness are
the only true distinctions between man and man, in a
social state. We may have an equality of rights and
privileges; in this favored country we have. Riches
do not make a man more respectable or happier than
his neighbor. Knowledge does. We are forced to
respect those that know more than we do. We feel
that, other things being equal, a superior education
gives the man who has it a power superior to ours.
Norman Dunn felt this, and it galled him. He felt it
the more, because by nature he had a good head, and
he felt it the more bitterly because he had not the
virtues and good feelings that, more than any thing
else, compensate for the want of education. An
industrious
,
honest, kind-hearted man may hold up his
head beside the wisest man and the greatest scholar
in the world. But neither honesty, nor any thing akin
to it, had Norman Dunn. He had just enough sense
of right to feel his degradation, to hate to come in
contact with his fellow-men; so he sulkily shunned
them. Clapham's mother was a poor outcast, half
Dutch, half Yankee. She was lazy, dirty, and shiftless.
She was never very bright, and so between drinking,
snuffing, and Norman's hard usage, the little light she
originally had was nearly put out. One virtue we
must give her credit for;how she came by it nobody
could tell;but Massy Dunn was never known to
take any thing that belonged to another. She ate of
stolen turkeys, fowls, and eggs, without asking a
question
.
She had been found sleeping in sheets pilfered
from the clothes-lines of a neighboring village. She
cut up and made over for Clapham many a garment
which she knew her husband had stolen; but never
was she known to take a penny's worth herself. We
cannot account for this; we only state the fact. It
may explain, in some measure, our friend Clapham's
aversion to following his father's trade.
Father began with me, he said to Harry, when
I was a little shaver not six years old; and before I
was ten, I've robbed many a hen's-nest, and many a
hen-roost for him. Since then, I have done, in
the main, better. I have taken many a beating rather
than do as father bid me, and his hand is heavy, and
cruel hard, Harry. Once he wrenched my shoulder
out of joint, and another time he broke two of my
finger-bones.
Last spring I did chores for Mr. Smith, and he
paid me in notions,a little molasses, and rum for
father, and now and then a codfish, and so on. He
got a great deal out of me, and gave me but little
for it; but there's few that would employ father's boy;
so I had to take what I could get. He trusted me,
and I felt beholden to him for that, and never so
much as took a nut of any kind, or raisin, though
I passed the box twenty times a day. I hated
thieving and lying, I can't tell why, brought up as
I have been; but as true as truth is truth, I did; and
yet  O dear!  the day came that I found I was
just father's own son, and nothing else.
There was a traveller, one evening, stopped at
the shop to buy an umbrella. Mr. Smith was called
off. The man took the umbrella, laid down the
price,  two half dollars,  and left the shop. There
lay the money. Mr. Smith had not seen it. The
traveller had, as I believed, passed on out of town.
There was to be a training, the next day, in
Sheffield
,
and a menagerie was coming there, and for
two days I had heard folks talking over the
advertisement
of it that was up in Mr. Smith's shop, with
pictures of all the animals around it. You have seen
such, Harry. Of all things in the world, I wanted
most to see the animals. Every body was going but
I. There the money lay. If I took it, I could go.
Father would let me, I knew, if I gave him the half
of it. Still I held back. I heard Smith coming, and
I thought he had never paid me half he must have
paid another boy for the work I did, and I  took it.
Yes, Harry, I stole it! Father was not by. It was
not fear of him. Nobody told me to take it. This
time I was a thief. Now you know all.
Not all. Did Mr. Smith find it out?
Yes; he soon found it out. The traveller had
not gone a quarter of a mile when it began to rain,
and he found something the matter with the spring
of the umbrella; so he came back to change it. He
then told Mr. Smith he had put the money on the
counter. Mr. Smith charged me with stealing it, and
he thrust his hand into my pocket, and found it.
Then he called me every thing, and twitted me with
my father and mother, and I got mad, and told him,
if he'd been honest by me, and paid me what I
earned, I should have been honest by him. Then he
turned me out, and told me never to darken his doors
again. Now, Harry, you know all. Clapham was
silent for a moment. Harry said nothing. I knew
it would be so, resumed Clapham, his voice trembling
so that he could scarcely articulate; you know me,
now, for a thief,  a thief on my own hook,  and
you can't be friends with me, any way. Harry
hesitated
one moment, and but one. Yes, one way, I
can, he said; the Scripture way,  `Go, and sin
no more.' Mother often says to us, `God forgives the
penitent, and how dare we not to forgive our
fellow-creatures
?'
I believe you, Clapham; I believe you
have told me the truth, and the whole truth, and I'll
stand by you so long as you'll stand straight.
Clapham turned his eyes, streaming with tears, on
Harry, and his face beamed with an expression of
gratitude and joy which Harry never forgot. Thank
ye, thank ye, Harry! he said, in a subdued voice.
This is more than your saving me from drowning.
I thought I could pay you for that; I never can for
this.
The boys separated. If I am ever good for any
thing, thought Clapham, as he pursued his way alone,
I shall have Harry Davis to thank for it. I might
have been punished, and talked to, and preached to
forever, but it would not have done it. Harry
believes
me; he's friends with me, and that keeps me from
despising myself; and when I am with Harry's folks,
I feel as if I might be something if I could get out
of
his
clutches. No wonder that Clapham, in his
thoughts, shrunk from giving the name of father to
that evil being who was like a cruel fate to him.
Many happy visions rose before him as he, that
evening, pursued his solitary way. The Davises were
the central light of all his castles in the air. His
path lay along the margin of Rhigi's brook; it
glittered
and sparkled in the moonlight. The leaves
scarcely stirred as the soft, night breezes stole over
them. Clapham stopped for a moment, conscious of a
new feeling, and gazed around him with sensations he
had never before experienced. Is there not something
in the soul that answers, like an echo, to the music
of nature?
'Tis softer than the west wind's sigh;
'Tis wilder than th' unmeasured notes
Of that strange lyre, whose strings
The genii of the breezes sweep.
This poor mountain-boy felt this something within
him vibrating to the voice of nature. He looked up
to the vast, bright firmament, and a feeling of awe,
an indefinite sense of God's presence, without fear or
dread, stole over him. Perhaps it was that Harry's
kindness to him had inspired a sense of God's infinite
goodness and love, of which it was the true, though
faint image; however that might be, there was a new
feeling. He turned from the brook into the wood,
where the trees were so thick that scarcely a ray of
light penetrated to the path he followed. Suddenly
he emerged into an open space, where the broad,
yellow
moon sent in her light, intercepted only by the
shadow of the tall trees, that, like a wall, enclosed it.
It was a startling contrast to the darkness from which
he had come. Impulsively, and for the first time in
his life, he fell upon his knees. Every feeling in his
bosom was a true prayer. Few, untaught, and simple,
were the words he uttered. There was a struggling
cry for pardon for the past, and strength for the future,
and a burst of gratitude for his friend.
It was sincere desire  true prayer. Of such it
is that God says, I will hear ye when ye cry unto
me.
A half hour after, Clapham entered his father's hut
with an indescribable loathing. It was filled with
smoke, made visible by a blaze, over which Massy was
frying a mess of fish, pork, and onions, the fumes of
which, mingling with the smoke of Norman's pipe,
settled about the beams and rafters. A cross-pole was
garnished with broken kettles, baskets, gourds, dried
herbs, strings of apples, and strips of drying pumpkin.
A blackened and greasy table, with a molasses jug,
and broken brown ware, was set out for supper.
Sure it was all a grievous, odious scene,
Where all was dismal, melancholy, mean;
unwholesome and unclean.
Norman was half reclining in one corner, on a
filthy pile, called a bed. He growled at Clapham,
as he entered, for his long delay; and, seizing the
jug, he took a heavy draught from it.
Massy received her portion rather more parentally,
and thanked Clapham as she untied her parcel of
snuff. The knot was difficult, and Massy's fingers
none of the steadiest. Norman called out to her, with
a curse, that her fat was on fire, and she'd burn them
all up alive. In turning hastily to extinguish the
flame, she spilt her snuff into the mess. Norman,
enraged at the prospect of losing his supper, sprang
off his lair, and began beating her. Massy screamed.
A tired hound, that had been sleeping at full length
before the fire, joined, growling, in the fray.
It was such scenes as these, that had made poor
Clapham say to Harry Davis, You have a home; we
live in a hell! No, not quite a hell, while there was
there one spirit capable of love and hope.
8
CHAPTER V.
A VOICE FROM THE SPIRIT LAND.
For Death his sacred seal has set
On bright and by-gone hours;
And they we mourn are with us yet,
Are more than ever ours.
Harry Davis
took his homeward way with a
light heart, and entered his mother's door with
a joyous spring. The tea-table was neatly prepared
for that pleasantest of New England rustic meals,
the tea.
There were few industrious and sober people in
the county poorer than the Davises. But poverty, in
its received sense, is not a word applicable to any
such American family. What would a starving
house-wife
in an Irish shanty, or one of the poor peasant
women of the continent of Europe, say to Mrs. Davis's
tea-table, with its white cloth, its whole and fitting
earthen ware, its bright knives, its tea, sugar, and
cream
, its white bread, blackberry pie, and fried fish?
This looks comfortable, said Davis, obeying the
pleasant announcement, Tea is ready! and turning
his chair around from his desk and his inventions.
I have done a good job at head-work to-day, he
added, and have had nothing to eat but a slice of
bread and some knick-knacks the neighbors sent in for
Lucy. Mother is so notional, she won't let the poor
child touch them.
Ah! but, father, interposed Annie, the doctor
said, if there were more people would do as mother
does, and give to the well the custards, and cake,
and sweetmeats, the neighbors send in for the sick,
they would save a great many patients from his
hands.
Tut! nonsense, Annie  as if sickness did not
come of itself, or when the Lord chooses to send it.
How came Lucy sick? I should like to know that.
Your mother keeps her on bread and milk, and
potatoes
and meat not above once a day. How came she
brought up with a fever?
The doctor says, sir, it was brought on by the
unripe plums you gave her at Deacon Carr's. When
fevers are about, doctor says they will set in upon
any bad derangement of the stomach.
O, that's nothing but a new-fangled notion.
Children eat every thing. I have eaten just what I
fancied, and all the tasty things I could get all my
life, and I never had a fever. Davis's lank, sallow
cheeks were not the best evidence of his wise mode
of living; and,  poor man!  as little Lucy became
worse from day to day, he silently resolved never
again to give his children unripe fruit. Alas! the
wisdom only learned by failure comes too late. We
have seldom the same experience twice.
Mrs. Davis did not reproach her husband. She
was not of those who find relief in imputing blame.
She hoped, from day to day, that little Lucy would be
better. She took the whole care of the child, with the
aid of Harry and Annie. She would not follow the
common rural custom of letting in upon the patient
all the kind neighbors who call to express sympathy and
offer aid. She had often observed sick children either
shrinking from the touch of strangers, or too much
excited by them. Contrary to all usage in our country
parts, she declined
watchers;
and, when urged by her
kind friends to accept their services, she said, No;
I could not sleep soundly while my child is so ill, if
she had the best watcher in Salisbury. I sleep beside
her, and wake at her least movement. It is a small
tax upon me, but it is a hard strain upon another. I
have always been against having watchers when you
can help it, and I wish to be consistent.
Consistent good Mrs. Davis was in making all the
detail of her life a manifestation of her theory of her duty.
Davis never watched. He was a remarkable heavy
sleeper, he said; watching never agreed with him!
There was one visitor only excepted from the
general
prohibition  the poor, outcast Clapham. He was
expected daily, watched for by Lucy, and welcomed
with her sweetest smile and out-stretched hand. The
doctor prescribed feverbush tea, and Clapham, of
course, brought the feverbush from the mountain.
The next day, winter-greens were recommended, and
each day some rural febrifuge, which Clapham's
woodcraft
enabled him to supply. With the herbs,
Clapham
brought strings of bright berries, which Annie
strung, and Lucy amused herself, at her best intervals,
with wreathing around her white arms. The flowers
were few and faded on the hill side and by the brook,
but the lovely fringed gentian was still in perfection,
and Clapham had always a handful of these, which he
called Lucy's flowers.
I do wish, Clapham, said Lucy, that you and
Harry would carry me along the brook, and lay me
down on the soft grass, where the cool wind blows,
and where I could drink all the time. Here it's so
hot! Feel, how my hand burns! You will carry me
there when I am a little better, won't you, boys?
Both boys eagerly promised; but alas! the cruel
disease
was making rapid progress.
The next day, when, as usual, Clapham came in late
in the afternoon, the family, with the exception of
Davis, who had gone of an errand to the village, were
in the little bed-room. A change had taken place.
Lucy was dying. Her distress was over. Nature had
given up the struggle, and her young life was ebbing
away. Mrs. Davis heard Clapham lift the latch of the
outer door, and beckoned to him to come softly in.
He did so, and knelt at the foot of the trundle-bed.
Lucy was supported by pillows. The hue of life was
paled on her cheek. Her mother's, lying beside it,
was of the deepest crimson. Her mother was on her
knees, and so were Harry and Lucy, each holding one
of those little hands that seemed to grasp every fibre
of their hearts. My children, pray with me, said
the mother; and in a low, but perfectly distinct voice,
she said, Our Father, who art in heaven. Hallowed
be thy name. Thy kingdom come.
Thy will be
done
She stopped. There needed no more.
These all-comprehending words expressed the
unbounded
prayer of her heart; her faith that God
was her Father, the Father of her children; her
desire
to utter his name with awe and love; her
complete
resignation of her own hopes and purposes for
her child; and the present indulgence of her affections.
As she concluded, Harry said to her, in a low,
trembling
voice, Mother, it never before seemed to me
hard to pray that prayer!
Is it hard, now, my son?
Hard? Yes, mother.
It should not be, my children. We give up
little Lucy to wiser, greater love than ours. The
kingdom of heaven is coming to her. No more pain
for her
Lucy at this moment opened her eyes, and
consciousness
,
without pain, revived. There was even a
slight movement of her lips to kiss her mother, and, as
her mother pressed hers to her, she faintly, but
perceptibly
smiled, and with her finger made a beckoning
motion to Clapham to come nearer. He rose and
knelt by Annie. Lucy spread out her little hand so
as to embrace both theirs. At this moment, the
setting
sun shone out from a cloud, and its rays fell,
like a halo, around little Lucy's fair hair.
Pretty moon! she said. The mists of death
were gathering over her sight, and the sun was no
longer bright to her eye.
They all felt as if they were near the visible
presence of God. The curtain that hides the other
world was slowly rising, and they felt the beautiful
reality of the goodness and love to which the precious
child was going. It was not death. It was life
immortal life. A solemn but not painful feeling
pervaded
them. No one stirred or moved, till Lucy
looked from one to the other, and then rested her eye
on Harry, and he seemed unconsciously to answer to
the glance in saying, How I love you, darling! She
replied, slowly, feebly, but with perfect distinctness, so
that each heard her, Weallloveone another!
These were the last words she spoke  words that
bound them in a sacred band, to be cruelly assailed,
but never broken.
From this time, her breathing became fainter and
fainter. There was no struggle, and when the
twilight
had faded away, and the stars began to appear,
she sank to her rest as quietly as if it had been to
her night's sleep.
The spell of solemn silence was first broken by
the sweet voice of the mother.
She is gone! my children, she said  gone
to Him who said, `Suffer little children to come
unto me, and forbid them not, for of such is the
9
kingdom of heaven  gone from our sight, but not
from us.
Not from us, mother? asked Annie, in a
perplexed
tone of voice.
No, my children, I hope not. I believe not.
Little Lucy is an angel now, and I think she will
love to be near us; and nothing but our evil-doing
can separate us.
This was a new thought to the children. It
seemed to them to take away the sting of separation,
and, at the same time, to give them an acute sense of
responsibility, an intense desire to be pure, so that that
purified and loved spirit might dwell with them. Mrs.
Davis's calmness, her faith, and her gentle submission,
had converted this chamber of death into the vestibule
of heaven. Death did not appear to these children the
king of terrors, but a messenger of love who had come
to take their dear little companion to happiness and
immortality, and to inspire them with a faith and hope
that taught them how to value and how to use life.
To Clapham it seemed a vision; a revelation; and
after all the necessary offices had been performed,
after the kind neighbors had come and gone, after
the good village minister had made his prayer with
the family, and after he had seen the form of little
Lucy laid out in its white robes, her head encircled
with a wreath of the fringed gentians he had brought
that afternoon for her, and on her bosom sweet,
half-open
rose-buds old Mrs. Allen had sent in from her
monthly rose,  after this, he took his way homeward.
Slowly, thoughtfully he went. Suddenly a loathing
revulsion from his own most loathsome dwelling came
over him; he turned back, retraced his way, and lay
down on the ground on the outside of that little
bed-room
window. There he waked and slept alternately,
and had visions of his little friend now by the brook
on Rhigi, and now an angel amidst beauty and glory
that never before had dawned on his mind. Thoughts
of his real condition, of his dreadful home, came
like demons among these angel visitations. The poor
boy was struggling in the mysteries of life. Still
there was something that whispered hope and peace
something that breathed into his soul the feeling
expressed in the following beautiful stanza:
Brother, the angels say,
Peace to thy heart!
We, too, O brother,
Have been as thou art
Hope-lifted, doubt-depressed,
Seeing in part,
Tried, troubled, tempted,
Sustained, as thou art.
CHAPTER VI.
A GATHERING STORM.
'Twas past the dead of night, when every sound
That nature mingles might be heard around;
But none from man.
Clapham
did not return to his mountain-home till
late in the afternoon of the next day. His
mind was full of the holy scenes he had witnessed.
He had seen death for the first time; and had seen
it, most happily for himself, in the home of the
Christian
,
where death was received as God's messenger,
sent to take the most loved being in the household
to a happier home, to a higher school, to the
instruction
and guidance of Him whose love and
wisdom
are infinite. He had seen little Lucy, the sweet
nestler in every heart, given up with calm submission.
The world seemed changed to Clapham; but O,
with what weight it fell back upon him as his own
home came in view! His father was sitting on the
door-step smoking his pipe. He saw, through the
open door, that his mother was dozing on the bed.
Ain't you a pretty chap? said Norman, surlily.
Where have you been browsing all night, and to
this time of day?
At Mr. Davis's, replied Clapham, quietly.
That's one lie; now tell another. What have
you been about there?
I have been seeing little Lucy die.
Do tell? said Norman, and a human feeling
stirred in his bosom. He knocked the ashes out of
his pipe, and put in fresh tobacco, saying, meanwhile,
She was the likeliest-looking young one ever born
in Salisbury. Sich as she always die.
The last words struck on Massy's ear, and waked
her from her dose.
Who is dead now? she asked, not more than
half awake.
Not you, mam; but you might as well be,
replied her brutal lord, as lying there, when I told
you I was waiting for a patch on my coat. Up
with you, or I'll bang you. It's Davis's girl that's
dead, and our Clap is chief mourner.
You have not got no feelings, Norman, said the
gentler helpmeet; you're 'tween man and brute
worse than neither. When is the funeral, Clapham?
There is to be no funeral here, replied
Clapham
.
Mrs. Davis wished to lay little Lucy with
her people, and she has taken her down to the
Canaan burying-ground.
Who went in the procession? asked Massy,
who, in common with persons of her caste, was curious
about the minuti of funerals.
They had no procession. Mr. Davis wanted to
have the people collect and go with them, but Mrs.
Davis was very much set on having it quiet; and so
Sheriff Parley offered them his wagon and horses, and
they went, at two o'clock, down to her uncle's, which
is near to the burying-ground.
Did they take the corpse, and Harry, and Annie,
all in one wagon?
No; only little Lucy. Annie had one of her
sick-headaches, and Harry staid at home with her.
Norman seemed very attentive, though as yet he
had asked no question. He now, with affected
carelessness
,
demanded how long they were to be gone.
Till to-morrow morning, Clapham replied.
Good! muttered Norman; and then, his
manner
suddenly changing, he eagerly asked, Are you
sure of that, Clap?
Yes, I am. I went with Harry to get the team;
and his mother bade us tell Sheriff Parley she should
return to-morrow morning; and she never broke her
word in her life.
I hope this won't be a first time, said Norman.
What time will they be home?
I don't know, replied Clapham, rather impatient
at idle questions, (as he deemed them,) which grated
on his feelings; and he turned to go away, not
caring whither, when his father seized him by the
arm, and jerked him back. Stand still, can't you?
said he; you are as slippery as an eel. He
hemmed two or three times, then cleared his throat,
and added, She died in the bed-room, did not
she?
Yes; little Lucy and Annie always slept there
in the trundle-bed.
I should not think them young folks would like
sleeping in the room where the corpse was, said
Norman, looking, not at Clapham, but up at the trees.
He paused for a moment, but eliciting no reply from
Clapham, he added, I say, Clap, what are you so
dumb for? Where are they going to sleep?
Clapham was incapable of being irritated, and he
replied, quietly, I don't think they have any fear to
sleep where little Lucy lay, with flowers all around
her, looking like an angel.
Well, then, the gal is going to sleep in the
bed-room, is she?
Had not Clapham's mind been completely
preoccupied
,
he might have suspected some sinister
motive in all this questioning; but he did not, and
he replied with the particularity his father wished.
The bed-room window was open in the morning,
while it rained, and the room got damp, and Harry's
mother told him to move the trundle-bed into the
kitchen
,
and to bring down his bed and sleep by Annie.
Will he do it?
I rather guess so, replied Clapham, with a
smile; the time has not come yet that Harry has
disappointed his mother.
I wish all young youth were like him,
murmured
Massy.
And all old mams, like you, said Norman; that
would be a nice fit! But, I say, Clap, you are sure
they sleep in the kitchen?
I am sure I helped Harry fix the beds there,
before I came away.
You're a wise lad, Clap, and no mistake, said
Norman, with a chuckling laugh in his throat, which
his son well knew was an expression of evil omen;
and he involuntarily fixed his eyes inquiringly on the
bad man. None of your impudence, you rascal!
he exclaimed, shaking his fist at Clapham.
Impudence! I did not speak.
Your eyes did, though.
And what did they say? asked Clapham, with
a dim smile.
You're a fool, boy, said his father; and then,
suddenly checking his irascible and irritated temper,
he added, quietly, I am the wrong side of the fence
this time. I am not mad with you, Clap. Mam has
worn me out, waiting here all day for my coat.
Come, old woman, ain't that hole sewed up yet?
Massy tossed the coat to him, saying, You are
the
on
reasonablest man that ever a poor woman-critter
was slave to; my whole life goes waiting on you.
That is what you are made for, my dear. You,
and all the rest of the women-folks, are made to
serve their masters; hey, Clap?
Clapham thought of his dear friend Harry's mother,
and he thought some women-folks were quite equal
to their masters. Norman put on his coat, re-filled
his pipe, and walked off. After going a few paces,
he turned suddenly around, and said, in a voice of
unwonted kindness, I say, Clap, I started a sight
of partridges up there by the pond, and if you want
to look after them, you may take my gun and some
powder and shot; you'll find it there under my
pillow
.
But mind and come home this evening. I
shall be home to supper, and do you be here; and,
remember, Clap, you must do me a good turn when
I want it. Promise me. You're a boy of your word,
I'll say that for you. I never catched you in a lie
yet. Come, promise.
Why, father, I would do a'most any thing in
the world for you, if you would speak as you do
now.
That's you, Clap. You promise?
Yes.
It's a bargain, then; and mind you're home to
supper.
What has got into father? said Clapham, as
Norman, entering the wood-path, disappeared.
It's no good, said Massy. Sunshine or
thunder-claps
,
it's all the same. He's been clean
possessed
,
ever since yesterday morning, about a rifle on
sale down to the Furnace. He says he never saw
the like on't. He was talking about it in his sleep
last night, though his tongue was so thick I could
not understand more than one word in ten. He'd
clean drained the jug. He would not give me even
one spoonful, to take the bad taste out of my mouth.
No, I believeI do believe, Clap, and if it were
my last, dying word I would say so,  I do believe
he'd sell his soul for rum and a rifle. And now,
Clappy, she continued, in a whining tone, if you'll
only take this fourpence, and get me a little
something
down below.
Clapham looked earnestly in his mother's face,
and shook his head. I cannot, mother  I cannot,
he said; my hands have been on that good child,
God's child now,  and I cannot touch that hateful
jug, or any thing that holds that dreadful stuff. I
have had such thoughts these last two days! I have
been with good folks, and I want to be fit to live
among them. Don't ask me, mother. There was a
quietness in Clapham's tone, a dignity and deep
resolve
in his manner, that gave to the boy the power
of manhood. Massy was, for the moment, awed;
and, without renewing her request, she permitted him
to take the gun, &c., and go up the mountain-path.
Her eye followed him till he was out of sight.
She then sat down, whimpering, on the door-step
Well, she said, talking to herself, if this don't
beat me! Norman is too bad to live with, and Clappy
is too good. It does give feelings, though, to hear
my child talk that way  Norman Dunn's boy too!
Where did he larn it? He has never been justly
one of us; but now he's clean changed. I felt as
underval'ed as if a judge was talking to me. Well,
well, it did go to the spot. He wants to do right;
he wants to be fit to live with good folks; he must
not stay with us then! The poor woman began to
cry heartily. She was a mother; and ignorant,
abject
,
drunken, drabbish, as she was, sunken to the
very lowest depths of sordid wretchedness, there was
yet that in her heart which answered to her boy's
heaven-born desire for something better than his evil
home. God's image is never wholly effaced from the
soul. No man or woman is irreclaimable.
Twilight was breathing its sweet peace over the
earth; the last lingering birds were singing their
good-night notes; and every woodland thing was
giving out its odor, when Clapham, with a string of
game over his shoulder, came down the Rhigi road.
This game was converted into a savory stew, and
awaiting Norman, when, late in the evening, he
came home from the Furnace. He was silent and
sulky, and had evidently been drinking. There was,
in those days, always more or less drinking going
on among the loungers about the Furnace Tavern.
The supper was such as sportsmen most relish, but
no word of praise did he bestow on it; and, when
Clapham fished up from the mess the quarters of a
large grey squirrel, and told him of the very spot
he found him, and how he treed him, Norman gave
no sign that he heard him. You don't seem sharp
set, said his wife; I guess you've been feeding at
the Furance.
Feeding on air, then, for I have not eaten a
mouthful since breakfast.
Then dad has had a plenty of something else,
I guess, said Massy to Clapham, with a wink  what
takes the wire-edge off from hunger.
Guess again, mam. I have not drank the value
of half a pint to-day.
Well, then, I guess you had bad luck about the
rifle.
That's another of your eternal guesses. I've
bargained for it, and am to have possession when
I've paid ten dollars.
You pay ten dollars! That will be when the
sky falls, and we catch larks. Hey, Clappy?
Clapham made no reply. He had a more than
usual dread of a storm, and, having satisfied his
hunger, he lay down on his forlorn little bed, and
was soon in a sleep that many a king would have
envied. Does the hearty boy, or the temperate
laboring
man, who lies down to sweet sleep, know
what a blessing is this chief nourisher at life's
feast? Surely labor is no evil, plain fare is none,
if they bring with them a good which no money and
no greatness can buy.
Norman did not sleep. He did not close his eyes.
Poverty must have the attending angel, a good
conscience
;
it cannot alone bring sleep. Clapham was
dreaming now of little Lucy. He saw again the
plaited ruffle of her night dress, around her white
bosom, the rose-buds lying on it, and a smile on
those pretty lips. Then he was with Harry, on
Rhigi, dashing through the brook, or watching the
game. Suddenly, it seemed to him that Harry grasped
his arm. He awoke. It was not Harry, but his father,
who said, Hush, Clap; it's me. What are you so
scared for? Get up. Don't wake mam; let her snore
her soul out.
Why! what is the matter, father?
Nothing. Do as I bid you. Dress you, put your
cap on, and come out with me.
It is not yet day.
No, nor won't be this three hours; mind me,
and be still about it.
Clapham augured no good from this movement
of his father. He knew too well the object of his
night-prowlings, and he had resolved never again to be
the companion of them. I am sleepy, father, he
said; I was awake all last night, and I don't want
to get up.
Remember our bargain, replied his father.
Remember
your promise. You're bound. Come, come
along.
Clapham rose, dressed, and followed Norman.
10
After going a little way towards the village, he
made a dead stop, and said, Now, father, I'll tell
you what it is. I have been thinking a good deal
lately, and I have determined to make an end of
this night-work. I'm tired on it. I hate it. His
father seized him by the collar; but Clapham,
undaunted
,
added, I won't do it.
Norman stood for a moment, glaring fiercely at
the boy, his hand still grasping his collar. Clapham
did not flinch; he stood as firmly braced as if he were
a match for the tall, strong man; and the spirit of
the boy, even in that slight and powerless frame,
awed, for a moment, the bad man.
The moon was in her second quarter. There
was a strong south wind, and clouds scudding over
the sky. At this moment they rolled off the moon,
and it shone brightly in Clapham's face. It was
deadly pale, but calm and determined.
Norman hesitated; his eye fell. A spirit good and
strong, a spirit of truth, was looking out of the boy's
clear eye.
Norman's tone changed. Now, Clap, he said,
what for are you making this fuss? I have only told
you to come along with me. One person may lead a
horse to the water, you know, but it takes two to make
him drink. Keep quiet, can't you? till I ask you to
do something more than walk down to the Furnace
with me. I'm after that rifle, and if I ain't down
there by daylight, I lose it. There's one of them
New York sparks that's up here a gunning. He's
out afore the sun is up. Bill Haskins says he told
him about the rifle, and he said he'd go down and see
it this morning early, and I mean to be ahead on him.
O, if that's all, father! said Clapham,
cheerfully
.
You've come to your milk, have you? Make
tracks a little faster, then, will you? On they
went. The path they were in passed Davis's house
at the distance of a few rods. When at the point
nearest to it, another path diverged from it, and led
directly to Davis's door-step. Into this path Norman
turned, and walked on rapidly ahead of Clapham. They
were within a few yards of the house when
Clapham's
heart sank. He caught his father by the sleeve,
and, said Father, what are you coming here for?
Hush! said Norman, in a low tone, that went
like a sharp whistle through the boy's head. And
he half carried, half dragged Clapham along, till they
stood at the only window of that consecrated
bed-room
,
at the very spot where Clapham had lain on the
ground the preceding night. It was a small sliding
window, and not secured by any fastening whatever.
In there, in a bureau drawer,  you know just where,
whispered Norman, is a purse. I must have it, and
you must get it. No holding back now. He softly
drew the window open. Come, snake in, and done
with it.
I'll die first, answered Clapham.
No! muttered Norman, with a horrid oath.
You do it, or Harry Davis dies. He drew a knife
from beneath his coat, and, Clapham still immovable,
he added, I swear I'll kill him with this knife if
you don't do as I bid you.
Father! father! said Clapham, laying both hands
on his father's arm.
I swear I will, repeated Norman. I will, if
the business is not done as I bid you. If you speak
a loud word, or make a breath of noise to wake him, I
will break open the door, and do it for him and
the gal too. I had as lief as stick a pig, and then
burn the house down; and who's the wiser? I have
determined on't aforehand. Will you mind me now?
Clapham knew his father's savage temper, his iron
will. He fully believed he would do as he
threatened
;
and the image of Harry and of Annie
murdered
murdered by his father's hand  was before
him. He listened  he heard no human sound. He
looked around on every side; there was no human
creature stirring  no help. Will you do it? Speak,
said Norman, pointing his knife to the door.
Clapham, forced to the decision, said, I will;
and he mounted to the window. The opening was
but just large enough to admit his body. As he
slid down into the room, his foot touched a
footstool
that had been left standing there, and, turning
over on the bare floor, it made a loud noise.
Norman's
head was at the open window. Damnation!
he muttered in a suppressed voice.
I did not mean it, whispered Clapham, who was
now fully persuaded that his friends' safety depended
on his executing well his father's purpose. He heard
a movement in the next room. The sleepers were
awakened. He stood stock still, and heard Annie
ask, What is that noise, Harry?
I don't know. Shall I jump up and see?
replied
Harry.
Shall I give him notice, or what shall I do?
thought Clapham, when Annie again spoke, saying,
No, don't get up, Harry. It's no matter. It's only
Tom.
Yes. It must be. The window was open when
little Lucy was lying there, and we all forgot to shut
it; so puss has jumped in.
You think it certainly is the cat, Harry?
Yes, Annie; but, cat or no cat, there's nothing to
hurt us; so go to sleep, Annie.
I will; but when I am asleep, don't you get up
and leave me, Harry. She spoke drowsily; and he
answered, Never fear. I shall be asleep myself.
Cold chills were running over Clapham. Those
dear, familiar voices; the danger so near to them;
the blessed memory of that morning when he had
stood on that very spot, and looked on little Lucy for
the last time,  altogether paralyzed him, till his father,
in a voice, though not above a whisper, expressing
rage and impatience, said,
Do it
. Clapham drew
open the drawer in which he knew all Mrs. Davis's
little store was deposited, took out the purse, threw
it to his father, reclosed the drawer, and withdrew
through the window. Harry was listening. The
partition
was so thin that he could scarcely persuade
himself that he did not hear a drawer open and shut.
He thought of his mother's money, and was
impulsively
springing up, when Annie, aroused too, caught
him by the arm, saying, Stop a minute. Before the
minute passed, all was again quiet, and Norman and
Clapham were out of hearing, and, in a little while,
Harry and Annie were again asleep. Norman silently
strode homeward. Clapham followed, his heart as
heavy as lead. When they were within a few paces
of their own door, Norman stopped, and turning short
round upon Clapham, he said, I'll tell you the case,
Clap. You've got some new notions into you, and it's
all nonsense. There's nobody cares for us, and why
should we care for any body? I ask no favors, and
I'll grant none. As we brew, so we must bake.
As we've begun, so we must end. Nobody is friends
to us, and we'll be friends to nobody.
I have friends, said Clapham, and I'll be true
to them; and if I live another day
Hush up, square! interrupted his father, and
hear me out; as sure as you blab, I'll be the death
of you.
I don't care a straw, answered Clapham; I
wish I were dead, and under ground, now; and, if
killing me is the worst you can do, you are
welcome
.
Now, hear me. I swear,  not as you do,
but as the folks swear in court,  I swear, and hold
up my hand to it, so help me God, come what come
may, I'll tell the truth.
You will, will you? answered Norman, his voice
trembling with rage; then we'll see which will be
master. I'll swear  and hold my hand up to it, too
if you let on, by word or sign, of what we've
done to-night, I'll burn down Davis's house in the
dead of night, and all the folks in it; I will, so
help me . The name he would have impiously
invoked stuck in his throat. Are you afeard of
me now? he added.
I am! I am! replied Clapham; and the poor
boy threw himself on the ground, and cried with a
sense of utter helplessness and misery. Norman
seized him, raised him to his feet, and dragged him
onward to their hut. Be still, he said; shut up;
go to bed, and go to sleep. If you mind me, all
is right. Clapham stumbled in, and on to his straw
bed; and, burying his face in it, he sobbed till,
nature overpowered, he fell asleep.
Norman did not sleep. His mind was busy with
plans to evade justice and secure his ill-gotten gains.
After revolving various plans, he determined that he
would be early at the furnace, buy the rifle, get
over the line, and go roaming. Bad as he was,
Clapham had made some impression on him; and
he was willing, if he could provide for his own
safety, to bear the imputation of the theft and save
Clapham. As his passion subsided, there rose a
11
sense of his boy's courage and fidelity. I never
feared nothing, thought Norman; but, as he stood
there with his hand raised, he made my heart beat.
All the witnesses on earth, swearing agin me in
court, could not do it.
CHAPTER VII.
A TOTAL ECLIPSE.
The sheriff and the watch are at the door. They are come to
search the house. Shall I let them in?
Mrs. Davis
and her husband returned earlier
than they were expected on the following
morning. Deputy Sheriff Parley, from whom she had
hired her conveyance, had told her that he was
obliged to take some debtors to the county jail on
that day, and he should be glad to have his wagon
as early as she could return. Mrs. Davis was glad
to have this plea with her husband, who was
habitually
a late sleeper. It was natural to the
Davises
,
he said. She was saddened by her recent
loss, and desired to relieve her mind by plunging
into her usual occupations. She roused Davis before
the day dawned; and, just as the sun arose, she
stopped at the sheriff's gate to inform him of her
return. He was a bustling, prompt man; and, being
ready to proceed to Canaan, whence he was to take
his prisoners, he jumped into the wagon, intending to
take possession of it at Davis's door. When they
arrived there, Mrs. Davis asked the sheriff to wait
till she could bring the money from the house to
pay him for the team. The children were still
asleep. She sighed heavily as she passed them,
thinking that she should never again see little Lucy
lying by them, and proceeded into the bed-room.
I am sure I did not leave that window wide open,
thought the careful mother, as the damp, morning
breeze blew on her. She opened the drawer, and was
struck with its confusion. The things were
upturned
,
and the purse not in its place. She uttered
an exclamation, and involuntarily called to Harry.
He sprang out of bed, wrapped a sheet round him,
and saying, Dear, dear mother, are you here? he
was in a moment at her side. Annie followed.
The loss was communicated, and Harry at once
recurred
to what had happened in the night, and
related it. There had been a thief in the house:
who could it be? Mrs. Davis called in the sheriff,
and he, with official coolness, began an investigation.
He looked outside the window for tracks. The ground
was hard trodden there, and showed none. The
window, he remarked, would scarcely admit a
man; but, on measuring it, he concluded that one
narrow in the shoulders might get in. But who
could it be? No depredation of the sort had ever
been committed in Salisbury; and, though there was
scarcely a house in the place with a fastening on
its doors, none had been entered. There had been
pilfering of meat, hung in outer sheds and
hen-roosts
,
but they had all been traced to Norman Dunn,
and he could not get half his breadth into that
window
.
To be sure, added the sheriff, there's his
boy, Clapham.
Clapham! interrupted Harry, it is not he!
No, no! indeed it is not! echoed Mrs. Davis
and Annie.
I do not believe it is, said Sheriff Parley;
the boy is a changed boy, regular and quiet.
While he spoke, the sheriff was shuffling his foot
backward and forward: in doing so, he hit it against
the overset footstool, and removed it. Harry
naturally
cast his eye down, and just peeping from beneath
it, he saw a pocket-handkerchief. He knew it instantly.
It was the one Annie had given to Clapham. The
blood rushed up to the very roots of his hair. His
first impulse was to snatch and conceal it; but, before
he could make a movement, or think another thought,
the sheriff, who had seen his change of color, and
followed the direction of his eye, caught it up, and
shook it out, saying, What is this? Here's a clew,
may be. `C. D.'  Clapham Dunn! The secret is
out!
Mrs. Davis sat down, trembling. Annie turned
pale, and Davis said, Yes; out, fully!
O, no, father! said Harry; you don't know
Clapham. You mistake, sir, addressing the sheriff.
Mother, Clapham was here all those two last days:
could he not have dropped it then?
Mrs. Davis made no reply. A conviction that
Clapham was the guilty one, was stealing over her,
and her heart sank within her. She recalled his
standing by her when she took out the money to
send for little Lucy's medicine. She said nothing till
the sheriff asked, What was the situation of the room
when you left it, Mrs. Davis? Was it cleared up?
Yes.
Did you put it to rights yourself? Don't be
scared. You are not on oath.
That makes no difference. I must speak the
truth, though the poor boy should seem condemned by
it. I did put the room in order before I went away.
Might not the footstool have been turned over,
and you not seen it?
Yes, mother, I know it might! exclaimed Harry.
Mrs. Davis shook her head. Do you remember any
thing distinctly about the footstool? pursued the
sheriff.
Yes. It's little Lucy's. She always sat on it;
and for fear something might happen to it, I came
back after I went out to get into the wagon, and brought
it in from the kitchen, and placed it under the
window
,
where the table had stood with the coffin on it.
There is no need of further investigation, sheriff,
interposed Davis. I don't wish my family to shield
that bad boy any more. I always mistrusted him.
You know, mother, I never approved of Harry keeping
company with him. What's the next step, sheriff?
The sheriff, after a moment's consideration, said that
he thought they had best jump into the wagon at once,
and proceed to Norman's; and Davis suggested that,
as they must call at Squire Baner's on their way, for
a search warrant, it would be best to get his boys
to go up with them, as Norman was an ugly
customer
when he was mad. The prudent sheriff assented
to the propriety of this renforcement, and they were
proceeding, when Harry said, You can take but one
of the Baners, for I must go. I must hear the truth
from Clapham.
The truth from Clapham! echoed Davis; that's
a good one!the truth from the thief.
I must go, sir, replied Harry, with a calm
decision
,
that rather staggered his father; and he said,
winking at the same time slyly at Sheriff Parley,
Well, it's the sheriff's wagon. What say you, Mr.
Sheriff?
I say that I can't take a supernumerary. I shall
take but one of the Baners. We must drive full
speed, or the bird will have flown. Don't put your
finger in the pie, Harry Davis. It's a bad mess,
depend on't.
Harry begged, he entreated; but the sheriff was
resolute, and drove away at full speed. He was much
edified on the way by sundry remarks of Davis on the
impossibility of women taking care of money after
they had earned it, and on the obvious advantage of
their at once paying it over to their husbands!
We return to Norman's hut. He had awakened
from a short sleep, had watched in the day, and was
awaiting its advance impatiently. He feared to excite
suspicion if he should appear at the Furnace at an
unusually early hour, and he counted the minutes till
he could go, secure the rifle, and be off. Then he
cared not how much he was suspected or accused;
but, above all things, he dreaded confinement in a jail,
It was as intolerable to him as to a Pawnee.
Clapham was sleeping profoundly. It will be
remembered
that the night preceding the theft he had lain
outside little Lucy's window. It had been one long
vigil, filled with new thoughts, pure affections, and
right purposes. How different had been the last night!
Sad, but not to the poor boy guilty. He had resolved
that as soon as morning came, and his father had gone,
he would go to the Davises, and make a full disclosure,
come what come would; and, feeling relieved by this
determination, he sank into a deep sleep.
The sheriff was obliged to leave the wagon a quarter
of a mile from Norman Dunn's, and ascend the
mountain
with his companions by a foot-path. Norman
heard their footsteps, and was instantly aware of the
threatened danger. He had but one moment to
consider
,
and he obeyed the first suggestion of his evil
mind. He took the purse from under his pillow, and
thrust it through a hole of Clapham's ticking, amidst
the straw, and returned to his bed, where he affected
to be awakened from sound sleep. Clapham was
awakened too. He recognized the sheriff. He started
at the sight of Davis. He well knew the quest they
must be on, and he drew the ragged coverlet over
his head, and lay still.
Norman, having demanded, with the air of lord of
the castle, their errand, and told them, with an uncon
cerned tone, to proceed, kept up an under-current
of muttering. He thought people that did not meddle
nor make in the village might be left in quiet on
the mountain. Davis's money! Davis's was the last
house in the county he should go to to look for money.
Where did Tom Davis get it? Selling Self-churning
Churns! or Independent Washing Machines! He had
not been to Tom Davis's this ten years.
But your boy has, said Davis, and we'll trouble
him to get up; hoping to quiet the slurs which he felt
diverted his companions.
Come, my lad, he said, shaking Clapham; up
with you. You are smart enough when you are
crawling into people's windows, at the dead of night.
Clapham uncovered his pale face, rose, and put on his
clothes. He looked miserable, but any thing but
guilty; and every one instinctively felt what a contrast
he was to the loathsome scene about him, and above
all to his father, whose eyes were blood-shot, his face
bloated, and black with a beard of a month's growth, and
his nose, like Bardolph's, an everlasting bonfire light.
We must make a thorough search here, said the
sheriff, for here, as the children say, we are getting
hot. He shook out the bed-clothes, and, saying it
would not hurt the musty straw to give it an airing,
he took the bed to the door, tore it open, and shook
it out. The purse rung, as it fell heavily on the
door-step. Pretty well done, for a beginner! he
said, picking up the purse, and then holding it up.
There's one witness against you, my lad; and then,
drawing out from his pocket Clapham's handkerchief,
And here's another! he added. Truly, you are a
chip of the old block; though he don't look like it,
does he? he added, in a lowered voice, appealing to
the standers-by. There was compassion in his voice,
a compassion it was impossible not to feel.
Clapham's
cheeks and lips were bloodless, but his eye
looked steadily up. Give me that handkerchief, he
said, faintly. It was given to him. It had been
steeped with tears of sympathy and love  tears for
little Lucy. Bitter tears now drenched it as he
covered
his face, staggered against the wall, and said, in
a voice but just audible, Ruined, ruined!
Massy now crawled out of her lair, and began
crying aloud. Why, Clapham! Clapham! she said,
I never would have thought it of you. Why, sheriff,
though he does belong to us, there never was an
honester boy. Clappy never stole in his life, but
when
he
made him. 'Twas only two days ago he
refused
to spend a shilling for me, just 'cause I took it
out of
his
pocket. This declaration made no
impression
at the time, but it was afterwards remembered in
Clapham's favor. Don't, she continued, don't, Mr.
Sheriff, snap him up. You've got the money; what
more do you want? He's young to shut up in a jail.
Them that's put there always comes out worse than
they go in. Norman always did.
Keep your breath to cool your porridge, old
woman, said Norman. Did you ever see a cat let a
mouse go? When you see that, you'll see a sheriff
open his clutch. Come, clear out; I don't want any
more powwowing here.
The sheriff ordered Massy to tie up all the boy's
clothes, as it was not likely he would return very soon.
Clapham inquired whither he was to be conveyed.
The sheriff condescended to inform him that he was
going to transport some debtors from Canaan to the
prison at L, and he should take him there for
commitment
.
Can't I see Harry Davis before I go?
asked Clapham, beseechingly.
I will take upon me to answer that question,
answered Davis, with an air of great authority. You
cannot
. You have had a little too much of seeing
Harry Davis.
Does Harry believe I stole the purse?
To be sure he does.
How can he? He does not know the purse is
found.
But he heard you in the night; he found the
window open; he saw the handkerchief; and
he knows
you
.
Clapham said not another word. It was to him as
if there were no more light in the world.
CHAPTER VIII
A CHANGE OF SCENE.
Man proposes. God disposes.
The
events we have related occurred in the month
of September. They had given considerable
notoriety
to the Davises, and brought them into the eye
of the little public of Salisbury. Mrs. Davis was too
well known, and too much respected there, to be
condemned
for having permitted an intercourse between
her children and Clapham Dunn. The common
remarks
were, that her goodness was imposed on; that
she never would believe evil of any body; that it
was well for her that her son Harry was such an
uncommon
boy; that he was one of the few in the world
who could touch pitch and not be defiled. Poor
Clapham
!
No thought of pity or charity wandered towards
him, except (an honorable exception for him) from the
bosoms of that little family who best knew him. Many a
prayer arose from Mrs. Davis's secret chamber that the
lost might be found; and Harry and Annie had many
a talk together of a hundred instances of Clapham's
honesty
,
and a thousand of his good-heartedness, and they
generally concluded with expressing a hope that there
was some unfathomable secret that would some day
explain
away the proofs, they could not openly controvert,
of Clapham's guilt, and a conviction that he was not, at
any rate, so guilty as he seemed. If only Mr. Lyman
had been in town, he might have done something; he
was always a good friend to Clapham; he would at least
have given him an opportunity to speak to a friend.
That this was due to him, Harry so vehemently insisted,
that he persuaded his father, who was going through
L, on his way to Washington, to take a letter
from him to Clapham. In this letter he expressed,
most affectionately, his grief for what had happened;
his mother's, and Annie's. He said they were not
willing to believe any thing against him, and that what
other people called proofs, they only called mysterious,
unexplained circumstances. I have believed in you,
Clapham, he said. I yet hope. Write the truth to
me. You cannot write yourself. If there is no one
in the jail who will write for you, send for the
minister
of L. I dare say he is a good man,
ministers
almost always are,  and he will write for you.
Had poor Clapham received this letter, what a
healing balm it would have been to his wounded spirit!
What a motive it would have given for effort and
perseverance
!
But he was destined never to see it.
Davis, whose improvidence and carelessness were the
bane of all dependence on him, put Harry's letter where
he usually carried his business papers,  in the crown of
his hat,  and lost it. Day after day, Harry hoped and
sighed for an answer, but no answer came; and, when
Davis returned from Washington, not liking to confess
he had lost the letter, he asked Harry, carelessly, if
he had received an answer from Clapham; and, on
Harry replying, No, he merely said, I thought not!
His morality was as slipshod as his other qualities.
The country season was now closing, and Mrs.
Dawson and the New York party who had delayed
their return to the city to enjoy October in the country,
12
were packing for their departure. Mrs. Dawson had
taken a great liking to Harry Davis. She had been
struck with his intelligence, his good manners, and his
manliness. She found he had profited by a very good
common school education; that he had taken
advantage
of the opportunities of reading, afforded by
the diffusion of cheap publications; that he had wisely
taken advice of his cultivated friend, Mr. Lyman,
and, rejecting trash, read only books that are books.
One of the greatest men of letters England has
produced  Gibbon  declares that his love of reading
was more to him than all the rest of his education.
Harry Davis did not expect to be a man of letters.
He was not an ambitious boy; but he was early
taught that, in whatever condition he might find
himself
,
a well-stored mind would be imperishable riches,
contributing to his respectability and happiness.
Mrs. Dawson kindly called on Mrs. Davis soon
after little Lucy's burial; and, introducing what she
rightly thought a most consolatory topic, she said,
Your son Harry is a remarkable boy, Mrs. Davis.
He is a good child, ma'am.
That he is. I have been much struck with seeing
him so cheerfully fetch and carry our clothes to your
wash. Some boys would have let their mothers do it;
but your son seems to know that the true honor lies
in performing the service for his mother.
He has always taken pleasure in serving me, said
Mrs. Davis, with a smile of sweet satisfaction.
Well, he will be rewarded, Mrs. Davis. He may
be president of the United States, yet.
I hope not.
Hope not?
I mean, Mrs. Dawson, that I don't wish my son
to be ambitious; that I think it is the fault and folly
of our people to be all striving for something beyond
them. There is so much said now-a-days about people
`going ahead,' that they are all pushing forward
looking
beyond  grasping at something they cannot quite
reach, instead of being contented with what they have
building castles in the air, instead of raising a
comfortable
dwelling on solid ground. No, Mrs. Dawson,
I am sincere when I say that my highest ambition is
to see my son an intelligent farmer or mechanic, a
good member of society, but not a doctor or lawyer,
and, above all things, not by trade a politician.
I admire your moderation, Mrs. Davis, but I
confess
I look for something a little better for Harry.
Mrs. Dawson had conceived certain plans for
Harry. She was a woman of unbounded sympathy,
and the most diffusive kindness; but, we must
confess
,
with rather more zeal than judgment.
Your ideas are excellent, Mrs. Davis, she
resumed
;
but Harry is such an uncommon boy that
we may expect something a little out of the common
way for him. Why, Mr. Lyman says he draws very
nearly as well as he does. Who knows but he might
make a great painter?
O Mrs. Dawson, that's not to be thought of. He
draws well because he has taken a deal of pains.
Even Mr. Lyman, though he is so fond of him, says
he has no genius.
How would you like to have him a merchant?
A merchant! He would have small capital to
begin on.
That is nothing. Most of our rich men have
begun with no other capital than enterprise, industry,
and good character. Have you any plan for Harry?
Mrs. Davis had. She was at that moment awaiting
an answer from a respectable carpenter, a friend of
hers settled in L. The answer came, and was
unfavorable
.
The carpenter had no vacant place. Mrs.
Dawson renewed the proposition for a mercantile
career. She proposed that Harry should enter a retail
shop in New York. At first, Mrs. Davis shrank from
the temptations of city life, and uncertainties of trade.
But Mrs. Dawson urged so earnestly, entered into all
Harry's future with such friendly and flattering zeal,
that both mother and son were persuaded to think of
the project. Two or three other failures to obtain
places for which Mrs. Davis had applied, occurred at
this time; and finally it was agreed, when Mrs.
Dawson
left Salisbury, that she should make application
and report her success.
Soon after her departure, a summons came. Harry
had as neat an outfit as could be procured by twenty
dollars, eked out by his mother's judgment and skill in
buying this and making that do  twenty dollars
left her of her earnings, after they had been recovered
at Dunn's. Davis took credit to himself for leaving
her so much. The rest, he said, would barely
take him to Washington and back; but he should get
his patent, and then he should show his wife that a
man could earn a hundred dollars where a woman
could ten. But, he concluded, that is not their
fault, poor creatures! There's a difference by nature
in men and women, that's a fact!
CHAPTER IX.
HARRY'S FIRST LETTER FROM NEW YORK.
He carried in his face the open sesame to door and heart.
My dear Mother
:
Firstly, I enclose the two
dollars
you gave me for travelling expenses. I met
Mr. Lyman on board the steamboat, and he gave me
five dollars, which he said he owed me for my aid in
the drawings he made for the New York architect.
Fine! After the wet time of parting was over, I was
in luck. Mr. Porter would not take any thing for
bringing me to the boat,  thirty good miles,  because
I helped him pick up apples one day after Jesse Porter
broke his arm. I was pretty hungry; but hearing they
charged half a dollar for supper, I bought some
crackers and cheese before I went on board. So I
came to the city for fifty cents. Such bustle and
confusion as there was on the wharf where we landed!
I made my way through it as well as I could, and
inquired the way to Chambers Street, not far, No. ,
where Mrs. Dawson lives. I saw the windows were
all closed, and so I sat my box of clothes down, and
sat on it. I began to feel both lonesome and
hungry
;
nothing seemed like morning  the fresh,
beautiful
morning of the country. The sun shining on
chimneys and brick walls, instead of hill-tops and
sparkling waters; not a solitary bird singing; not
even a cock crowing. After a while, milkmen began
to appear. There was a different one for almost every
house, and each made a horrid outcry; and, after
a while, a woman came out of a cellar, and took a
measure of milk. Though they live in great houses,
this seems poverty to me. By and by, there came a
lively little driver with baskets full of bread. I
remembered
Dr. Franklin's account of his buying a loaf
of bread and eating it as he walked through the
streets of Philadelphia, when first he went there;
and, though I do not expect to eat bread in kings'
houses, as he afterwards did, I thought there would
be no harm in following his example; so I bought a
sixpenny loaf of bread, and, with a draught of milk
from a milkman, I made a good breakfast. You see,
mother, I am determined to make my money last, if
possible, till I can earn more, and not call on you or
trouble our kind friend Mrs. Dawson. As soon as
her blinds were opened, I rung. The man who opened
the door smiled when I asked for Mrs. Dawson, and
said she would rise in about two hours. How long
those two hours were! But when they were over,
and I was summoned to her, she was as kind as ever.
She told me she had procured for me an excellent
place in a retail shop in Broadway, where, if I did as
well as my employer expected from her account of
me, I should receive enough, even the first year, to
pay my board. Before going there, she advised me to
secure a boarding-place; she had made inquiries for
this, and gave me references, and off I set. I went
from one to another. At one there was a multitude
of clerks, and a coarse, slatternly housekeeper; at
another there was a set of low traders. I went in
while they were at dinner, and a very slight
observation
13
of their vulgar manners and conversation
convinced
me they were not associates that I should
relish or you would approve. The next was full,
and the last was too filthy for any thing. As I
came off the steps quite discouraged, there was a
little fat lady walking before me in a gray silk
gown, and a white shawl, looking as neat as a new
pin. Two dirty shavers of boys had filled a
squirt-gun
in the gutter, and had taken aim at the lady's
nice gown. I sprang upon them just in time,
wrenched the squirt-gun from their hands, and sent
it off out of sight. They began kicking and
bawling
;
and she, turning round, learned the mischief
they had intended. She was very thankful to me,
very good natured, and talkative. She told me the
gown was new, just come home, and she had put it
on for a wedding-visit,  a visit to her niece's
husband's
first cousin; it was her best gown, too; she
had heard of the boys playing such tricks; boys
would be boys, &c., &c. O, mother dear! her
tongue goes by machinery. (Not father's!) She had
such a friendly way, and did not seem a very great
lady, and asked me so many questions,  my name,
where I came from, &c.,  that I thought I would tell
her what I was in search of. This silenced her
for a moment; then she said, Come home with me,
and we'll see what can be done. I'll talk to Plenty,
Plenty is my sister,  and perhaps  but I won't
raise expectations yet. We live in Mercer Street,
retired and central too.
We were soon at her house,  a small,
two-story
wooden building, that looks like a mere crack
between the two tall brick houses on each side of
it. I followed her into a little front room. There
was sitting an oldish lady, taking care of a little
blind child. The child uttered a cry of delight at
hearing the sound of my new friend's voice, returned
her half a dozen hasty kisses, and called her `aunty
Peace;' and the old lady, into whose hands she put
a piece of wedding-cake, said, `O, thank'ee; tell us all
about the wedding.' `Directly, directly,' replied my
new friend; and, bidding me sit down, and giving me
a generous bit of the wedding-cake, she bustled out
of the room, saying she would return in a few
minutes
.
She did, and brought her sister with her,
her twin sister,  and
Peace
and
Plenty
stood before
me, looking almost precisely alike, fat and full, smiling
and abounding
two
cornucopias. They could have
been called nothing but Peace and Plenty, or Milk
and Honey. The only difference I could see between
them was, that Peace had a dimple in one cheek only,
and Plenty in both; that Peace wore a `front,' and
Plenty her own gray hair. However, I suspect the
`front' was put on for high dress. They are droll
looking, but such pleasant faces! Nice, complete sets
of white teeth; and well they are so, for their mouths
are never both shut. Their eyes are rather small,
but bright and warm as sunshine in June, and their
cheeks are rather fat,  but there is not a wrinkle
near them, but a bright color on them. I did not
expect to find such people in a city, so kind, so plain,
so as if they were content to be themselves, and did
not aim to be like any body else.
Well, dear mother, we had a great deal of talk,
which I would write, but have not time or paper.
The amount of it was that (suppose me to be
blushing
)
Miss Peace was pleased with my appearance;
that she felt moved towards me by my saving her
new gown and shawl; that, as soon as she knew my
wants, it occurred to her that, if Plenty felt as she
did, they could board me. Their house was pretty
full, to be sure; the old lady and her grandchild,
Nannie, occupied the back room, Peace and Plenty
the front chamber, her three nieces the back one,
and there was nothing left but a little place over the
entry, that they used for a clothes-press; but they
might take the clothes out, and put me in; I should
have to stand on my bed to dress, but I could keep
my clothes in boxes under it, and there was room to
put my arm between the wall and bed to get them,
and I could hang some things up, and it would be
handy reaching. I did make one suggestion, mother
Where should I put a wash-basin?
`I like that,' said Peace, and Plenty nodded her
approbation; indeed, I find it's always a voice and an
echo, no matter which speaks first.
`There's a nice little closet for washing, in the
area,' she said; `it has a window, and room for a
wash-stand and a small tub; and there's a lock on the
door, and you shall have it all to yourself.'
Now, but two points remained to be settled.
Miss Peace would make suitable inquiries about me
of Mrs. Dawson, because it was customary. It was
enough for her to look in my face; (blushing again,
dear mother.) The other point was the price of my
board. `The cost,' she thought, `would be about two
dollars; and her profits,' she said, with a smile, `she
would get out of little services I could render. It
would be handy having one mankind in the house.'
Two dollars I can pay, as Holson has promised
me a salary of a hundred dollars a year, with two
weeks' vacation. So, mother, I felt very happy. Miss
Peace went with me to Mrs. Dawson's, without any
delay; and, after a short private interview, they were
both perfectly satisfied. Mrs. Dawson had heard of
the twin sisters, and was rejoiced that Providence had
directed me to so good a home; and my new friend's
face sparkled all over, at the good account our kind
benefactress had given of us. In addition to the low
board,  for I find it is very low here,  the sisters
have my washing done in the house. They have one
servant, and they say, that on washing-days they will
do a little more for her, and it will not come hard to
any one. It is all `live and let live' here. Their
nieces are three orphan girls; one but two years older
than little Lucy, whom I am to carry to school and
fetch home, when the days are stormy; one eight,
and one fourteen, thinner, more city looking than
Annie,  I mean in point of health,  but as unaffected
and frank as Annie herself; and, being just about
Annie's age, she seems very natural to me, and I
think we shall be quite friends. Her name is Mary
Hale.
After getting all things settled in my
press-room
,
I went to Mrs. Dawson, who wished to introduce me
to Mr. Holson. He was very civil to our friend; but,
I must confess, I did not like his looks; and his
manner
seemed to me both sly and fawning. He spoke
of the very uncommon terms on which I was coming;
of my rare good fortune  being a raw hand  in
obtaining a salary; said I must thank Mrs. Dawson
for it; Mrs. Dawson was one of his best customers
hoped she would continue so; said he should expect
extra service for such extra salary; mentioned some
shops where no salary was paid, and others where
clerks paid for their places; and said, in rather a
lower voice,  still I heard him,  that dress was very
important to the impression of the shop; that clerks
should have a fashionable air; that my clothes were
country-made; that it was a disadvantage; but,
for
Mrs. Dawson's sake
, he would put up with a great deal.
I was a little provoked, mother, but I tried to
remember that you had told me, again and again, not
always to expect smooth sailing; that life was a sort
of checker-work, and that I must be grateful for the
good, and make the best of the evil, and that what
seems evil to us often turns out, in the end, to be
good, &c., &c. I have far more good than evil in my
fortune. Nothing can exceed Mrs. Dawson's kindness;
and then my luck in my boarding-house! Mother, it
will be a home to me. Mr. Holson told me to come
to his shop in the evening, and he would give me his
instructions. The clerks surveyed me superciliously.
I heard the words `shabby,' and `down east,' and one
of them was ill-bred enough to touch his own
neckcloth
and point to mine, and, at the same time, wink
to his companion. Mother, I felt mortified, plagued;
I am ashamed to confess it, but I did. I know
there was a want of manliness and independence in
this, and I am ashamed of it; but things look so
different in New York and in Salisbury! When I
left home, I felt as if you had provided every thing
I could want,  as if I were a little too smart, if any
thing,  and now!  But I am determined not to
give up to it. I will not sacrifice a principle to an
appearance. I will not make myself one of the
`clothes people!'
While I was at tea, Mrs. Dawson's servant
brought me a note enclosing fifteen dollars  a present
from her to enable me, she says, to present myself
more acceptably in Mr. Holson's shop.
This is very, very kind, very generous. But,
mother, I shall not accept it. In the first place, it
would be going right in the face of your
instructions
`I must depend on my own exertions.
Charities are for the helpless. A dependence on
gifts, if it does not make us mean and cringing,
does make us helpless.' This I learned from you;
and, from my own reflection, I am sure I shall respect
myself more a month hence, if I go before those
impertinent young men in my plain, rather
coarsish
country clothes. So I'll face it out like a man.
I spent the afternoon in walking round the city,
and in looking at the beautiful fountains. There
are three large ones, and are to be many more.
The water is thrown sixty feet into the air, and then
falls back in showers of jewels, as it seems when
the sun shines. I sat down in Union Park, and
looked and listened, till I fancied I felt the cool
breath of Rhigi by the brook-side. These fountains
in the city seem to me like a bit of lovely poetry
in a book of tiresome prose. They are a voice from
another land, a breath from home. I remained,
sitting
near the fountain, refreshed and thoughtful. I
do not know whether it was dream or reverie, but I
was coming down Rhigi with Clapham; and then
we were all kneeling around dear little Lucy's bed,
and Clapham was with us. Suddenly I started up,
and saw the stars shining, and felt my cheeks wet
with the spray, or with tears, dear mother.
CHAPTER X.
JAIL COMRADES.
Is the boy of the wicked?
Clapham
was committed for trial by the justice at
L. The sittings of the Court of Common
Pleas began the following week. He was instructed
that he might have counsel allowed him, and might
have the privilege, common to all criminals, of pleading
not guilty; but he was, at the same time, told that
the proofs were too strong against him to admit a
hope of escape, and was advised to plead guilty, and
gain favor by occasioning the least possible trouble.
No boy ever more dreaded being shut up in a jail,
but he was in a state of despair. He had lost, as
he believed, forever, the affection, so well earned, of
his beloved friends; he had lost every thing but his
self-respect. This was not gone, and it was so strongly
indicated in his upward, straightforward glance, in
the open expression of his face, and his quiet, and
almost dignified demeanor, that his counsel did not find
it difficult to get an abatement of the usual sentence
in like offences, and, instead of being sent to the
State Prison, he was remanded to the County Jail,
to remain there for two years, beginning with one
month's confinement in a dark cell.
It is a punishment almost too heavy to be borne,
to be, at any age, shut up in solitude and darkness;
but to this mountain boy, this free ranger over hill
and valley, who had lived with
The mountain wind  most spiritual thing of all
The wide earth knows,
to be thus caged in the growing time of youth, when
activity was the law of his nature, was most painful.
His hours dragged heavily. At first, the future was
all a blank to him. He shrank from it. It held out
no hope to him, no prospect of any thing pleasant
or inviting. The past was all. And over the past,
in spite of the evil that had attended it, there was
a golden light from the friendship of that blessed
little family that had encouraged and stimulated him.
He reviewed, again and again, his past life, and he
had infinite comfort in remembering many temptations
he had resisted, many good resolutions he had formed,
and
kept;
and, gradually, as his ideas became more
settled, he felt more patient. A great many things
he had heard Mrs. Davis say, and which, at the time,
made little impression, and which he had quite
forgotten
,
now recurred to his memory, and seemed to
come out in letters of light. God does not see as
man sees! Despair and a good conscience don't
keep company. Trust in God, do right, and all
will come right. These, and many others of her
good, familiar sayings, were on his horizon like the
first faint streaks of dawn, and, after the first
throbbing
agony was past, he had many peaceful waking
hours. But, when he was asleep, owing to bad air
and want of exercise, he had horrid dreams. His
mother would seem to be lying dead-drunk upon him,
and he could not remove her. His father was
dragging
him over stones, and through sloughs, and then he
would hear smothered cries of Murder! and Fire!
and awake in a cold sweat, and shivering with ague.
Once in a great while, he would have a sweet sleep,
and pleasant dream of fishing down Rhigi's sparkling
brook, and Annie would be standing with a basket of
berries beside him, and he would feel little Lucy's warm
kiss on his cheek. O, then how dreary the waking!
It seemed to Clapham, when he had passed one
day in that dark cell, that the month would never
come to an end; but it was soon gone  gone with
its record to Him who awardeth judgment; and most
happy for Clapham, that he had used some of these
hours for meditation, for penitence and prayer, and for
good resolutions against the day of freedom and
outward
temptation.
The month was gone, and Clapham was removed
to a large apartment, in which were several persons,
some already sentenced to a term of imprisonment,
and others awaiting their trial. Some were in for
grave offences, others for trivial ones. The proved
guilty and the possibly innocent in close
companionship
!
Few improvements had then been made in the
jails. They were strictly places of punishment.
Correction
and reformation were worns almost unwritten
in the penal code. The criminal was then considered
a hopeless outcast, not, as now, a weak, neglected,
unfortunate brother, to be pitied and cared for; not, as
now, an infirm child, to be restrained because
dangerous
,
to suffer because disobedient, and to be restored
to trust as soon as he deserved it.
At the period of Clapham's imprisonment, there were
no employments provided. If a man were industrious
and ingenious, he might, perhaps, obtain materials for
labor, and work on his own account; but, for the most
part, the prison at L, like others, was a scene of
complete idleness. One man had a dirty pack of
cards, with which he and a comrade played from
morning till night, with interludes of telling fortunes,
and playing tricks with them.
Others pitched coppers all day long. One man,
whose wife supplied him with tobacco, smoked
unceasingly
;
and all, with the exception of one
Frenchman
and a shoemaker, chewed and spit to the right
hand and the left, from morning till night  a fitting
pastime for a jail.
Clapham had come forth from his solitary cell with
feelings that made this society most odious to him.
The vulgar, profane, and indecent language he heard
shocked him, and, incredible as it may seem, he
sometimes
wished for his solitude.
Slocum, the owner of the cards, invited him to
take a hand, and offered to teach him. He saw the
boy was wretched, and probably had a good-natured
desire to make him less so. But, when Clapham
declined
his advances, he and his companion laughed at
him, and, as they called it, poked fun at him. One
called him a toad, and advised him to crawl back to
his hole; and the other an owl, who had no use of
his eyes now he had come back to daylight. The
Frenchman, Delean, took his part. He was a
kindhearted
man, and ingenious, and diligent, as most
Frenchmen are; for, in the worst circumstances, they
can find something to do. Deleau had been in
partnership
with a pedler. It was proved their goods were
stolen. Deleau maintained that he was ignorant of
this; but the pedler escaped, and Deleau was taken,
and, as he could not prove his innocence, he was
14
sentenced to fifteen months' imprisonment in the L
jail. He spoke broken English, and was mimicked
and laughed at by the jail company; but this he did
not mind. He was always good humored, and ready
to do small favors, and, by degrees, he became a
general
favorite. Even the worst people feel those little
hourly acts of kindness that are the cement of society,
and spread over its face cheerfulness and smiles.
What for trouble you this little lad? said Deleau;
you should be, for him, father and mother.
Come to your ma', my dear, screamed Slocum,
and he caught Clapham in his arms, and swung him
backward and forward, singing Rock-a-by, baby
bunting
.
Clapham resisted manfully, struggled and kicked,
till Slocum, feeling himself hurt, flew into a passion,
and hit Clapham a blow in the face. He staggered
and fell, bruised and bloody. The noise called up the
jailer, who, on opening the door, and perceiving, as he
said, that the boy had got into a fight already,
threatened to send him back to the solitary cell; and
then, as if he had quite done his duty, he relocked the
door.
Monsieur Jailer is one very good keeper for de
wild beast, said Deleau, but a miserable for de young
man. It signify not. I will do what I can do, in this
very pretty place. He then filled his basin with
water, (he had procured some comforts for his own
private use,) and called Clapham to his end of the
room, and while he was washing off the blood, he said,
Listen me, my dear; I will be your good friend;
when you cannot be master, stay quiet.
But I'll not be made a baby and a fool of! said
Clapham, whose temper was thoroughly roused.
Quite to the contrary, my friend; he is the fool
who makes the wrong, and he the wise little man
who suffers it.
I am not so very little either, replied Clapham,
and I'll let those fellows know I'll not be imposed on.
You have reason, my friend; but if dey kindle a
fire, what for you burn yourself up in it? No, no; keep
clear of bad fellow; do nothing wid 'em; say noting to
'em. 'Tis not one very pretty place here! but we can
make place for ourself. I am not happy man to be
here. I do not merit it; but I could not help it. I
was stranger in de country. Nobody knew me. I was
de sheep found wid de fox. But what for, my dear,
cry, and lose lifede laugh is more for de health!
I, too, was the poor sheep found with the fox,
thought Clapham; but I
cannot
laugh.
However, the kind philosophy of the Frenchman
had a good effect, and it was followed by substantial
services. Deleau had purchased favors of the jailer
by making rings of horse-hair for his wife and
daughters
.
They were made of black and white hair, with
names interwoven. These rings were shown, and
Deleau
had many applications to make more; so that, for
some time, he drove quite a gaining trade. He told
this to Clapham.
The trade, he said, has now abated; still I
make two, sometime three, four a week, and four make
one dollar. I have one little sum to begin the world
when I leave this place. Now you shall be my
partner
.
I teach you, and you shall have a share of my
business, and in two month more, all to yourself.
Clapham's face brightened. He had again found a
friend. He set about learning to weave the rings
with good heart. At first, he was awkward enough;
but he was patient. Deleau encouraged him, and
when Clapham thanked him, he said, Very well, my
dear. I like to hear `thank you;' it is good of
manner
;
and de boy of your country are as fraid of
manner
as if dey were small-pox; but what please me
more than words is your face, and your voice, no
no longer miserable. Dere, dat bit is fine! Now
make one all yourself. Put in dat name you like
best.
Clapham began with fresh zeal. Deleau, who was
singing over his own work, now and then cast a
sidelong
glance at Clapham, to assure himself the boy
made no mistake. It is done! said Clapham,
showing
it to his master, with a smile of satisfaction, and
all right, II believe.
Bravo! bravo, my friend! as right as if Monsieur
Deleau had done it himself! `
Annie!
' dat is de name
you like best?
No, no.
Harry
is the name I like best in the
world; but boys do not wear rings, so I made it for
Harry's sister Annie; but neither Harry nor Annie,
he concluded, with a sigh, will wear a ring of my
making, now.
Never despair, my dear friend; good people
forgive
and forget. Put up de ring safe; one bright day
you may put it on Mademoiselle Annie finger for a
wedding-ring.
O, never! never! never in the world! A
wedding-ring
!
How foolish, Mr. Deleau!As if I
should ever he married, thought Clapham; and if
I were, as if ever Annie Davis would look at such
a thing as I am  a jail-bird.
Not many days after this, fortunately for Deleau,
unfortunately for Clapham, Deleau received a permit
to leave the prison. The pedler, his former partner,
had been taken. He had confessed his guilt, and
averred Deleau's innocence. This came to the
knowledge
of a young lawyer, who had defended Deleau at
the time of his commitment, and who had then
become
interested in the poor Frenchman. He had
voluntarily taken the pains to procure Deleau's
release
.
I am as sorry to leave you, he said to
Clapham, at parting, as if you were my own poor
little boy. I had once one little boy. For the first
time, Clapham saw his eyes fill with tears; he wiped
them away, and proceeded, He is gone to de good
God. De sweetest flowers are always taken for de
Paradise.
So they are! exclaimed Clapham. He thought
of little Lucy.
Ah, we must all finish! resumed Deleau;
perhaps de sooner de better.
I think so, Mr. Deleau.
Ah, you must not tink so. You are too young
to tink so. A cloudy morning may turn out very
bright day  first rate! So, I expect, will Clapham.
Courage, my good boy! When you come out of dis
pretty place, write to Paul Delean, New York.
While you stay here, make de ring; or do someting,
always do someting. Above all, keep away from de
bad fellow wid de cards and de pitch-penny.
They parted, and poor Clapham felt desolate
enough. The ring trade had become very dull.
The jailer took no pains to dispose of them.
Clapham
,
however, went on making them as long as his
materials lasted. Then the jailer was surly, and
would procure him no more. So Clapham fell back
into inevitable idleness. His days dragged heavily
on. He very civilly asked the jailer to bring him a
spelling-book, at the same time telling him he had
plenty of money to pay him for it. The jailer, at
first, made a sort of half promise he would attend
to it; but, when Clapham again and again reminded
him of it, he became vexed, and said he had
something
else to do than to be bothered with buying
spelling-books for chaps. Slocum had been for some
days watching Clapham, and had become wonderfully
civil to him. Slocum's wife had brought him a
basket of apples and gingerbread. He offered
Clapham
a share. Clapham took it, and thanked him.
Now, that's friendly, he said; I knew you was
not a boy to bear malice. I told Dick Hunt, when
that outlandish Frenchman went away, you would find
out we were full as good friends to you as he.
Come, don't be sucking your thumbs all day. Sit
down here, and look over the cards. You will soon
know how to play as well as we. Clapham drew up
to them and became interested. Slocum winked to
his companion. To-morrow you shall take a hand,
he said; there's no harm in life in playing when
there's nothing else to do. It soon became too
dark to discern the spots on the cards; and, no
lights being allowed in the prison, the cards were
put aside.
Clapham had no sooner lain down on his bed
for the night, than the thought came to him like a
blow, How could I forget Mr. Deleau's advice to
keep clear of Slocum? I am sorry! sorry! But
what shall I do with these everlasting long days?
If I had any kind of a book, perhaps I might spell
out the words. Perhaps Plum will let me wax his
threads for him. I'll try him. It was a good
consequence of Clapham's solitary confinement, that
he had acquired the habit, so soon as he laid
himself
down, of considering his past conduct and future
duties.
When the jailer presented himself the next
morning
,
Clapham begged him to lend him any old book.
But you can't read, said the man, gruffly.
Perhaps
15
I can learn, urged Clapham. And what use
will you make of it? No, no; the less such as you
know the better. And thus this ignorant man
disappointed
Clapham, and himself lost one golden
opportunity
of doing good and kindness.
Thus rebuffed, Clapham turned to his last hope;
and a forlorn hope was that forbidding-faced man,
Plum. Poor Clapham timidly approached him. I say,
Mr. Plum, he began, in a low voice, for he dreaded
Slocum and Hunt's laugh; don't you want a
'prentice
?
No answer; and he repeated the question.
Plum shook his head. I'll not plague you,
continued
Clapham; I'll begin with waxing the threads.
You'll break and waste.
Only try me, Mr. Plum. Again Plum shook his
head. I can at least hammer the soles for you.
Again a decisive shake of the head. Do let me
try, Mr. Plum, I am so tired doing nothing. I soon
learned to make rings of Mr. Delean; why can't I
learn to make shoes?
And then sell them on your own account, as
you did the rings, hey? I can make myself all that
will sell. If you don't learn it will be bother, and
if you do learn it will be loss. Still Clapham
urged. He had felt the good and happiness of
occupation
that it could even make the hours glide
lightly on in that loathsome jail. I will try my
best, Mr. Plum, he said; as long as I stay in
this place, I will work for you. I promise you.
Promise! hum! What is the promise of the
like of you worth?
I am not a liar! said Clapham, coloring up to
the very roots of his hair.
That's more than I know or believe. Boys is no
use; I hate them  I always did.
And they will hate you, replied Clapham, his
too quick temper rising beyond his control; you
are a hateful and hard-hearted man!
Clapham had unconsciously raised his voice.
Slocum
and Hunt cried out, Hurrah! that's it, my boy!
go it, Clap! you're coming on; pay it on to the old
carrion!
Clapham did not answer them. He slunk away
by himself, ashamed of having said any thing these
bad men applauded. Slocum and Hunt thought
this too good an occasion to renew their attack on
Clapham to be lost. They knew he had two or three
dollars which he had earned in the ring trade; this
money  this precious means of procuring rum and
tobacco, for which they were always hankering  they
were pretty sure of getting possession of, if they
could once cajole him into playing. But all their
solicitations were, as yet, in vain. The poor, tempted
boy was, as yet, steadfast in his firm resolutions.
The memory of his friends was, as yet, a guardian
angel to him.
We may as well conclude this chapter with a
brief notice of Plum, who was a very strong
illustration
of a passion that, in a greater or less degree,
wofully prevails in our land,  a strong but a singular
illustration of it,  for, if our people are avaricious,
they are often very generous, sometimes profuse. If
Clapham had not been urged on by the keenest
desire
of employment, Plum's aspect must have repelled
him. He was short and spare, with a little head
bent forward; his face was shrunken, and his skin
shrivelled like an overbaked pear; his sunken eye
glowed like a coal of fire in a dark place; his
thin lips, sharply closed, seemed scarcely to have
smiled, even when he was a baby in his mother's
arms; he did not appear as if there had ever in
his life been a period of youth and freshness. One
passion  a
greed of gain
had ruled him from
childhood
;
he was now past fifty. He had no wife, no
children, no one to provide for, and certainly he never
allowed himself an indulgence from the fruit of his
labor. Still, for fifty years, he had toiled from
daylight
to dark, as if to save himself from starvation.
His shoe-shop was in a small town near L. He
was a man of few words, quiet and inoffensive;
doing, as was believed, neither good nor harm. It is
true that he had been several times suspected of
making false charges; but they were so petty, and
the man so industrious, and so free from temptation
to fraud, that the persons wronged concluded there
was some mistake, and let it pass.
There was a tannery in Plum's neighborhood,
from which its proprietor had missed leather; never,
however, more than one hide at a time; so he made
no fuss about it, though he was much troubled by
being forced to suspect one person after another.
He was detained in the tanyard, one day, much
beyond
his usual time; it was starlight. He perceived
a man crouched, burdened, and stealing along by the
fence. He followed him till the person entered
Plum's house; and he saw that it was Plum
himself
.
One may imagine Plum's dismay, when, two
hours after, the tanner entered his dwelling with a
sheriff and search-warrant. What a dwelling for an
industrious man! One apartment was a work-shop,
and the other  not much larger than a coffin
served him for kitchen and bed-room. The tanner
and sheriff proceeded to a loft and cellar, and both
were filled with stolen property, for the most part
of little value; and, except the few hides he had
stolen from the tanner, of no worth to Plum. It
was almost laughable that, among other lumber, there
was a bat and ball, and a sled that a little boy,
through all the pleasant coasting days of winter, had
missed and mourned. Plum seemed to have stolen them
from the mere passion of acquisition, or, perhaps, as
he said to Clapham, he truly hated boys, and had a
dreary pleasure in spoiling their sport. At last,
buried in the cellar, under every thing else, the
searchers discovered bags of specie, assorted; dollars
in one, half dollars in another, and so on, down to a
bag of cents. While they were counting the money,
which amounted to fourteen hundred and forty
dollars and thirty-two cents,  Plum, who, till then,
had been silent, only becoming more and more livid,
began to cry and wring his hands, and offer to pay
double the price of the hides if they would go away
and leave him. The tanner told him the matter had
gone too far; he was in the sheriff's hands; but he
would befriend him if he would tell him how he
had come to the pass of prowling about nights like
a hungry fox, and preying upon others' property, when
he had plenty of his own.
The amount of his confession was, that he had
been a working, saving lad from the beginning;
that he was honest at first, but he loved money (the
poor wretch called it
gain
) so well that he sold his
school-books, and whatever little presents were given
him, and laid up the money. Even in those early
days, nothing pleased him like making a good
bargain.
His first theft was during his apprenticeship,
small bits of leather, with which he cobbled shoes
at an under price when the shop was shut, and his
master believed he was in bed. Then he took
leather enough for a pair of shoes, of which he
made private sale; and so he had gone on, from
year to year, increasing his burden of guilt and
fear, and gaining  what? some round bits of silver
and copper to bury in his cellar, when stones would
have served that purpose as well.
But are there not men with a wider horizon
than Plum's, as diligent, and more fortunate, who
accumulate gains and go on getting, each new load
pressing a little more of the life-blood out of their
hearts? The earth, instead of being fed from their
fountains with streams of liberality and gladness, is,
for them, converted into a banking-house, whose
vaults are filled with gold and silver; (fearful
witnesses
at the last tribunal!) and Heaven is to them
a brazen, arid vault, to which no breath of love or
gratitude ascends from others; which no prayer of
faith or hope of theirs can pierce.
CHAPTER XI.
A CLERK'S TRIALS.
Some men employ one portion of their lives to make the other
miserable.
Harry Davis
had a much harder struggle than
appeared by his letter to his mother, in refusing
Mrs. Dawson's gift of the fifteen dollars. It was
accompanied
by a note, in which, with the most delicate
kindness, she urged its acceptance. Harry was to enter
the shop the next day, a stranger to its modes of
business, under a master who had not made, to say the
least of it, a favorable impression on him,  with new
associates, who too often look with a critical eye on
a new-comer. To all this was to be added the
disadvantage
of appearing in a garb that had already
excited a demonstration of displeasure from Holson
and sinister looks from his clerks. If it be
considered
what the temptations are to dress in a city under
ordinary circumstances, and how great a majority of
men and women, young and old, yield to them,
Harry's
perseverance in his resolution must be allowed to
border on heroism. It must be confessed that he rose
even earlier than usual the next morning; that he
took extraordinary pains in polishing his boots; that
he arranged his hair most carefully; and (he can afford
to have this little weakness told) that he tied and retied,
a half dozen times, his plaid cotton neckcloth, and at
last turned away from his three-inch glass, saying,
with a sigh, Hang it! I cannot make it set like
those fellows'! There's no use in trying.
Peace and Plenty were not larks in the morning;
but, being aware that Harry's duty was to open the
shop, and that he must be there at an early hour,
they kindly prepared his breakfast over night; and,
though he protested he wanted nothing more than bread
and a glass of water, he found then, and from that
time henceforth, prepared neatly, on a little waiter,
bread, butter, and a bit of cold meat. Our motherly
maidens said they did not hold to setting a growing
boy to work on bread and water.
We pass over the few first weeks of Harry's
novitiate, and will make extracts from his letters, which
will best tell his experience. We shall be
compelled
to intersperse the extracts with a few notes, as
Harry did not choose to communicate to his mother
all the discomforts of his situation.
After having been a month at work, I am
beginning
,
he says, to feel more easy in the harness,
dear mother. If it yet galls in some places, there are
others that have already become callous, and do not
feel it. Eugene Nevis was the youngest clerk, when I
came in, and I became, in his place, prince of the
lamps and knight of the broom. Eugene is a
gentleman's
son, and a real gentleman in his spirit;
well-bred and kind-hearted. From the first, he has
treated me as if I were his equal in every way.
He even said, the first time I trimmed the lamps
and swept the shop, `I feel how much you have
the advantage of me, by knowing how to do these
things. When I began sweeping, I blistered my hands;
and I had a regular scolding every day from Holson
and the head clerks. And, as to the lamps, I daubed
them, and spilled the oil, and my poor father had
to pay Holson twenty dollars for the damage I
occasioned
the goods. I don't believe it amounted to
that, but Holson is a skin-flint every way.' Dear
mother, I thank you for every thing you taught me.
I find that no knowledge, be it even so humble as
how to fill a lamp well, comes amiss. Little did I
think, when I swept the rooms for you every day while
you were nursing Annie through her long fever, that
I was studying for a New York clerkship. The clerks,
for the most part, were pleased to find a clean shop
and bright lamps, and they treated me more civilly
than, by all accounts, they usually do new-comers.
One, to be sure, mean fellow asked me where I last
served as chambermaid, and another called me `Betty,'
and so on; but I had nerved myself to bear it, and
when they saw that I was tolerably manly, and no
`Betty,' they changed their tone. There are two or
three among them (we have twelve clerks) whom I do not
at all like; they are ostentatious and mean, ignorant
and arrogant. They have precious little instruction
from books, and not one tithe of the knowledge which
poor Clapham got from an ever wide-awake observation
of nature. Country life for me, mother. Mr. Edward
Rice is our head clerk. He wears a gold chain and
satin waistcoat, and so on, and has a very
genteel
air,
which Mr. Holson thinks attracts customers;
underbred
ones I rather think it does; but the coarse-grained
wood shows through the high varnish. The gold chain
notwithstanding, Mr. Edward refused yesterday to
subscribe
a sixpence for a sick clerk whom Holson had
turned off. I doubt if he had a sixpence. When I
put down half a dollar, he raised his eyebrows till
I thought they would roll over the other side, and
he said, `Flush for a freshman! Straws show which
way the wind blows.' I knew he meant to intimate
a suspicion against me. I felt hot. I did not speak,
but I looked him steadily in the eye; his fell, and
I walked off to my business, satisfied that he felt
hotter than I. But I like even him, I like them all,
better than Holson himself.
I have told you, my dear mother, that I did not
like Holson. I like him less and less every day. Kind
Mrs. Dawson has been blinded by his intensely obliging
manner to customers. If she could see behind the
scenes, she would be disgusted with his selfishness,
his rapacity, his ill-temper, and tyranny. To me, his
sycophancy to his customers, and his mean ways, are
most revolting  sometimes ludicrous. If a lady ask
for pink silk, and he has not it, he tries to persuade her
that red is pink, or that cherry is more fashionable
than pink, or crimson richer, or scarlet more becoming;
and the worst of it is, he does persuade half the
women. Yesterday he was outwitted. A lady was
looking at the silks. She fixed her attention on one.
Holson, who is very quick at detecting a lady's fancies,
thought it was a sure nibble, as poor Clapham used to
say; and, as usual, he set to work to obviate whatever
objections she might raise against it. I must say,
ladies are pretty ingenious at this. `Quite a
charming
thing that,' he said; `just opened. I bought the
only case of these silks in this city.' `I saw the
same pattern at Beck's,' said the lady, dryly. `Ah,
indeed! did you? Possibly Mr. Beck imports.' He
tried another bait, often successful. `I sold a dress
off this to Miss Liston.' `Indeed!' exclaimed the lady;
`but what Miss Liston?' `Really, I don't quite know.'
`Then I cannot buy it, and run the dreadful risk of
its being Miss Liston, the grocer's daughter, and not
Miss Liston of the Fifth Avenue. In short, Mr. Holson,
I prefer to be a leader, and not a follower.'
`Ah  indeed  very good!' said the fellow, with
one of his odious convulsive little titters. `Upon my
word, I think this piece has not been cut, after all.
Rice, it was quite a different thing Miss Liston bought?'
`Quite,' said Rice, and Miss Liston was dismissed.
`I was looking for a fatigue dress,' said the lady,
still hovering over the same piece of silk. `Just the
thing, then, madam; you see it is dust-color, adapted
for riding or walking.' `It must be suitable for an
evening dress,' persisted the lady. `Exactly, madam.
A change of ribbons and a lace cape  we have loves
just opened  makes it an evening dress at once.'
`I was looking for a summer silk '
`Just the thing, ma'am.'
`But,' she said, chopping round again, `I always
buy a silk for wear.'
`Of course, ma'am, of course. You see this is
quite solid.'
`How do you think it will do for travelling, Mr.
Holson?' `Admirably;
the
thing. A mantilla over it.
we have them at all prices  makes it quiet at once!'
Still the lady did not come to the desired point,
and Holson, hardly concealing his impatience, said,
`What objection
can
you make to it, ma'am?'
`None in the world,' she replied, coolly turning
on her heel, and walking out of the shop, `but that
it does not suit my fancy!'
It was not very dignified for a lady to play at
his own game with Holson; but, I confess, I was
pleased to see him beaten, and I betrayed my
satisfaction
by a smile. Holson saw it. I was standing
at his elbow; and he looked like a thunder-cloud,
and he has been more testy to me than usual ever
since.
Yesterday, an intelligent looking gentleman came
into the shop, and introduced himself to Holson as
one of the trustees of the Mercantile Library. He said,
16
looking round upon us, that he had taken advantage
of a rainy day, when he believed he should not
interrupt
us, to call and solicit our subscriptions, or
rather to offer us an opportunity to subscribe to the
`Mercantile Library Association.' He presumed most
of the young men in so prosperous an establishment
as Mr. Holson's were acquainted with the institution;
but those that were not, he would inform that it
comprised a good library, carefully selected, and a
reading-room warmed and lighted, to which any clerk
could obtain access every evening by paying an
initiation
fee of one dollar, and two dollars annual
subscription
.
This also entitles him to draw a book from the
library every week. He then went on to say to
Holson, that of course every gentleman at the head
of such an establishment as his, must feel a deep
responsibility
for the young men in his employment,
and under his guardianship; that he must feel
painfully
anxious to shield them from the temptations
incident to idle hours in a large city; and to
provide
for them innocent and profitable occupation.
`The retail shop,' he said, `was often the threshold
to a high commercial position, and it was very
important
to the young men to be furnishing their
minds with the knowledge befitting an honorable
station; that the time had gone, or was going by,
when merchants and traders were looked down upon
by an idle class; that our merchants were our princes,
and they should show the world what stuff princes
should be made of. He said that every American
lad should know what was requisite to make a man
a man; fine clothes were not; fine friends were not;
but probity and a well-informed mind were. The
first every merchant would be careful to inculcate
for his own sake, by precept and example, (mercy,
mother! he did not know Holson,) and to promote
the last, the Mercantile Library had been instituted.
He hoped the young men would be as eager to
subscribe as he was desirous to have them.' He
first presented his paper to poor
Deacon
Carey, as the
boys call our book-keeper  a thin, pale, and man,
both bald and gray. He shook his head, and
declined
;
but said, respectfully, `I have neither money
nor time, sir; if I had I would subscribe, if it were
only for the sake of my lame son.' The stranger
bowed, and passed on to Mr. Rice. Rice shrugged
his shoulders, and said books were so cheap it was
not worth his while. `But,' urged the stranger, `you
will have the advantage of a reading-room, open,
lighted, and warmed till ten o'clock in the evening.'
`A gay place!' said Rice, with a contemptuous
curl of his lip. I never saw a calmer tempered man
than this gentleman; he did not seem in the least
nettled
.
Without paying the slightest attention to Rice's
sneer, he said, `There is a greater variety of reading,
and better selected, in the library than you will find
in the cheap prints; and besides, these
cheap prints
are
a tremendous expense to your eyes.' Rice shrugged
his shoulders and shook his head, and Holson said,
`Pass on, sir, if you please; pass on. The boys are
wasting time.' Wasting time! Mother, I believe
Holson
thinks time was given to spend in making money,
and for nothing else. As it proved, the gentleman's
good arguments, though lost on Rice, had their effect
on the rest. Six out of the twelve set down their
names; I among the six. Now, mother, don't you
and Annie stare as did Holson and Edward Rice.
Let Annie cast up my account.
Travelling expenses,
50
Subscription to the sick clerk,
50
Initiation fee,
1 00
I could afford to subscribe. I have three dollars
remaining of my five. I hope to earn something over
and above my salary before the year is out; but if
I do not, I have enough in reserve to pay my library
fees, and one dollar for extras. O, one thing I must
not forget to tell you, it pleased me so much. I
signed last, and was at the desk, returning the pen to
Mr. Carey, when the gentleman said to him, `Put your
name down. I will see to the fees for this year at
least, and I dare say this young man' (looking at me)
`will take the trouble to draw out the books for your
lame boy.' Mr. Carey smiled,  the first smile I have
seen on his face since I have been in Holson's shop;
and he looked cheerful all day. It is pleasant for
those who have money to go round buying smiles
and cheerfulness for those whose fate is hard, like poor
Carey's. Don't you think so, mother?
Harry had many vexations to endure, of which he
made no report to his mother. Those clerks,  at their
head Edward Rice,  who took airs on themselves, put
all odd jobs on Harry, and he was sometimes kept at
the shop till nine, ten, and eleven o'clock, though the
nominal hour of closing it was eight. He was patient,
because he was manly, and determined not to fret
about trifles. Trifles he called them; but they
deprived
him of his greatest enjoyment  his reading, and
his pleasant social hours at his happy home. A much
more serious trouble to him was the continual
displeasure
and fault-finding of Holson. It's all your fault,
he said, Davis, that Eugene Nevis has left the shop.
Not that I care for the rascal; I can get twenty better
clerks in his place; but it's your (we omit the word
with which he graced it)  country notions. His
relations were good customers, and now they have all
quit, for he has told his own story.
Nevis did tell his own story, which was, that,
stimulated
by Harry Davis's example, he had absolutely
refused to make the false representations which
Holson
insisted on as the common course of business.
That common course was, to say to a lady, You
had better buy this dress now, ma'am; it's the last we
have of it; when, perhaps, there were half a dozen
pieces of the same on the shelf; or, I sold this
muslin yesterday for five shillings, which I now offer
to you for four. You will not find another velvet so
cheap as this in New York, &c., &c.; and uniformly
to assure the buyers that every article was offered
below cost. A lady was one day looking at an
expensive
muslin, and said to Harry, I doubt this
color. Do you know if it washes?
No, it does not, ma'am.
She looked surprised at his unexpected frankness,
and smiled.
Thank you, she said, and left the shop.
Holson
was engaged with a customer, but Harry perceived
that he overheard and oversaw the transaction. He
took the first opportunity of abusing Harry outrageously.
He would have struck him, if he had dared. Soon
after, another customer came, to whom Holson
himself
showed the same muslin. She asked the same
troublesome question. O, I'll warrant it, said
Holson
.
Thereupon the lady took it, and, on the faith
of Mr. Holson's warranty, brought it back the next
day. Holson said, Of course he would take it back;
but the lady must take something else out of his
shop. She had no occasion for any thing else. She
wanted nothing but a muslin gown. There was no
redress without more trouble than it was worth, and
she retained the fading
warranted
muslin.
CHAPTER XII.
THE BOOK-KEEPER.
Deep malice makes too deep incision.
The
spring business had begun, and Harry was
more than ever confined to the shop. He
became
pale, and every day paler and thinner. He
dreamed of country breezes, swelling buds, early
flowers, and the full spring chorus of birds; but,
instead of all this, he was waked by the harsh
sound of the first wheel rolling over the pavement.
He hurried to the shop, not to leave it, at night,
till he could scarcely drag his weary limbs home.
His kind hostesses became anxious about him. Miss
Peace advised a blue pill taken twice a week, as
rulable in the spring; and Plenty, when Harry
shook his head at this, suggested that camomile tea,
three times a day, would strengthen him. But Harry
17
insisted that nothing would do this, if not the good
bread and meat of their table. How and when he
should pay for this bread and meat, now wore upon
him more than his work and confinement. When
his quarter's salary became due, Holson had put him
off; and, when Harry repeated his request for his
dues, and urged the necessity of paying his board,
Holson told him that if he did not wait till it was
convenient to pay him, he might whistle for his
money; that he could get clerks enough without
wages. Unfortunately, Harry had no written contract;
and Mrs. Dawson, the only person whose testimony
could aid him, had suddenly gone to the West Indies
for health. No word or sign from the good sisters
intimated that Harry was behindhand; but he was
too honest, too manly, to continue to be a charge to
them, and he resolved, if Holson did not pay him at
the end of the six months, which would now be in two
days, he would leave his employment, and get another,
even if it were domestic service, that would enable
him to pay his debt. His painful impatience was
increased by hearing old Mrs. Bland say to Mary
Hale, I never saw your aunts wear their old
bonnets
out on Easter Sunday before. What is the
reason? Why, said Mary, I am sure, Mrs.
Bland, aunts' bonnets look very decent. Yes,
decent; but, in twenty years, I have never known
them go to church, on Easter Sunday, with their old
bonnets. The reason is, grandmother, said blind
Nannie Bland  Hush, Nannie! said Mary; but
the little girl either did not hear or did not heed.
Aunty Peace says that they have not any money
till Harry pays them. O Nannie! said Mary,
deprecatingly. Her eyes met Harry's. He smiled,
but it was a smile of the deepest mortification.
Mary understood it, and felt tears of sympathy
coming, and she left the room. Harry followed her,
and explained his embarrassment; and Mary begged
him not to be troubled, and said, in their kind spirit,
that her aunts would rather never have new bonnets
than he should leave them. This was quite true,
and this might have been the consequence to them,
for they had scarcely an unappropriated shilling.
Their income was one thousand dollars. With this
they maintained in independence their comfortable
little establishment. They boarded their old friend,
widow Bland, for just enough to cover the expense,
throwing in, as they termed it, blind Nannie; she
being such an interesting child, it was only a
pleasure
;
and she ate like a Canary. They supported
their three orphan nieces; many an old friend was
welcomed to their hospitable table. They rented a
pew in the church their parents attended before them,
took a weekly paper, a religious magazine, and
subscribed
to two charitable societies. Had they not
more enjoyment from money with their one thousand
dollars, than some rich men with their millions?
Truly, contentment with godliness
is
great gain.
Harry's affairs were approaching a crisis. Till
this should be past, he had resolved to make no
mention of his anxieties to his mother.
There was one person in Holson's shop, a far
greater sufferer than Harry. This was Carey, the
book-keeper. He was an amiable man, rather
inefficient
from protracted ill health, and timid from
continued
misfortunes. His wife was a feeble woman,
and his children sickly. His whole life had been
under a dreary, leaden sky. He had ceased to hope,
but always looked for something worse.
At a period of uncommon pressure to poor Carey,
and of elated prosperity to Holson, he had lent his
book-keeper a few hundred dollars; and, from that
time, he had kept him under the harrow.
Whenever
he had any purpose to gain, he would threaten
to withhold his salary, or to seize his furniture to
satisfy the debt. For two or three weeks, Harry
had observed that Carey was unusually dejected; that
he was every evening behindhand with his books;
and, one evening, after watching him going over and
over the same column of figures, and then leaning
dejectedly on his elbow, he said, modestly, to Carey,
You do not seem quite well, sir. I am a pretty
good accountant; perhaps I can assist you.
You are very kind, replied Carey; perhaps
you can. I have made some mistake here. I
cannot
detect it. I believe I am losing my head.
O, no, said Harry, cheerfully; go and sit on
that old sofa at the end of the shop, and rest your
head. Rest is all it wants, and that it wants enough.
Poor Carey went, stiff and languid, and with but
half a man's life in him. Harry soon detected the
error, and rectified the figures.
It is all right, Mr. Carey, he said. Can I
do any thing else?
O, thank you, yes. If you will look at the two
last pages of last week's accounts, you will see they
are not footed. But it will keep you too late; you
too are tired.
Not sick-tired, as you are; not at all too tired
to do this. You take a little doze, and I will wake
you when it's done.
So Harry went to work with a clear head and
willing heart; and, in an hour's time, the accounts,
that were the despair of the poor old book-keeper,
were adjusted, and he went behind the screen to
wake Carey. He was not sleeping; he was too
care-worn
and anxious to sleep. The tears came in his
eyes when he thanked Harry. I do not know your
match, he said; you are one by yourself, Harry
Davis. But there seemed no sense of relief; the
spring of his mind was broken. After a minute, he
rose, walked slowly to the desk, locked it, and left
the shop in complete absence of mind, without even
bidding Harry good night.
The next day, Harry's salary fell due, and he took
an opportunity of reminding Holson of it. Holson
said it was not convenient to pay it, and he must
wait. Harry said, manfully, he could
not
wait.
Holson
replied, he should wait and do nothing else.
Harry then said, calmly, I shall leave your
service
this evening, Mr. Holson. Holson stared.
And a pretty box you'll be in, he said.
There's no other such fool as I, to engage to give
a raw boy wages. I'll give you no character.
Harry, though a modest young man, was not to be
bullied out of his rights, or his self-possession.
No character that you could give would be of
service to me, Mr. Holson, he said, calmly; but I
have friends.
Who, who, who? cried Holson, angrily
interrupting
him.
The good, honest people I live with.
He! he! he! the old maids!
And, resumed Harry, Mr. Nevis,  Eugene
Nevis's father.
What, Mr. Russel Nevis?
The same  father of the clerk who left you
after I came. Perhaps you have forgotten him.
Holson bit his lips with vexation.
You
know
Mr. Russel Nevis! I don't believe a word of it.
I have dined with him every Sunday for the last
month, and he has invited me to continue to do so,
till he goes to the country.
A pretty figure you must cut at Mr. Nevis's
table, said Holson, his eyes reconnoitring Harry's
dress insultingly. Harry stood his ground
unflinchingly
.
Holson's temper was boiling; but, with all
his blustering, his passion, and his love of tyranny,
he was wary and cautious. He was conscious that
Mr. Nevis was a powerful friend, and that he had no
good opinion of him. He was certain Harry spoke
pure truth, for he had never been able, by menace
or persuasion, to induce him to deviate from it;
and, more than all, he was aware that Harry was the
best clerk in his shop, the most solicitous to perform
his duty to him, and most acceptable to his customers;
and therefore, when Harry said again, decidedly, If
you do not pay me my salary to-day, you have
violated
your contract, and I am released from mine,
and shall leave you. Holson, without saying another
word, gave him a draft for the fifty dollars. A knave
is no match for an honest man, if he be capable.
Mr. Holson, said Harry, in the same firm voice
he had sustained through the interview, I consider
myself released from my engagement with you, by
your failure to perform your part of the contract.
You have subjected me to mortification, and my
friends to inconvenience, by failing to pay me when
my money was due. I shall consult my friend, Mr.
Nevis, and shall be governed by his advice, either to
remain with you the remaining six months, or to leave
you on Monday.
Holson stared at Harry as if he were something he
did not comprehend. His anger rose, but he felt that,
if he gave way to it, it would be like the wave beating
against a rock, and, muttering a curse, he turned away.
What gave such power to a poor country boy?
High and right aims. Not an aim at riches or
external
distinctions of any sort, but an aim to be true
in all the relations of life; to act up to the
convictions
of his due; to resist temptations, small and
great; and to develop his faculties by all the means
allotted to him. Thus fortified with the true spirit
of a man, a knave could not oppress, nor a flashy
clerk look him out of countenance.
It was Saturday, bad weather, and a dull day in
the shop. Holson was more irritable than usual,
abusing some of the clerks, and fretting at all.
Harry observed him repeatedly speaking earnestly
to Carey, and that Carey made no reply, and looked
even more wretched, more ill, more dejected, than
ever before.
Poor deacon! said one of the clerks, jogging
Harry's elbow; do look at him, rubbing his forehead,
and his eye wandering about as if he saw nothing;
I should not wonder if he were to cut his throat.
Nor should I, said Harry, with a sigh of deep
compassion. He turned, and saw Holson at his elbow,
and was sure, from a certain conscious look, that he
had heard him.
Saturday evening was busier than any other
evening
of the week. Harry had got every thing in
order, and waited an hour for Carey to be done.
He then asked him if he could assist him. No,
said Carey, nobody can help me. My poor wife!
My poor children! He laid his head down on his
desk, and gave way to a flood of tears.
O Mr. Carey, said Harry, you are tired out
you are used up.
Carey shook his head. It is not that, he said.
Tell me what it is, then, said Harry; or tell
some other friend. My mother always says there is
no burden that can't be lightened by a friend's
helping
you bear it.
You are kind. Carey raised his head, and wiped
away his tears. I have got to be a mere child.
There's no use in struggling any longer.
Do go home now, Mr. Carey, and let me come
and see you to-morrow.
No, I cannot go home yet; but you must go.
Leave the key, and come to-morrow to my house and
get it. It always does poor Johnny good to see you.
It is too late to do me good. Harry saw he was
not to be persuaded, and he took his hat and bade
him good night.
Soon after, there was a knock at the door. Carey
opened it, and Holson came in; and, as soon as
Carey resumed his seat, he said, as if continuing a
previous conversation, It's all before you now
choose! Break with me, and see who will employ
you Go round and ask for a place with your bent
body, and blue lips, and hands shaking like the
palsy.
It's serving you, and serving you faithfully, Mr.
Holson, that's bent my body and made my hands
shake.
Have not I paid you for it?  lent you money
too?
Yes, replied Carey, speaking with a little more
spirit; and that's been the chain that bound me
down to this desk, and you knew it. It may be as
well broken now as ever.
And you, and your wife, and your children,
starving
in a bunch  hey, Carey? Holson spoke in a
softer and more persuasive tone, as he added, Don't
be a fool. I say again, do what I want of you;
there is no risk to you,  no risk, and great gain.
I will give you up your note to me, and a check
for two hundred dollars! There was no answer from
Carey but a deep-drawn sigh; and Holson went on
to particularize exactly what he wanted done, which
was an alteration of certain entries in the accounts,
in order to cover a fraudulent transaction of his, which
was on the eve of detection. The change could only
be made by the hand that had kept the accounts.
Let it be well done, and soon done, Carey, he
concluded. Promise me, only promise me, that you
will come here to-morrow and do it. I will trust to
your word, and give you up, on the spot, your note
and the check. Yes, I'll make the check three
hundred, and trust entirely to your truth, if you give
me the promise.
To my truth, Mr. Holson! Then there's
something
left, thank God! I have not worked and
suffered
like a dog for nothing! He laughed loud
and unnaturally, and then, recovering himself, he stood
up, and speaking courageously, and with fresh life, he
said, I'll not do it  never! If all else is gone,
truth and honesty are left. We may starve. God's
will be done. I have decided, Mr. Holson.
Holson walked up and down the shop hurriedly.
He then returned to the desk, and said, in a
determined
voice, I have decided, too. I did not come
here, to-night, till I had fully revolved this subject,
and made up my mind what to do. I knew you
were a fool, and I thought you might be obstinate.
I prepared two strings to my bow. One was put into
my head by overhearing something that passed between
John Bell and that cursed fellow Davis. They both
thought your mind shaken, and that you were on the
point of committing suicide. If you are found dead
at this desk to-morrow morning, I shall summon these
boys before the inquest, and the verdict will surely be,
`Throat cut by his own hand!' Here is a knife, and
I swear I'll finish you, unless you promise me instantly
not one breath's delay  yes, or no?
Holson was a desperate man. Ruin  utter
disgrace
stared him in the face, and disappointment,
rage, and vengeance, hurried him on. Carey's knees
knocked together. Yes, or no? reiterated Holson.
Carey's tongue was parched with fear and horror.
He tried to utter no; he could not move his
lips.
Speak! cried Holson, holding up the knife.
God gave his servant strength; he said, audibly
and clearly, No!
Holson seized Carey by the throat. He gasped;
he could not make a sound. At that moment,
Harry Davis sprang on Holson, grasped him by the
collar, and released Carey, who sank, fainting, to the
floor. Holson staggered back to the wall, stunned
with the horror of detection, powerless and silent.
There was a glass of water on the desk; Harry
dashed it in Carey's face, and reanimated him with a
voice of encouragement. Fear nothing, he said;
the danger is past. Come with me; lean on me. I
will see you safe home. After some effort; Carey
rallied and left the shop with Harry.
It was probable that Holson had expected to
intimidate
Carey into compliance, and had not
deliberately
planned his murder; but to what extremity
he might have been urged by his savage and roused
passion, if Harry had not interposed, it is impossible
to say.
It may be remembered that Harry, after offering
his assistance to Carey in settling his accounts, bade
him good night. He was so struck with the
expression
of despair on the poor man's countenance, that,
instead of going away, he turned, unperceived, and
stole back to a sofa, screened from observation by a
curtain, so arranged that Holson might take his lunch
there when detained at the shop by a pressure of
business. There Providence stationed Harry as a
guardian angel to poor Carey.
CHAPTER XIII.
LIFE IN JAIL  A SURPRISE.
My son, thou art yet to be tried upon the earth, and to be exercised
in many things.
We
left Clapham reposing with the peace of good
resolutions. They gained force from the
steadying
effect of sleep. The next morning Hunt and
Slocum renewed their solicitations. They did not care
for him, or his companionship; but they coveted the two
or three dollars which he had earned in the ring trade,
and they believed he was already in their toils.
Clapham
returned a civil but firm refusal to their soft
words, and they desisted, Slocum saying to Hunt,
Never mind now; a week or two more will limber
him. Nothing like jail life to take
vartu
starch out
of folks.
It was just after this last resistance, and Clapham
18
secretly felt that it was a reward for it, that he espied,
among the rubbish swept into a corner of the room,
the fragments of a pamphlet giving an account of the
disasters and wreck of the ship Commerce, on her
return
from New Spain to the port of New York.
Clapham had had one winter's schooling, during one
of his father's long absences from home, and he had
then learned to read and spell words of two syllables.
By an hour's effort, he made out the title. It struck
on his memory, and recalled many adventures he had
heard his father relate of a certain ship Commerce in
which he had been wrecked when a child. Here,
Clapham thought, was a chance of learning to read, if
he would work hard; and, stimulated by his curiosity
to ascertain if the pamphlet really contained the stories
recounted by his father, he set to the task. The print
was small and blurred, and, in many places, rendered
quite illegible by dirt-stains. The first two pages were
merely prefatory, and filled with commercial and
nautical
terms, which greatly increased Clapham's difficulty.
He persevered, however, and in one week he read
these two pages. And, though many a time his head
ached, and his eyes were misty, it was by far the
shortest and pleasantest week he had passed since
Deleau left the jail. The next week, he went on
better; and now he came to the incidents, in a different
form, of which his father had retained and related his
indistinct impressions. The name of Felix Hale,
second mate, frequently recurred. His daring in
various
exploits was noted; his fair dealing and
generosity
to the crew were dwelt on; and the particulars of
his death, which occurred during a contest with a
privateersman, in defending a woman, the only
passenger
in the ship, were minutely given. The account of
him concluded as follows: Thus, by a fatal stab in
the back, we lost the best man in the ship  honest
to his last farthing; true to his last word; brave as
Julius Csar; and tender-hearted as a woman. He had
married in New Spain, and his wife died there, leaving
a son, whom he was bringing to New York. When
the Commerce was wrecked, and we escaped by night,
in the long-boat, this little chap was asleep below with
old Norman Dunn, who had adopted him, and given
him his name. The boat was already overloaded, and,
as the man was old, and always drunk when ashore,
and the boy would be better off in Abraham's bosom,
all hands agreed not to wake them. The Commerce
was never heard of after.
Clapham spelt through these last sentences, his
heart throbbing as if it would leap from his bosom.
He recalled distinctly Norman's graphic description of
awaking one morning, and finding himself alone on the
wreck of the vessel with his father, (the old sailor who
adopted him,) and his saying that, after a few days'
heaving
about, they were taken off and carried to England.
He seemed to have forgotten his real father, with whom
he had had brief intercourse. The rough old sailor took
him from port to port, and finally, dying at sea, the
boy was sent to a small seaport on Long Island Sound,
in Connecticut. There, at the age of eleven years, a
solitary and dropped link from the chain of humanity,
he was found by the overseers of the poor, and sent
to school. He could not bear its restraints, and ran
away into the interior; and from that time he led a
roving and lawless life.
To return to Clapham. He was assured that this
Felix Hale was his grandfather; that there was good
blood in his veins; that his grandfather was a true
and honest man, honored and loved. It was a proud
and happy day for the poor boy, and many and many
a time he said over to himself, Felix Hale's blood
is in my veins. I know it is. I always did hate to
lie and steal, like poison.
Again and again he read over the fragmentary
leaves. He had them every word by heart. After
that, the reading naturally became tiresome. Again he
besieged Plum to give him something to do, and again
was surlily repulsed. Again he besought a book of
the jailer, and was again denied. Two weeks more of
idleness passed away. His health suffered. The room,
never ventilated, was noisome. His head continually
ached, or had a heavy, confused feeling, worse than
pain.
Slocum and Hunt never forgot Clapham's money.
Their appetite for rum and tobacco reminded them of
it; and one unhappy day for Clapham, when he was
looking paler and more haggard than usual, his eyes
half closed, and his neglected leaves lying beside him,
Slocum called to him, Come, Clap, draw up, and look
on; there's no harm in that, my man. We'll be
frindly, the same as if you'd never snubbed us.
I may as well! thought Clapham; I shall die
lying here, hearing nothing, seeing nothing, nothing to
do. I have tried my best. He had tried manfully;
but no one should ever cease trying. He drew near
to them. It was this first movement that led to the
evil that followed. Resist the devil and he will flee
from you. But resist to the end. Clapham looked
over that game, and another, and another. He began,
unconsciously, to feel an interest, and, as soon as he
perfectly comprehended the game, to hope that Hunt,
whom he disliked less than Slocum, would win. There
was usually a small bet pending. The pies, nuts,
tobacco, and cakes, received from their outside friends,
supplied the means of making them.
The second day, he answered to their invitation
more promptly. I go not harm yesterday, he thought,
and why should I to-day? It does make the time
pass.
You are a smart lad, Clap, said Slocum, after
Clapham had been looking on an hour or two. I'll
bet you, Hunt, he could play a game now, without a miss.
He play! Your granny, as well, replied Hunt,
with an air of great contempt.
Well, I'll bet on him. Try, just once, Clap.
Clapham, provoked by Hunt doubting his capacity,
took the cards.
What's the use of betting with me? said Hunt;
I've got nothing, and less. What do you say, Clap,
for our side. Will you venture six cents against Slo's
six apples? You've the chink, you know. Come, don't
hold back, don't be tight. We are all, but you, as
poor as church mice. Well, if you are so close, twelve
apples to your six cents.
I don't care for the six cents, said Clapham.
He hesitated from a foolish dread of their redicule,
if he told them he did not like to bet. He had sense
enough to fear that betting would draw him in to play
more with them. But never mind; it is but once,
he thought; just to see if I can play without a miss;
and I don't want them to think me mean. He took
the cards.
Ah, Clapham, if you had but thought then, The
thing is to do right, and then it matters not what
others
say or think. They had caught him. Clapham
took the cards; they exchanged winks, and he
proceeded
to give his whole mind to the game. He
played it right, and won it, and won the apples into
the bargain. He felt the pleasure of excitement. It
was a new world to him. No more consciousness of
headache; no more drowsiness, nor dulness. He
continued
playing till it was so dark he could not see a
spot on the cards. Slocum and Hunt were
good-natured
all day. After they had instructed Clapham
in All Fours, they taught him Loo; and Clapham
dreamed all night of Flusher, and Blaser, of
Great Loo and Little Loo; and when he arose in
the morning, he was as eager to go to the cards as
they were to have him.
Betting was now a regular thing with every game.
Clapham had resolved not to stake more than six cents
at a time. That, he thought, was a small risk; and,
as they won his money, they staked cash against cash.
Clapham lost oftener than he won; but he was not
aware how much the luck run against him, till towards
the close of the week, when, on counting over his
money, he found but fifty cents remaining.
He had scarcely won a game that day. A
suspicion
of foul play dawned upon him. He began to
realize that gaming was a bad business for him, and,
like many older gamblers, he resolved that, as soon as
he had won back his money, or detected the fraud he
suspected, he would give up playing. I must, at any
rate, he said to himself, hold on till I find out if
they cheat me. They had gone on cheating so
successfully
that they were not on their guard. Game
followed game, and on each Clapham lost his
sixpence
.
He became almost sure that he perceived
where the fraud was. His heart beat so that he was
afraid they would perceive it; but he kept himself
apparently cool till he was certain, and then, striking
Slocum's cards out of his hands, he exclaimed, It's no
play. You've cheated in the deal. I saw you!
You lie! cried Slocum.
Let him lie! said Hunt. Here is his last
sixpence
.
We've wound him up.
19
You've cheated me out of my money, and I'll
get it again, said Clapham, irritated by his losses,
by their cheating, and still more by their triumph.
Take that, said Slocum, spitting on him; that's
all you'll get again. Clapham sprang to his feet,
and struck Slocum a blow in the face that made the
blood spout from his nose. Enraged, he flew at
Clapham. Clapham did not give an inch, and, striking
blow after blow, they came to the floor together.
There was a general uproar in the room. The
cardtable
was overthrown; a jug of rum was overturned
and spilled; the cards were scattered; pennies and
apples rolled over the filthy floor. One man cried
out that it was not fair play. Man against boy.
Hunt declared no one should interfere; and such was
the hubbub that no one was conscious that the door
was opened, and that the jailer entered, followed by a
young man, till the visitor said, in a thrilling voice,
Clapham Dunn!
and Clapham sprang from Slocum
to his feet. His flushed face turned deadly pale, and,
staggering to the wall, he groaned out, O Harry
Davis!
His eye met Harry's. He turned away his face,
and leaned against the iron bars of the window.
Harry did not see the hot tears that streamed over his
cheeks. He saw nothing but the signs of his
degradation
and ruin. His long, dark, curling hair was a
snarled mass, gray with lint and dust; his begrimed
skin had that sallow, dingy, parchment hue infallibly
contracted in a neglected prison. His clothes, none
of the best when he left his wretched home, had
not been since changed, and were now black, greasy,
stiff, and ragged at all points. The mountain friend,
the boy of Rhigi's lovely woods, with his shining curls
and ruddy cheeks, and voice ringing out clear as the
birds that sang around him, the favorite of little
Lucy, passed, for one moment, in vision before Harry.
His eye ran over the disgusting apartment; his head
turned, and he became sick and faint. It was partly
the fetid air of the room, but more the shock of
his disappointment. He turned back into the passage,
and the jailer relocked the door. The sound struck
like a sentence of final judgment on Clapham's ear,
and he fell senseless on the floor.
CHAPTER XIV.
A DYING CONFESSION.
Justice, alas! has given him o'er,
And money's day is gone.
We
are compelled to recede three weeks in our
story, to the moment of Harry's exit, with the
poor book-keeper, from Holson's shop. Harry half
supported, half dragged him to his melancholy home
an upper story of a small house in Mulberry Street.
His wife, sick in body and feeble in mind, was
incapable
of assisting him; his children, excepting the
lame boy, too young, and he too weak to help
himself
.
So Harry was compelled to remain till late the
next morning. Carey was in a state of stupor which
the physician said threatened paralysis. That only
could be averted by care; and care he had, unsparing
care, from Harry. He brightened about twelve, and
Harry hastened home to render an account of himself.
The door was opened by Mary Hale, who was
evidently
on the watch.
O Harry! she exclaimed, where have you
been? Aunts will be so glad!
And you did not care at all, Mary, what became
of me?
Harry Davis! she exclaimed, reproachfully; and
she ran, blushing, away to proclaim his return to
aunts Peace and Plenty.
Such was their anxiety at Harry's unaccountable
absence, that neither of the good ladies had gone to
church  a thing, as they said, that had not
happened
before in their lifetime.
Harry's next movement was to call on Mr. Nevis,
and confide to him the scene in Holson's shop. Mr.
Nevis immediately proceeded to Holson's, accompanied
by a police officer, but Holson was gone. He had
absconded during the night, (having first burned his
books,) with such of his effects as he could take with
him. The next day, his gay shop windows were
closed, the door barred, and the ominous words, To
let, advertised the public that the incessant
importunities
,
the false showings, and petty frauds of John
Holson were at an end; that the most laborious
industry
,
without integrity, will not prosper; that, in
short,
dishonesty is the worst policy
.
We give another extract from a letter of Harry's.
It seems to me, dear mother, that I have lived a
year in the last fortnight. On the very Monday that
I sent you an account of the upshot at Holson's, Mr.
Nevis obtained the promise of an excellent situation
for me with Messrs. James Bent & Co., where his
son, my friend, already is. Mr. Bent is respected as
a man of strict integrity, and every part of his
establishment
is well conducted; and I am to have a salary
of $150. Only imagine how rich I shall be! `It
never rains, but it pours!' Coming out of Mr. Bent's,
who should I meet but Mr. Lyman! He has more
work on hand than he can do,  making plans and
drawings for the first architect in the city,  and he
wanted me to help him. Never was any thing more
opportune. The place I am to have at Mr. Bent's
will not be vacant till next month, and now I can be
earning something; and, to tell the truth, mother, I do
need a little fitting up for summer.
Dear mother, I am really enjoying myself now,
as much as I think one can ever enjoy in a city. I
am afraid I shall never feel at home here, but I really
am happy now. I am drawing all day, and all the
evening. I get a book from the Mercantile Library,
and Mary Hale reads aloud. We are reading now
Irving's Columbus,  one of the most charming books
ever written,  and Mary's reading is like setting it
to music. Mother, her voice is the sweetest you ever
heard. It reminds me of little Lucy's. And when
she sits under the lamp, the light shining on her
beautiful brown hair and white forehead, I  I can
hardly keep my eyes on my drawing. Mary has
received
her education at one of the public schools, and
you would be astonished to know how much she has
acquired, and how well. Her good aunts are not fond
of reading; they stay in the little front parlor, where
their tongues go at both ends; but, bless them! they
never speak an evil or an unkind word. Old Mrs.
Bland, who loves a book above every thing, sits in the
back parlor with us and listens, and teaches her poor
little blind grandchild to sew and knit. Would you
not like to look in upon us, dear mother? I should
be perfectly happy if I were out of a city. If I
were, dear mother, where I could see Mount Rhigi,
and hear the sound of a brook; and if  O, what
an if!  if Clapham was what he seemed to us when
little Lucy died, and was out of that old jail.
Extract from a Letter from Harry's Mother
.
Your present, my dear son, was very acceptable,
as a proof of your abiding and ever-thoughtful love;
but do not send me any thing more at present.
Keep your earnings for your summer's outfit. We
want for nothing. Thanks to a kind Providence, my
health is good, and Annie's. There is never lack
of work for willing hands; and our wants, except
for your afflicted father, are small. His cough is
severe, and he declines daily, so that the doctor says
he should not be surprised if he dropped away at
any minute. His appetite continues remarkably. I
might find it difficult to satisfy it, but our kind
neighbors send in daily of their best. We have
plenty of fresh. To-day, dear old Mrs. Allen sent a
quarter of a roaster, and your father ate nearly the
whole of it. You know he was always remarkably
fond of pig. Our neighbors never let him be out of
custards, pies, and preserves. You know, Harry, I
never liked to call on my neighbors for watchers in
sickness, and think that, in most cases, it's much
better doing without them; but father feels different.
He likes company, he says, when he is awake, and I
am no talker. He is able yet to engage his own
watchers. He borrows the sheriff's old horse, and
jogs round after them. I don't oppose, though I
sometimes fear he will die on the road; but it serves
to divert him.
O Harry, you will have feelings when you read
what I have now to write to you! Last evening,
about nine, Norman Dunn was found lying on the
ground, at the tavern steps. At first, they supposed
he was drunk; but it proved that he was sick, worn
out with travelling afoot, and, indeed, nigh unto death.
They got him on to a bed, and, as soon as he
revived
,
he asked to have me sent for. O Harry, he
was an awful sight to behold, with his long, black
beard, and livid face, and swollen eyes. I supposed
he wanted to hear about Massy's death; so I told
him she did not suffer for any thing, and how the
selectmen had her brought down to the village, and
she had good watchers every night, and I was with
her at the last, for the sake of Clapham. He did
not give me the least attention, but kept moving
and worrying till I mentioned Clapham; then he rose
right up, and said, `Stop there; don't talk about
Massy; she's dead, and gone to the dl, for what
I care.' (Only think, Harry, what a hardened sinner!)
`But Clapham! it's for his sake I have dragged here
more dead than alive; and, while breath lasts, let me
tell you how I wronged him. Your own boy, Harry,
was not better than my boy; nor so good; for Clapham
had the devil always at his elbow, and was good in spite
of it. I was the devil to him  I, his father!'
Mrs. Davis then went on to write the particulars
Norman gave of his having forced poor Clapham, in
his childhood, to accompany him on his marauding
expeditions among hen-roosts and clothes-lines. He
then told the whole story of the robbery,  every
particular, every word, with which our readers are
already acquainted,  and, in conclusion, said, And
I let him be accused  my own child, and such a
boy  and be taken off to jail, just because I could not
bear shutting up out of the fresh air. But I have
tried to right him at last  I have. I've walked forty
miles since I thought every step would be my last.
Now let them send for Squire Avery, and you tell
the story, and I'll swear to it, and then I'm done.
The magistrate was immediately sent for, a
deposition
made, and the oath administered to Norman.
After that, he sank away, and died before morning,
without sign of repentance towards God. Unhappy
man!
Mrs. Davis's letter thus concluded: Only think,
my dear son, how we, his best friends, and his true
friends, have wronged this poor boy. I always had
feelings for him. He was somehow bound up in my
heart with little Lucy; and I have daily remembered
him in my prayers. Annie is the happiest girl you
ever saw. She cried for joy. But we must do
something
more than feel, or pray, or cry, Harry. Every
one says that steps should be taken for Clapham;
but no one takes them. What is every body's
business
is nobody's. Now, my son, as you have a week
before you enter on your new clerkship, had you not
best come home and see about getting up a petition
to the governor for Clapham's pardon? I know it
will be an expense, and neither you nor I have spare
shillings. But sometimes we must
not
count the cost.
Annie and I have laid by a few dollars against a
call for mourning, that must soon come; that is at
your service; and you, my son, can wear your old
hat till you can earn a new one; and so, among
us, we can make it out, and neither borrow nor beg.
But I leave you to decide.
Harry did decide, without hesitation; and the very
next day found him at the door of the prison in L.
CHAPTER XV.
THE REUNION.
Sorrow endureth for a night, but joy cometh in the morning.
When
Harry, after his sudden retreat from
Clapham's
presence, recovered his self-possession,
How long, he asked the jailer, has Clapham Dunn
been in this way?
What way?
Why, playing cards, and drinking, and
quarrelling
?
I don't know, I'm sure. They mostly fall to it
as soon as they have a chance. I never noticed the
lad in partic'lar, but they are all birds of a feather;
and I can tell you there's no partic'lar credit in
keeping up an acquaintance with them, in partic'lar,
for young folks that haven't any settled character in
partic'lar. The jailer accompanied his advice with
a knowing wink, which did not make it the more
pleasing to Harry.
I have no fears, he said, about my character
suffering.
O, I dare say not. Young folks are never afeard
of nothing; but see, if you lay dirty clothes and clean
together, the dirty clothes don't get any the cleaner
that ever I heard of, and the clean ones get rather
frouzy. You can't teach me nothing about these kind
of cattle; after they once get under my lock and key,
there's an end on 'em.
Most likely, thought Harry, and that is a reason
why they should be got from under your lock and
key as soon as possible. I still wish to see this
Clapham Dunn, he said.
Well, you must take it out in wishing. I can't
no how attend to you this afternoon. Saturdays is
busy days. I must be going.
I will come again, then, to-morrow morning, early.
You need not trouble yourself to come so very
early, said the jailer, rudely. Sunday is a day of
rest, and I don't turn out with the sun.
Is this the man, thought Harry, as he left the
prison, selected to take charge of the sick  `the
sick and in prison,'  the worst sickness  sickness of
the soul?
On the whole, the delay was no disadvantage,
except that it left poor Clapham pining and
despairing
,
and believing that the last ray of hope had
vanished from him. Harry went to look after a
certain
Mr. Norton, a very flourishing carpenter in L,
a distant relative of his mother. Mr. Norton received
him most kindly, and insisted on his staying at his
house; and, during the evening, they had much
conversation
that had an important influence on Harry's
destiny. Mr. Norton fully sympathized with Harry's
hopes, and encouraged them. Such a boy as you
describe this Clapham, he said, who so early
resisted
bad influences, cannot have been ruined by a
few months in jail, though he may have lost ground.
It is a sad place, I believe.
Have you never been in it, sir? asked Harry,
with some surprise.
No, I never have. He was silent for a
moment
,
and then added, To my shame I confess it,
I never have.
At eight o'clock, the next morning, Harry could
restrain his impatience no longer. He was again at
the jail. After he had waited a long while, the jailer
came, gaping and grumbling. It was trouble enough,
he said, to take care of the rascals, without
waiting
on their comrades.
Harry, without noticing his ill-humor, asked if he
could speak with Clapham alone.
I guess, he answered, it will be a job to get
him to speak at all. One of the fellows told me
he had not spoke nor ate since you was here. Them
that drinks and fights always have their sulky turns.
Harry again asked if he could see Clapham alone,
and the jailer said, yes, there were lock-up places
enough empty, but he should not trust him with his old
mate without turning the key. At this moment, Mr.
Norton, who had followed Harry, entered.
You are quite mistaken in this young man,
Patten, he said; he is a relation of mine. Give
him a decent room to see his acquaintance in, and
while he is talking with him, let me go in to see
your prisoners.
The jailer's manner changed instantly. He went
eagerly for Clapham, and, shaking him, he said, Come,
wake up, uncover your face.
Do let me be, replied Clapham, drawing the
coverlet again over his face.
You do look ghastly! said the jailer. He did.
His face was pale, his lips were blue, and the blood
had mingled with the tears and run over his face,
neck, and hands. You
are
a scarecrow, continued
the jailer; but come; they're wanting you out here.
Who? who wants me? cried the poor boy, now
throwing off the cover and starting up.
That youngster that was here last night.
Has he come? Does he want to speak with me?
exclaimed Clapham, springing to his feet, and towards
the door; and when it was opened, he said not a
word, but he looked Harry steadily in the face, and
his soul was in his eye. Harry grasped his hand,
and Mr. Norton said, almost aloud, There's good
in the Rhigi boy!
20
Two hours passed before Clapham and Harry again
separated; and in that time Clapham related all that
he had suffered, thought, and felt, since they parted
on the mournful day of little Lucy's burial. He did
not try to palliate his fault in the jail. It was Harry
that thought of the palliation. When Harry spoke
of the death of Clapham's parents, a deep gloom
overshadowed
him, and he was silent and downcast for
a few moments; then a sudden gleam lit up his face,
and he said, But, Harry, I have some honest blood
in my veins, and my poor father, perhaps  perhaps
if he had been cared for as I have  if he had had
a Harry Davis for a friend, he might have turned out
very different. Clapham then related how he had
discovered his progenitor. So you see, Harry, he
concluded, I have a fair name to begin upon
Hale. Hale is a good name, isn't it?
Hale! exclaimed Harry, his face lighting up
with an expression Clapham did not quite understand;
Hale is the pleasantest sounding name in the world.
Mary Hale
, if he had spoken the whole truth, he should
have said.
When the boys parted, Clapham said, O Harry,
if all the land on Rhigi had been given to me, and
leave to fish and hunt with you for life, I should
not be so happy as I now am.
Almost as happy as I was, Clapham, replied
Harry, when I received my mother's letter
containing
the account, from your father's lips, of the
robbery
.
I always felt that you had no
heart
in it;
but to know that I could prove my faith by your
works was joy beyond telling.
At this moment, the cup of both boys was
brimming
with well-earned happiness.
Before Harry left L, it was settled between
him and Mr. Norton that Deleau should be written
to for a testimonial of Clapham's good conduct while
Deleau was in the jail. Very favorable testimony Mr.
Norton had already obtained from a sharp questioning
of Hunt, Slocum, and Plum. Prepared with all this
evidence in Clapham's favor, and with the document
made from Norman Dunn's dying confession, Mr.
Norton
did not doubt he should obtain an immediate
pardon from the governor. Ten days after, he wrote
to Harry, My dear young friend, the thing is done.
The governor cheerfully granted the pardon, and
Clapham
Hale
is now my indented apprentice, and a
member of my family. You might, but few others
would, know the Rhigi boy in his new Sunday, or
even his working-day, suit. `He shows blood,' as they
say,  the blood of his grandfather, the high-minded
Felix Hale. We must confess it was somewhat
corrupted
in the veins of Norman Dunn. How much
of the sin of such corruption lies at the door of those
who neglect their duty to orphan and outcast
children
,
is a fearful question.
My dear cousin,  I am proud to call you so,
Harry Davis, your visit to me has done me, as I
humbly hope, great good. I had lived here ten years,
within a stone's throw of this jail, and never seen
the inside of it. I call myself a Christian. I am
a professor. I pray daily in my family for those
who are in the gall of bitterness and bond of
iniquity
,
and yet I have never, till you came here, lifted
one of my fingers to loosen these bonds. I pray that
missionaries, preaching the good news of salvation,
may be sent to the whole human family. I subscribe
to charitable societies,  and so I should, as God has
prospered me,  and yet I have not done the
duty
nearest to me
. If I had, or if my Christian neighbors
had, the scenes of filth, idleness, and iniquity in that
jail would never have existed to witness against us.
I have taken measures to have that rascally jailer
removed. They talk of a disinfecting fluid. There
should be a moral disinfection in the character of the
man who has the care of the tenants of a jail  morally
diseased creatures.
Clapham sends a world of love to you and yours.
He has already begun with his evening school, and
so earnestly that I am sure he will soon be able
to write for himself.
How much I wish that, instead of the uncertain
life of a city merchant, you had chosen to come and
learn with me my good trade, which will thrive as
long as men live in houses. But wherever you are,
God bless you, as He ever does His faithful servants.
Truly, your obliged friend,
Benjamin Norton
.
CHAPTER XVI.
A DECISION.
My good angel held the scales. Ambition and Wealth were in
one scale, Moderation and Contentment in the other. Ambition and
Wealth kicked the beam.
Extracts from Harry Davis's Letters.
Dear Mother
:
It is now three months since
I have been with Mr. Bent; and, excepting
my poor father's death, life has been all smooth
sailing
with me. You have been getting on so nicely!
Clapham
Hale
giving such complete satisfaction to
Mr. Norton, and you and Annie  as appears by
your last letter  surprised with his improved
appearance
and manly bearing. Does he not seem like one
of us?
I have reason every day to feel grateful to Mr.
Nevis for my situation at Mr. Bent's. He is a model
in his department of mercantile life. He requires
of his clerks a strict performance of their duty.
They must be up to the mark; and there is the
strictest supervision of them. They sign a contract
not to go to the theatre, nor to any public places
of amusement, excepting during their holidays, when,
he says, their parents or guardians take the
responsibility
from him. They all have salaries in
proportion
to their capacities for business. Mr. Bent is
quite as exact in his duties to them as in his
requirements
from them. He watches over them like
a parent. If a lad is drooping, he gives him a
holiday. If he detects a fault, he gives a secret and
kind admonition, as if it were his own child he was
dealing with. He sees himself to the young men
having eligible boarding places; he permits no extra
hours, or over-work, unless it is inevitable; he pays
all the salaries on the first of each month; he
subscribes
himself, for the clerks who themselves are
not able to subscribe, to the Mercantile Library; he
gives a kind word of approbation where it is due,
and I think never blames undeservedly; he permits
no puffing of the goods, no false shows of any sort;
we must be assiduous to his customers, civil and
devoted, but never importunate; there is but one
price in his shop. In short, dear mother, he spares
no pains to give us upright characters, and
gentlemanly
deportments, and thus prepares us for an
honorable
career. He does well the duty nearest to him.
My evenings are passed so pleasantly, mother!
Mr. Lyman has been ill in bed for the last month,
and I have had the pleasure of making some return
to him for all his kindness to me, by finishing,
gratuitously
,
the drawing of plans he had begun. I am
always delighted when I have drawing, for then
Mary Hale reads to me. You cannot imagine how
curious she is to see Clapham, ever since she
discovered
that he was a distant relation of hers. Not
so very distant either, as that Mr. Felix Hale was
a brother of her grandfather; so they are second
cousins. `Blood is thicker than water,' say the good
aunts; `and Clapham shall be just as near to us as
any of our nephews.'
The poor little blind child has been frightfully
ill, and Mary Hale was her nurse. I wish, mother,
you could have seen the care she took of her, and
heard her, when she was getting a little better, and
was rather fretful, singing long ballads to her in the
dead of the night, and telling her story after story.
I think, dear mother, you would have loved her as
well  no, not so well as I do; no one ever can
love as I love Mary Hale!
There it is! a secret that has been for months
burning in my heart, and I could not tell it, even
to my mother! Don't laugh at me! don't; don't
reason with me. I know very well that I am not
quite seventeen, and Mary Hale not quite sixteen;
and I do not know whether Mary feels at all as I
do. I sometimes
guess
and hope; but, dear mother,
one thing I am sure of, I shall never be worthy of
her.
In another letter, of three months' later date, Harry
says, Dear mother, this letter will both surprise and
grieve you. Mr. Bent has failed. After fifteen years
of untiring and successful industry, after the most
21
intelligent conduct of his affairs, after having amassed
a fortune on which he intended to retire next year,
he is ruined by no fault, no misjudgment of his
own, but by having heavy responsibilities for other
houses, which, in the common course of trade, he
could not have avoided. He announced the event to
us yesterday, calmly, but with much feeling; and we
all felt as if a great misfortune had happened to
ourselves. Some of the younger boys actually cried,
and the stoutest among us were obliged to wipe our
eyes. It is not merely, mother, the loss of money,
but the loss of so much power so well used.
Our salaries have all been paid. Mr. Bent, with
an expression of approbation that did not make it
easier to part with him, mother, told me he had
secured me a place with a friend of his, and an
advance of a hundred dollars upon my present salary.
You will stare, as did Mr. Bent, when I tell you
that I have taken the offer into consideration till
to-morrow.
I have declined the clerkship, and renounced
city life and mercantile life forever. `Your reasons,
Hal?' You shall have them, my dear mother. From
the beginning, city life has been utterly distasteful to
me. While I was living here, I could not be so
unmanly as to make you uncomfortable with my
discontents
,
and therefore I said nothing about them;
and, in truth, my discontents were rather prospective,
rather from the belief that my destiny was cast in
a city than from my present experience. No country
home could have more social virtue than this to
which a kind Providence guided me; to say nothing
of the rose in my path in perpetual bloom, sweetness,
and freshness. But the everlasting noise and turmoil,
to one who was bred under the shadow of Rhigi,
with no sounds but sweet musical ones from dawn to
dawn; walls of brick and mortar, instead of a
boundless
horizon of beauty; narrow streets, for our planted
fields, our lovely Salisbury lakes, mother, our hill sides,
and our brook; noisome smells, for the pure, sweet
air; and little, wretched yards, for ample space,
and all their country blessings are common bounties,
not restricted to the rich man's hoards, but they are
the poor man's wealth.
Reason No.
1, mother.
From my first experience of retail life in New
York, I took a dislike to it  perhaps from the dose
I took at Holson's. I presume it will not be denied
that men are physically superior to women, and
therefore
they should have employments to develop and
exercise their mortal frames, and leave the retailing
of silks and laces, &c., to women and girls, who are
really more competent to this business than we are.
And what can be more demoralizing, mother, than
life in such a shop as Holson's? There are very
few, I trust, with such rascals for their proprietors;
but there are too many debased by unremitting labor,
by eager, selfish competition, by petty frauds and false
showings.
Reason No.
2.
But there is a commercial life that affords a
field for high intelligence, extensive information, and
munificent action. Yes, but exposed to unforeseen,
inevitable, and cruel reverses. Perhaps my opinions
are affected by the shock of my kind friend Mr.
Bent's misfortunes. Be it so. The uncertainty of
mercantile,  the most uncertain of all uncertain
affairs,  makes my
reason No.
3.
I might, perhaps, attain a large fortune in New
York, but I am not ambitious. I do not think I
have an average share of the go-ahead furor of my
countrymen. I never dreamed of being president of
the United States, governor, judge, or even a member
of Congress,  the prize in most men's lotteries. I
never desired to rise above the condition in which
I was born. That may be your fault, dear mother;
you have been so contented with your lot, and have
made it so respectable and happy. I do not mean
any disrespect to my poor father, but I had early
some teaching on foregoing actual competence for
possible wealth.
I take after you
, dear mother. I am content with
the station in which I was born. My purpose and
hope is to give to it, by moderate labor, the
competence
,
dignity, and happiness, of which it is
susceptible
.
Mary Hale and I were building castles in the
air some weeks since. She said that, build how she
would, hers settled down in some pleasant, country
neighborhood.
Reason No.
4,
and final
.
Dear mother, I have received an answer to a
letter which I wrote to Mr. Norton on Monday. He
accepts, most cordially, my proposition to become his
apprentice; and offers me, besides, the place of
book-keeper
,
which, in his concern, is a light business, but
will give me a support, and the means of adding
something to my dear mother's comforts. With Mr
Norton's letter came one from Clapham. The fellow
is half wild with joy.
Dear mother, do not blame me. I could not
help it. We went down to Greenwood  old Mrs.
Bland, Nannie, and Mary and I; and somehow
Mary and I strayed away by ourselves; and we were
by Sylvan Lake, and the words leaped from my heart
to my lips, and I told her I loved her; and she
confessed she loved me, and was not ashamed of it.
Don't think this is child's play, or youthful
romance. You know I am no novel reader, neither
is Mary Hale. We have loved one another because
we could not help it; and when our hearts were
melted, they ran together and blended in one, like
metal. We shall always be the happier for having one
life from this time forth  the same purpose, the same
hope, the same memory. Mary cannot be better than
she is; but I shall be the better for having this
affection to steady me  to check every wild
inclination
,
to make me hate every impure thought. Mother,
send us your blessing, and we shall be perfectly
happy.
The blessing came, by return of mail, and they
were happy.
CONCLUSION.
Nor prince, nor peer, shall have just cause to say,
God shortened Harry's happy life one day.
Six
years have passed since Harry Davis went to
L to learn the carpenter's trade of Mr.
Norton
.
The relation between them proved most happy
justice and liberality on the one side, industry and
fidelity on the other. The friendship between Harry
and Clapham, nurtured in clouds and storms, throve
in sunshine. The six years have passed prosperously
in Harry's outer and inner world; and now, at the
age of three-and-twenty, and ripened in experience
and virtue, we must present him in a new scene.
Imagine, my dear readers, a village called
Bayside
(there is some talk of changing its name to
Maryshome) situated on one of the small bays of
Lake Erie. The village is on a gentle declivity,
sloping down to the bay, and flanked by a wood,
cut into, here and there, by rich fields of wheat,
where, as the pure breezes pass, you may see the
stalks waving around the stumps of recently levelled
trees. At one extremity of the village is a little
church of rare beauty of proportion and form, and
attached to it a cemetery, in which clumps of the
original trees of the forest are left standing, their
majestic growth giving to it a fitting and beautiful
solemnity. At the other extremity of the village is a
rustic school-house, with all the modern improvements
for ventilating and warming, and surrounded by a
play-ground, as it is modestly called, but which, with
its ten acres, its walks, and noble trees, and thrifty
plantings, better deserves the name of Park than
many a piece of ground that bears that ostentatious
designation. In the centre of the village is a large,
convenient establishment for carpentry, bearing on its
front the well-known names of
Davis
&
Hale
.
From the busy going to and fro to the work-shop,
and from the many hands to be seen through its
open windows busily employed, it is evidently a most
thriving establishment, and the source of supply to
the rising towns in the neighborhood. A little
retired
from the busy village street, and separated by
a wide garden, are two very small, neat houses; so
small that it is evident the proprietors, who have
laid out around them grounds that have the promise
of much future beauty, indulge the expectation of
enlarging them. But even these humble beginnings
are not without the charm of proportion and fitness;
and they, as well as the church and school-house,
show that Bayside has the advantage of a resident
draughtsman, who has both experience and taste in
architectural plans. The cemetery and play-ground
are indications, too, that a thoughtful and cultivated
mind has been employed there. What an
enchanting
world would the up-springing villages of the rich
West present, if an intelligent sense of the beautiful
made the improvements in harmony with the
loveliness
of nature!
It is twilight of a fine June evening, and there
is a cheerful stir about the village of Bayside.
Young fathers and young mothers, young men and
maidens, and a few elderly people, (very few there
are in these new settlements,) all dressed in their
best, are making their way towards one of the twin
cottages. They are gathered there. Let us look in.
The
suite
of apartments  a kitchen, bed-room, and
parlor, all neatly though sparingly furnished  are
hung with festoons of wild flowers, wreaths around
the windows, wreaths around the doors, and wreaths
around the glass; under it stands a table with the
honored patrimonial Bible on which the Salisbury
family was nurtured. The prettiest wreath of all is
made of mosses and white immortals, and it encircles
a bridal present from Mr. Lyman  a sweet picture
of little Lucy.
A white rose in full bloom, and a honeysuckle,
both brought from the east, are trained around the
window, and send in sweet odors, breathing memories
of the Salisbury home.
On one side the parlor, and opposite little
Lucy's portrait, stands an elderly matron, whose face
tells the story of trials patiently and serenely borne,
of a quiet conscience, of satisfied expectations, and
a heart overflowing with gratitude to Providence.
Next her stands her son, the crowning blessing
of her life  a pattern of filial devotion, of fraternal
affection, and of conjugal happiness. On his other
side, and leaning on his arm, is a lovely young
woman, who wears over her bright brown hair a
cap half matronly, half girlish  a sort of token that a
piece of furniture belongs to her which may be seen
through the open door of the bed-room, where a
cradle is jogged by a girl whose face is bright with
happiness, in spite of the green ribbon over the eyes
which blind Nannie always wears.
Standing in the door-way is a man somewhat
past middle age, a perfect impersonation of hilarity.
He must be a Frenchman. There is a sort of I
told you so look upon his face. His arms are
folded, and his fingers are playing a tune on his
arms which he can hardly await the finishing of a
ceremony then going on to enact with lips and feet.
It is a bridal ceremony. Thrilling memories,
blending with joy, gratitude, and hope, have lit up
the bridegroom's cheek with a color so brilliant, and
given to his rich, dark eye such a glow, that the
carpenter of Bayside might be mistaken for a hero
of romance. But the pretty, blooming bride beside
him, clad in white muslin, and decked with white
roses, is no heroine
Not too bright or good
For human nature's daily food,
but fitted for life,  holidays, working-days, and all,
and an image of its dearest contentments. She
extends
her hand to receive the wedding ring. It is
of hair set into a gold hoop; and interwoven in
the hair is the name of
Annie
.
As the bridegroom slides it on to her finger, he
recalls the dark day in the prison of L when he
made it, and breathes a fervent thanksgiving for the
manifold mercies that have since been showered on
The Boy of Mount Rhigi
.My dear Mother
:
Firstly, I enclose the two
dollars
you gave me for travelling expenses. I met
Mr. Lyman on board the steamboat, and he gave me
five dollars, which he said he owed me for my aid in
the drawings he made for the New York architect.
Fine! After the wet time of parting was over, I was
in luck. Mr. Porter would not take any thing for
bringing me to the boat,  thirty good miles,  because
I helped him pick up apples one day after Jesse Porter
broke his arm. I was pretty hungry; but hearing they
charged half a dollar for supper, I bought some
crackers and cheese before I went on board. So I
came to the city for fifty cents. Such bustle and
confusion as there was on the wharf where we landed!
I made my way through it as well as I could, and
inquired the way to Chambers Street, not far, No. ,
where Mrs. Dawson lives. I saw the windows were
all closed, and so I sat my box of clothes down, and
sat on it. I began to feel both lonesome and
hungry
;
nothing seemed like morning  the fresh,
beautiful
morning of the country. The sun shining on
chimneys and brick walls, instead of hill-tops and
sparkling waters; not a solitary bird singing; not
even a cock crowing. After a while, milkmen began
to appear. There was a different one for almost every
house, and each made a horrid outcry; and, after
a while, a woman came out of a cellar, and took a
measure of milk. Though they live in great houses,
this seems poverty to me. By and by, there came a
lively little driver with baskets full of bread. I
remembered
Dr. Franklin's account of his buying a loaf
of bread and eating it as he walked through the
streets of Philadelphia, when first he went there;
and, though I do not expect to eat bread in kings'
houses, as he afterwards did, I thought there would
be no harm in following his example; so I bought a
sixpenny loaf of bread, and, with a draught of milk
from a milkman, I made a good breakfast. You see,
mother, I am determined to make my money last, if
possible, till I can earn more, and not call on you or
trouble our kind friend Mrs. Dawson. As soon as
her blinds were opened, I rung. The man who opened
the door smiled when I asked for Mrs. Dawson, and
said she would rise in about two hours. How long
those two hours were! But when they were over,
and I was summoned to her, she was as kind as ever.
She told me she had procured for me an excellent
place in a retail shop in Broadway, where, if I did as
well as my employer expected from her account of
me, I should receive enough, even the first year, to
pay my board. Before going there, she advised me to
secure a boarding-place; she had made inquiries for
this, and gave me references, and off I set. I went
from one to another. At one there was a multitude
of clerks, and a coarse, slatternly housekeeper; at
another there was a set of low traders. I went in
while they were at dinner, and a very slight
observation
13
of their vulgar manners and conversation
convinced
me they were not associates that I should
relish or you would approve. The next was full,
and the last was too filthy for any thing. As I
came off the steps quite discouraged, there was a
little fat lady walking before me in a gray silk
gown, and a white shawl, looking as neat as a new
pin. Two dirty shavers of boys had filled a
squirt-gun
in the gutter, and had taken aim at the lady's
nice gown. I sprang upon them just in time,
wrenched the squirt-gun from their hands, and sent
it off out of sight. They began kicking and
bawling
;
and she, turning round, learned the mischief
they had intended. She was very thankful to me,
very good natured, and talkative. She told me the
gown was new, just come home, and she had put it
on for a wedding-visit,  a visit to her niece's
husband's
first cousin; it was her best gown, too; she
had heard of the boys playing such tricks; boys
would be boys, &c., &c. O, mother dear! her
tongue goes by machinery. (Not father's!) She had
such a friendly way, and did not seem a very great
lady, and asked me so many questions,  my name,
where I came from, &c.,  that I thought I would tell
her what I was in search of. This silenced her
for a moment; then she said, Come home with me,
and we'll see what can be done. I'll talk to Plenty,
Plenty is my sister,  and perhaps  but I won't
raise expectations yet. We live in Mercer Street,
retired and central too.
We were soon at her house,  a small,
two-story
wooden building, that looks like a mere crack
between the two tall brick houses on each side of
it. I followed her into a little front room. There
was sitting an oldish lady, taking care of a little
blind child. The child uttered a cry of delight at
hearing the sound of my new friend's voice, returned
her half a dozen hasty kisses, and called her `aunty
Peace;' and the old lady, into whose hands she put
a piece of wedding-cake, said, `O, thank'ee; tell us all
about the wedding.' `Directly, directly,' replied my
new friend; and, bidding me sit down, and giving me
a generous bit of the wedding-cake, she bustled out
of the room, saying she would return in a few
minutes
.
She did, and brought her sister with her,
her twin sister,  and
Peace
and
Plenty
stood before
me, looking almost precisely alike, fat and full, smiling
and abounding
two
cornucopias. They could have
been called nothing but Peace and Plenty, or Milk
and Honey. The only difference I could see between
them was, that Peace had a dimple in one cheek only,
and Plenty in both; that Peace wore a `front,' and
Plenty her own gray hair. However, I suspect the
`front' was put on for high dress. They are droll
looking, but such pleasant faces! Nice, complete sets
of white teeth; and well they are so, for their mouths
are never both shut. Their eyes are rather small,
but bright and warm as sunshine in June, and their
cheeks are rather fat,  but there is not a wrinkle
near them, but a bright color on them. I did not
expect to find such people in a city, so kind, so plain,
so as if they were content to be themselves, and did
not aim to be like any body else.
Well, dear mother, we had a great deal of talk,
which I would write, but have not time or paper.
The amount of it was that (suppose me to be
blushing
)
Miss Peace was pleased with my appearance;
that she felt moved towards me by my saving her
new gown and shawl; that, as soon as she knew my
wants, it occurred to her that, if Plenty felt as she
did, they could board me. Their house was pretty
full, to be sure; the old lady and her grandchild,
Nannie, occupied the back room, Peace and Plenty
the front chamber, her three nieces the back one,
and there was nothing left but a little place over the
entry, that they used for a clothes-press; but they
might take the clothes out, and put me in; I should
have to stand on my bed to dress, but I could keep
my clothes in boxes under it, and there was room to
put my arm between the wall and bed to get them,
and I could hang some things up, and it would be
handy reaching. I did make one suggestion, mother
Where should I put a wash-basin?
`I like that,' said Peace, and Plenty nodded her
approbation; indeed, I find it's always a voice and an
echo, no matter which speaks first.
`There's a nice little closet for washing, in the
area,' she said; `it has a window, and room for a
wash-stand and a small tub; and there's a lock on the
door, and you shall have it all to yourself.'
Now, but two points remained to be settled.
Miss Peace would make suitable inquiries about me
of Mrs. Dawson, because it was customary. It was
enough for her to look in my face; (blushing again,
dear mother.) The other point was the price of my
board. `The cost,' she thought, `would be about two
dollars; and her profits,' she said, with a smile, `she
would get out of little services I could render. It
would be handy having one mankind in the house.'
Two dollars I can pay, as Holson has promised
me a salary of a hundred dollars a year, with two
weeks' vacation. So, mother, I felt very happy. Miss
Peace went with me to Mrs. Dawson's, without any
delay; and, after a short private interview, they were
both perfectly satisfied. Mrs. Dawson had heard of
the twin sisters, and was rejoiced that Providence had
directed me to so good a home; and my new friend's
face sparkled all over, at the good account our kind
benefactress had given of us. In addition to the low
board,  for I find it is very low here,  the sisters
have my washing done in the house. They have one
servant, and they say, that on washing-days they will
do a little more for her, and it will not come hard to
any one. It is all `live and let live' here. Their
nieces are three orphan girls; one but two years older
than little Lucy, whom I am to carry to school and
fetch home, when the days are stormy; one eight,
and one fourteen, thinner, more city looking than
Annie,  I mean in point of health,  but as unaffected
and frank as Annie herself; and, being just about
Annie's age, she seems very natural to me, and I
think we shall be quite friends. Her name is Mary
Hale.
After getting all things settled in my
press-room
,
I went to Mrs. Dawson, who wished to introduce me
to Mr. Holson. He was very civil to our friend; but,
I must confess, I did not like his looks; and his
manner
seemed to me both sly and fawning. He spoke
of the very uncommon terms on which I was coming;
of my rare good fortune  being a raw hand  in
obtaining a salary; said I must thank Mrs. Dawson
for it; Mrs. Dawson was one of his best customers
hoped she would continue so; said he should expect
extra service for such extra salary; mentioned some
shops where no salary was paid, and others where
clerks paid for their places; and said, in rather a
lower voice,  still I heard him,  that dress was very
important to the impression of the shop; that clerks
should have a fashionable air; that my clothes were
country-made; that it was a disadvantage; but,
for
Mrs. Dawson's sake
, he would put up with a great deal.
I was a little provoked, mother, but I tried to
remember that you had told me, again and again, not
always to expect smooth sailing; that life was a sort
of checker-work, and that I must be grateful for the
good, and make the best of the evil, and that what
seems evil to us often turns out, in the end, to be
good, &c., &c. I have far more good than evil in my
fortune. Nothing can exceed Mrs. Dawson's kindness;
and then my luck in my boarding-house! Mother, it
will be a home to me. Mr. Holson told me to come
to his shop in the evening, and he would give me his
instructions. The clerks surveyed me superciliously.
I heard the words `shabby,' and `down east,' and one
of them was ill-bred enough to touch his own
neckcloth
and point to mine, and, at the same time, wink
to his companion. Mother, I felt mortified, plagued;
I am ashamed to confess it, but I did. I know
there was a want of manliness and independence in
this, and I am ashamed of it; but things look so
different in New York and in Salisbury! When I
left home, I felt as if you had provided every thing
I could want,  as if I were a little too smart, if any
thing,  and now!  But I am determined not to
give up to it. I will not sacrifice a principle to an
appearance. I will not make myself one of the
`clothes people!'
While I was at tea, Mrs. Dawson's servant
brought me a note enclosing fifteen dollars  a present
from her to enable me, she says, to present myself
more acceptably in Mr. Holson's shop.
This is very, very kind, very generous. But,
mother, I shall not accept it. In the first place, it
would be going right in the face of your
instructions
`I must depend on my own exertions.
Charities are for the helpless. A dependence on
gifts, if it does not make us mean and cringing,
does make us helpless.' This I learned from you;
and, from my own reflection, I am sure I shall respect
myself more a month hence, if I go before those
impertinent young men in my plain, rather
coarsish
country clothes. So I'll face it out like a man.
I spent the afternoon in walking round the city,
and in looking at the beautiful fountains. There
are three large ones, and are to be many more.
The water is thrown sixty feet into the air, and then
falls back in showers of jewels, as it seems when
the sun shines. I sat down in Union Park, and
looked and listened, till I fancied I felt the cool
breath of Rhigi by the brook-side. These fountains
in the city seem to me like a bit of lovely poetry
in a book of tiresome prose. They are a voice from
another land, a breath from home. I remained,
sitting
near the fountain, refreshed and thoughtful. I
do not know whether it was dream or reverie, but I
was coming down Rhigi with Clapham; and then
we were all kneeling around dear little Lucy's bed,
and Clapham was with us. Suddenly I started up,
and saw the stars shining, and felt my cheeks wet
with the spray, or with tears, dear mother.It seems to me, dear mother, that I have lived a
year in the last fortnight. On the very Monday that
I sent you an account of the upshot at Holson's, Mr.
Nevis obtained the promise of an excellent situation
for me with Messrs. James Bent & Co., where his
son, my friend, already is. Mr. Bent is respected as
a man of strict integrity, and every part of his
establishment
is well conducted; and I am to have a salary
of $150. Only imagine how rich I shall be! `It
never rains, but it pours!' Coming out of Mr. Bent's,
who should I meet but Mr. Lyman! He has more
work on hand than he can do,  making plans and
drawings for the first architect in the city,  and he
wanted me to help him. Never was any thing more
opportune. The place I am to have at Mr. Bent's
will not be vacant till next month, and now I can be
earning something; and, to tell the truth, mother, I do
need a little fitting up for summer.
Dear mother, I am really enjoying myself now,
as much as I think one can ever enjoy in a city. I
am afraid I shall never feel at home here, but I really
am happy now. I am drawing all day, and all the
evening. I get a book from the Mercantile Library,
and Mary Hale reads aloud. We are reading now
Irving's Columbus,  one of the most charming books
ever written,  and Mary's reading is like setting it
to music. Mother, her voice is the sweetest you ever
heard. It reminds me of little Lucy's. And when
she sits under the lamp, the light shining on her
beautiful brown hair and white forehead, I  I can
hardly keep my eyes on my drawing. Mary has
received
her education at one of the public schools, and
you would be astonished to know how much she has
acquired, and how well. Her good aunts are not fond
of reading; they stay in the little front parlor, where
their tongues go at both ends; but, bless them! they
never speak an evil or an unkind word. Old Mrs.
Bland, who loves a book above every thing, sits in the
back parlor with us and listens, and teaches her poor
little blind grandchild to sew and knit. Would you
not like to look in upon us, dear mother? I should
be perfectly happy if I were out of a city. If I
were, dear mother, where I could see Mount Rhigi,
and hear the sound of a brook; and if  O, what
an if!  if Clapham was what he seemed to us when
little Lucy died, and was out of that old jail.Extract from a Letter from Harry's Mother
.
Your present, my dear son, was very acceptable,
as a proof of your abiding and ever-thoughtful love;
but do not send me any thing more at present.
Keep your earnings for your summer's outfit. We
want for nothing. Thanks to a kind Providence, my
health is good, and Annie's. There is never lack
of work for willing hands; and our wants, except
for your afflicted father, are small. His cough is
severe, and he declines daily, so that the doctor says
he should not be surprised if he dropped away at
any minute. His appetite continues remarkably. I
might find it difficult to satisfy it, but our kind
neighbors send in daily of their best. We have
plenty of fresh. To-day, dear old Mrs. Allen sent a
quarter of a roaster, and your father ate nearly the
whole of it. You know he was always remarkably
fond of pig. Our neighbors never let him be out of
custards, pies, and preserves. You know, Harry, I
never liked to call on my neighbors for watchers in
sickness, and think that, in most cases, it's much
better doing without them; but father feels different.
He likes company, he says, when he is awake, and I
am no talker. He is able yet to engage his own
watchers. He borrows the sheriff's old horse, and
jogs round after them. I don't oppose, though I
sometimes fear he will die on the road; but it serves
to divert him.
O Harry, you will have feelings when you read
what I have now to write to you! Last evening,
about nine, Norman Dunn was found lying on the
ground, at the tavern steps. At first, they supposed
he was drunk; but it proved that he was sick, worn
out with travelling afoot, and, indeed, nigh unto death.
They got him on to a bed, and, as soon as he
revived
,
he asked to have me sent for. O Harry, he
was an awful sight to behold, with his long, black
beard, and livid face, and swollen eyes. I supposed
he wanted to hear about Massy's death; so I told
him she did not suffer for any thing, and how the
selectmen had her brought down to the village, and
she had good watchers every night, and I was with
her at the last, for the sake of Clapham. He did
not give me the least attention, but kept moving
and worrying till I mentioned Clapham; then he rose
right up, and said, `Stop there; don't talk about
Massy; she's dead, and gone to the dl, for what
I care.' (Only think, Harry, what a hardened sinner!)
`But Clapham! it's for his sake I have dragged here
more dead than alive; and, while breath lasts, let me
tell you how I wronged him. Your own boy, Harry,
was not better than my boy; nor so good; for Clapham
had the devil always at his elbow, and was good in spite
of it. I was the devil to him  I, his father!'
Mrs. Davis then went on to write the particulars
Norman gave of his having forced poor Clapham, in
his childhood, to accompany him on his marauding
expeditions among hen-roosts and clothes-lines. He
then told the whole story of the robbery,  every
particular, every word, with which our readers are
already acquainted,  and, in conclusion, said, And
I let him be accused  my own child, and such a
boy  and be taken off to jail, just because I could not
bear shutting up out of the fresh air. But I have
tried to right him at last  I have. I've walked forty
miles since I thought every step would be my last.
Now let them send for Squire Avery, and you tell
the story, and I'll swear to it, and then I'm done.
The magistrate was immediately sent for, a
deposition
made, and the oath administered to Norman.
After that, he sank away, and died before morning,
without sign of repentance towards God. Unhappy
man!
Mrs. Davis's letter thus concluded: Only think,
my dear son, how we, his best friends, and his true
friends, have wronged this poor boy. I always had
feelings for him. He was somehow bound up in my
heart with little Lucy; and I have daily remembered
him in my prayers. Annie is the happiest girl you
ever saw. She cried for joy. But we must do
something
more than feel, or pray, or cry, Harry. Every
one says that steps should be taken for Clapham;
but no one takes them. What is every body's
business
is nobody's. Now, my son, as you have a week
before you enter on your new clerkship, had you not
best come home and see about getting up a petition
to the governor for Clapham's pardon? I know it
will be an expense, and neither you nor I have spare
shillings. But sometimes we must
not
count the cost.
Annie and I have laid by a few dollars against a
call for mourning, that must soon come; that is at
your service; and you, my son, can wear your old
hat till you can earn a new one; and so, among
us, we can make it out, and neither borrow nor beg.
But I leave you to decide.
Harry did decide, without hesitation; and the very
next day found him at the door of the prison in L.My dear cousin,  I am proud to call you so,
Harry Davis, your visit to me has done me, as I
humbly hope, great good. I had lived here ten years,
within a stone's throw of this jail, and never seen
the inside of it. I call myself a Christian. I am
a professor. I pray daily in my family for those
who are in the gall of bitterness and bond of
iniquity
,
and yet I have never, till you came here, lifted
one of my fingers to loosen these bonds. I pray that
missionaries, preaching the good news of salvation,
may be sent to the whole human family. I subscribe
to charitable societies,  and so I should, as God has
prospered me,  and yet I have not done the
duty
nearest to me
. If I had, or if my Christian neighbors
had, the scenes of filth, idleness, and iniquity in that
jail would never have existed to witness against us.
I have taken measures to have that rascally jailer
removed. They talk of a disinfecting fluid. There
should be a moral disinfection in the character of the
man who has the care of the tenants of a jail  morally
diseased creatures.
Clapham sends a world of love to you and yours.
He has already begun with his evening school, and
so earnestly that I am sure he will soon be able
to write for himself.
How much I wish that, instead of the uncertain
life of a city merchant, you had chosen to come and
learn with me my good trade, which will thrive as
long as men live in houses. But wherever you are,
God bless you, as He ever does His faithful servants.
Truly, your obliged friend,
Benjamin Norton
.Extracts from Harry Davis's Letters.
Dear Mother
:
It is now three months since
I have been with Mr. Bent; and, excepting
my poor father's death, life has been all smooth
sailing
with me. You have been getting on so nicely!
Clapham
Hale
giving such complete satisfaction to
Mr. Norton, and you and Annie  as appears by
your last letter  surprised with his improved
appearance
and manly bearing. Does he not seem like one
of us?
I have reason every day to feel grateful to Mr.
Nevis for my situation at Mr. Bent's. He is a model
in his department of mercantile life. He requires
of his clerks a strict performance of their duty.
They must be up to the mark; and there is the
strictest supervision of them. They sign a contract
not to go to the theatre, nor to any public places
of amusement, excepting during their holidays, when,
he says, their parents or guardians take the
responsibility
from him. They all have salaries in
proportion
to their capacities for business. Mr. Bent is
quite as exact in his duties to them as in his
requirements
from them. He watches over them like
a parent. If a lad is drooping, he gives him a
holiday. If he detects a fault, he gives a secret and
kind admonition, as if it were his own child he was
dealing with. He sees himself to the young men
having eligible boarding places; he permits no extra
hours, or over-work, unless it is inevitable; he pays
all the salaries on the first of each month; he
subscribes
himself, for the clerks who themselves are
not able to subscribe, to the Mercantile Library; he
gives a kind word of approbation where it is due,
and I think never blames undeservedly; he permits
no puffing of the goods, no false shows of any sort;
we must be assiduous to his customers, civil and
devoted, but never importunate; there is but one
price in his shop. In short, dear mother, he spares
no pains to give us upright characters, and
gentlemanly
deportments, and thus prepares us for an
honorable
career. He does well the duty nearest to him.
My evenings are passed so pleasantly, mother!
Mr. Lyman has been ill in bed for the last month,
and I have had the pleasure of making some return
to him for all his kindness to me, by finishing,
gratuitously
,
the drawing of plans he had begun. I am
always delighted when I have drawing, for then
Mary Hale reads to me. You cannot imagine how
curious she is to see Clapham, ever since she
discovered
that he was a distant relation of hers. Not
so very distant either, as that Mr. Felix Hale was
a brother of her grandfather; so they are second
cousins. `Blood is thicker than water,' say the good
aunts; `and Clapham shall be just as near to us as
any of our nephews.'
The poor little blind child has been frightfully
ill, and Mary Hale was her nurse. I wish, mother,
you could have seen the care she took of her, and
heard her, when she was getting a little better, and
was rather fretful, singing long ballads to her in the
dead of the night, and telling her story after story.
I think, dear mother, you would have loved her as
well  no, not so well as I do; no one ever can
love as I love Mary Hale!
There it is! a secret that has been for months
burning in my heart, and I could not tell it, even
to my mother! Don't laugh at me! don't; don't
reason with me. I know very well that I am not
quite seventeen, and Mary Hale not quite sixteen;
and I do not know whether Mary feels at all as I
do. I sometimes
guess
and hope; but, dear mother,
one thing I am sure of, I shall never be worthy of
her.